title,selftext,subreddit
M4F/T I think it’s time I lose my anal virginity,"Hello, so as the title reads I’ve been fantasizing a lot lately about getting pegged. I’m hoping to find a chat buddy that’s into this ",q4q
"20[FM4R] bi couple looking for third to chat with, all welcome","20 year old bisexual stoner couple seeking anyone to meet up for threesome/foursome.if you guys are a couple. we are into cuckolding, spanking, lingerie, pic swapping, toys, light bdsm and most other kinks or we're open to trying them😏. We are both switches.
Our type is gym bod/skinny guys and pretty much any type of girl
Based in northern UK but love to chat if that's what you're into but preferably want to meet eventually
Messages with a bit of detail about you and your kinks and/or pics get priority and don't worry, we willl return😍😘. Looking to hopefully find something good on here. ",q4q
"24 [M4M] NY Near, far. Wherever you are? :)","Hello Reddit. Im a 23 yr old black male in search of a good guy to converse with and develop an honest and genuine relationship. While my aspirations may seem of a fairytale nature or above the clouds, Im still a believer in the concept of true love. The reality is sometimes the setting of an online relationship can be less than ideal and there seem to be no incentive for people to be committed when they can just ghost you in a matter of seconds. However, why not take the chance despite the many road bumps? Why not indulge in the wonder of finding the one person you can wake up to for the rest of your life. Whats so wrong in believing in a little starstrucked magic. Theres nothing wrong with it. I guess what im trying to say is that I know there's a great guy out there for me. Someone with a love so pure and hungry that its dying for direct connection. Wherever you are hiding, here i am!

",q4q
FTM4Q Portland OR,"Im a 26 year old trans man looking for friends and/or more in the Portland area. I attend college and would love to have a study buddy. I need more queer people in my life. 

I love creating art
Photography
Hiking
Travling (when I can, dreams)
Tabletop games (nerdy, strategic board games) 

If any of this sound like we would be a good match send me a message. 
I currently identify as pansexual. Kind of exploring my sexuality. 
",q4q
35 yo looking for 18-20,"Im looking for a young handsome stud in Arkansas to hang with, maby have some fun. I live in the Clinton/Choctaw area. Cant drive but can host. If interested, hmu😌",q4q
Phone Sex M4M,Always looking for good phone sex with other like minded guys. Big fan of roleplay and sub/dom. PM me and lets rub one out together,q4q
Looking For Love,"35 yo transgirl in Clinton, AR looking for a handsome, athletic guy for chat and hopefully a LTR. Any takers?",q4q
"M4M - nothing serious, just fun","I’ll be straightforward about this - not looking for anything serious, just some pure fun with a bi/gay guy. Specifics can be talked about if you message me. I don’t really buy in to all the nonsense surrounding sex, so at least be open minded. ",q4q
M4M seeking drity kik bud,I like older guys but basically im looking for someone to swap pics with mainly straight and pics of us. Not super concerned with age or size. Just send me a message with your kik and we can get started,q4q
32 [M4M] NYC Looking for a nice guy,"32 from NYC looking for a nice guy to chat with. Interested in dirty talk and if we do hit it off, would love to meet in person. Not looking for hookups",q4q
M4M Los angeles,Looking to suck a dick ! hit me up for more info. Good looking discreet college kid here ,q4q
26 [F4F] slightly awkward bi nerd looking for... Something???,,q4q
22 [M4A] Kinky Friends and Maybe More?,"I'm out on the search to explore my kinks and sexuality. I'm bisexual, tall, quite a large fella. I often scare off strangers with my size, that is until I open my mouth and the dorkiness pours out :P

&amp;#x200B;

I'm not everyone's cup of tea, and I'm okay with that. I wear my heart on my sleeve, and I make friends easily (thanks to my goofy humor and overall lovable demeanor, I suppose?) I'm polyamorous, so dating is always an option, but I like to take my time. We all have hangups, and I'd like to get to really know someone before I commit like that. I work almost constantly now, as I'm the only roomie with a consistent income (until summer), but I'm desperate to meet more friends especially in the LGBTQ community.

&amp;#x200B;

I'm a nerd to the extreme, I'd say. I love all things gaming, and a lot of my childhood was spent collecting boardgames, numerous cards (YuGiOh, MtG, pokemon, you know the type), movie posters, popular book/manga series, and more. These days, I stick mostly to hoarding DVD versions of my old favorites, reading fanfics on my phone before bed, and the occasional D&amp;D session. I also love to cook and bake, and being pescatarian gives me more to experiment with in the kitchen.

&amp;#x200B;

Kinkwise, I need to explore. I'm curious about the furry, petplay, and DD/little lifestyles the most. I'm a huge fan of butts, and I cannot lie. I'm very adamantly more of a snuggle-for-hours than a sexytimes guy, but I don't mind sex when the mood strikes me. I'm a Top, but so far only sensually. Want to teach this awkward but lovable bear of a guy how to flirt? HMU.",q4q
30 [M4A] - Skinny pan boy looking to receive oral for the first time #philly,"Title says it all, but I'm only available this weekend and need to be hosted (can travel within reason)... I promise what I've got to show you (and what I've saved up) will be worth your while.

Kik same as Reddit name",q4q
NYC adventure,"My cock whispered these options in my ear:

1) Looking for a CD / Sissy / Femboy to dress up with because I'm interested im feeling sexy with a friend.

2) Looking for a CD / Sissy / Femboy to fuck. Because i'm a straight dude afterall.

3) Maybe a little bit of both perhaps...

DM me for sexy times, fun and adventure!",q4q
31 [m4m] DC Area man looking to experiment.,"I have never been with a man before and I would like to experiment if possible. Perhaps a little making out, maybe more if I feel it—please don’t take it personally if I say no, I have never done this before. I am attracted to softness so not really into beefy guys. I think Twink is the closest description of what I am looking for. I am black with a dad bod and a 7.5 inch and thick cock if that matters. I cannot host unfortunately.  Kik is captham87. Please send a sfw photo. I am ddf and tested. I prefer that you be to if we get that far. ",q4q
Mtf4m or mtf,Heyy I'm here looking for people to talk to and see if it can lead to more. I'm nerdy and bit of a shutin but I've had my fair share of adventures. Pretty easy to talk to. Feel free to pm me to ask for pics or get my discord,q4q
19 [M4M] Hoping an older guy will tell me what to do~,"It's early and I'm unnaturally horny. Following another guy's orders really turns me on and makes me more into the moment. 
 
Kik is twinklingstarsy for those interested~",q4q
19 [M4A] Looking for my online owner,"Hey, I'm a sub male who loves being ordered to do things for someone else's pleasure.

Message me here or on Kik - twinklingstarsy",q4q
"21, MtF, Pan, Louisville KY (T4T)","Im a pansexual trans female looking for a nice trans boy to have a honest relationship. I am pan and poly so I am ok with being a 3rd if interested. I am a gamer and studying film in collage. 100% house wife material. Will cook and clean for cuddles.

Edit: I forgot to put if you wanna contact me just DM me on here. I will answer any questions. And also if you just wanna chat and be friends im down. Lol",q4q
"26, Oshawa {M4M} Small, Skinny Dom Seeking Muscular/Athletic Sub",,q4q
24 [M4A] Looking to make new friends. Steam/Battlenet?,"Hey there, 

Just to be clear, I'm not trying to flirt or anything sexual like that. I only want to connect with some similar-minded queer folks. 

Basically I've finally pulled myself out of a very heavy lifelong depression. I feel so ambitious and constructive these days, and it makes me want to build some new connections. 

I get a ton of pleasure from learning new things, exploring the outdoors, and being creative. I live on the west coast of the United States and there is so much to appreciate out here! I also spend a lot of time indoors: cooking, improving my programming skillz, and a bit of gaming (lately Overwatch and HotS; Zarya is bae).

Weed and coffee are my vices (it's legal in my state, sometimes I grow). Metal and hiphop are my favorite genres of music, but I listen to all sorts of things. Mexican food is my favorite and I eat *hella beans*. 

I'd love to discuss anything: from pop culture geek shit, to technical nerd jargon, to political or philosophical questions. I can be incredibly goofy or very serious just depending on what's going on. No matter who you are, I'm eager to learn about you and share some conversation, so hit me up. :)",q4q
"24 [M4M] NY Near, far. Wherever you are? :)","Hello Reddit. Im a 23 yr old black male in search of a good guy to converse with and develop an honest and genuine relationship. While my aspirations may seem of a fairytale nature or above the clouds, Im still a believer in the concept of true love. The reality is sometimes the setting of an online relationship can be less than ideal and there seem to be no incentive for people to be committed when they can just ghost you in a matter of seconds. However, why not take the chance despite the many road bumps? Why not indulge in the wonder of finding the one person you can wake up to for the rest of your life. Whats so wrong in believing in a little starstrucked magic. Theres nothing wrong with it. I guess what im trying to say is that I know there's a great guy out there for me. Someone with a love so pure and hungry that its dying for direct connection. Wherever you are hiding, here i am!

",q4q
"25 [T4Any, other trans people preferred] (SF, CA) Queer mess seeking similar for dates, potential relationships, also interested in hookups with older women",,q4q
NYC bi-curious dude looking for curious straight couple for NSA play,"Hey there!

I'm a 26 year old (mostly gay) dude who is interested in playing around with a straight couple. I love fucking, getting fucked and especially love sucking dick. I have never eaten pussy before but am very interested in trying it. I love to worship cock, and I know I would enjoying worshipping a woman's pussy too. I would love to fuck a woman as I suck her partner's dick. I would love eat a woman's pussy while her partner's fucks my hole.

I am interested in meeting up with a couple in the New York City area. I am interested in any age. I have a car, so I can come to you if need be. I have pictures that are available upon request. I'm super sexy and love having a good, wild sexy time.",q4q
30M looking for phone fun (M4M),"Looking for phone sex
Vers here more a bottom , 30 married discrete
Also had some experiences sharing wife with other men if you into those stories ",q4q
27 [M4M] I am looking for a very dominant phone sex partner.,"I am fairly submissive. 

I just want you to come home after a nice long day of work and unwind by doing any of the following:

Make me cry. 
Degrade me. 
Talk about raping or mur!ering me. 
Talk about piss play. 
Anything goes really. 

Let me know if you’re interested. All I ask is you be very dominant, 30 plus and have a deep voice. 

Thank you. Xoxoxo",q4q
[M4M] #NYC or #JC looking to worship my first cock,"I'm 23, 5'9, athletic, white/mixed, with a really nice bubble butt. I'm extremely submissive and desperate to service a nice cock and balls. You can play with my ass as well!     
I'm also open minded so let me know anything else you'd like to try and we can talk about it. 

     
I live in JC and work in midtown NYC, I can't host but I'm willing to travel basically anywhere in either NYC or JC/Hoboken/surrounding suburbs.     
     
Message me to talk more, send a pic and I will as well! ",q4q
"[M4M] chub in San Jose CA, looking for a good time with a athletic top","Good evening, been  while since I have been able to service a man, and I could really do with a good time. I love to make a man squirt and suck out every drop and continue to lick to feel him shiver as I try to coax a second full load out of his balls. Would love it to be more intimate than that but that is the least I am hoping for",q4q
Looking For Love,"I recently came out as Transexual. Im looking for a handsome, athletic hunk for a LTR. Im 35, single from Clinton, AR. 320lbs, long dark blond hair, green eyes. Any guys interested can leave a reply and we'll go from there☺",q4q
[M4M] Mixed 6’2” guy looking for a nice muscular daddy to get to know [18-30],I’m just looking for a good relationship that can be taken further. ,q4q
[T4M] #Augusta Submissive crossdressing non passable needs help transforming,"I'm 40yo never been with a guy, crossdress in private and want to see if I can be passable and learn, be trained to be more feminine and bottom.   Loking for daddy type, or teacher, or Master who can dress me up in erotic and kinky clothing, with wig and makeup.  Take me to friends house or to gay club,  work with me to not be so shy and inhibited about sex, especially group sex.  Would actually love my virgin experience be a threesome with me in middle with a nice shot of crystal wile tied down and videoed with my camera.  I'm in Augusta, GA",q4q
32 M4M Harrisburg/Lebanon Pa. Trying to find you top men!,"I'll get right to the point. I want to find a man, or men maybe lol, for real passionate sex that works the climax of the charts! 

I'm considerd cubby but I'm 6' tall and weigh 230. Prefer men my age and older, Daddy and bear types best! ",q4q
"23 [M4M] NY Near, far. Wherever you are? :)","Hello Reddit. Im a 23 yr old black male in search of a good guy to converse with and develop an honest and genuine relationship. While my aspirations may seem of a fairytale nature or above the clouds, Im still a believer in the concept of true love. The reality is sometimes the setting of an online relationship can be less than ideal and there seem to be no incentive for people to be committed when they can just ghost you in a matter of seconds. However, why not take the chance despite the many road bumps? Why not indulge in the wonder of finding the one person you can wake up to for the rest of your life. Whats so wrong in believing in a little starstrucked magic. Theres nothing wrong with it. I guess what im trying to say is that I know there's a great guy out there for me. Someone with a love so pure and hungry that its dying for direct connection. Wherever you are hiding, here i am!

",q4q
20 [M4M] Can anyone here really dirty talk?,"Call me and tell me what you'd do to me. Give me your best shot. 

&amp;#x200B;

Gray --&gt; (561) 768-0000 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",q4q
22 [m4m] want to give head in San Francisco #sanfrancisco,Or in the bay area.,q4q
M4M # SF Gl Bi Wm DL to suck or swap hosting SF,you 20-45 sane,q4q
"19[M4M] OKlahoma, just a simply curious straight guy",It's super hard to find anyone on reddit from OK. I've been wondering what it's like to mess around with a guy and I wanna try it out. I'd prefer someone closer to my age that way I feel safer. PM if interested :/,q4q
"21[M4M] Long Island, NY- Looking to suck, maybe more","Hey there, fat, 21 year old guy looking to service some men, maybe get fucked or more. 

I'm kink friendly, and don't really care about looks, just want a nice cock and some cum.",q4q
M4M,"looking for a bottom that is interested in playing with an age gap couple.
Slim to avg under 40 great hygiene
Very oral, rim an tops
Smokers",q4q
"Mf4mm orlando, central Florida","We've been looking for a guy to join us for a while and it's been difficult to find. We are looking for a guy or or a couple comfortable with the my wife being in the room watching maybe joining. I'm 170, 5.9 and in decent shape. If I feel conformable and we connect I would like to bottom too. Please be discreet and disease free. Please be between the ages of 19-35. 
",q4q
29 T4Q South Bay California,"FtM (transgender man) living in the South Bay area of Cali, looking for casual sex, oneshots or on going with folks of any gender / gender presentation. Im a switch and particularly into DP if you're good with toys or have a friend who wants to play too. I prefer not to host, but can travel anywhere in the bay depending on the day/time wanted.

Send me a message about you, what you're into and not into, what you're looking for. Ask me anything :) Pics always welcome.

T4M T4F T4T T4MM T4FF",q4q
29 [m4] new bi looking for friends or more. FL,"Hey, new to the bi stuff but an eager learner. I've done some things and loved all of it. Kinda like the dom/sub stuff (sub here). Love to chat with new friends or maybe hangout ",q4q
"23 [M4M] NY Near, far. Wherever you are? :)","Hello Reddit. Im a 23 yr old black male in search of a good guy to converse with and develop an honest and genuine relationship. While my aspirations may seem of a fairytale nature or above the clouds, Im still a believer in the concept of true love. The reality is sometimes the setting of an online relationship can be less than ideal and there seem to be no incentive for people to be committed when they can just ghost you in a matter of seconds. However, why not take the chance despite the many road bumps? Why not indulge in the wonder of finding the one person you can wake up to for the rest of your life. Whats so wrong in believing in a little starstrucked magic. Theres nothing wrong with it. I guess what im trying to say is that I know there's a great guy out there for me. Someone with a love so pure and hungry that its dying for direct connection. Wherever you are hiding, here i am!

",q4q
Philly M4M interracial relationship,"Hey guys I'm a 30 year white guy looking for a black guy to date and build from there. I'm very outgoing. I like trying new ethnic foods. I love horror movies and comedies. I like to workout. I don't mind going out but I'd rather enjoy cooking for my man and curling up on the couch watching tv. I'm 6' 215lbs thick but in the right places, brown hair, green eyes. Hit me up if you in Philly or nearby don't mind traveling. Also if it matters I'm a bottom when it comes to bedroom activities. ",q4q
21 [M4M] just came out and lost most of my friends,"Hello, I just recently came out as being gay and lost a lot of my friends. I'm hoping to look for new accepting friends. I go to Georgia Tech and am studying to be an engineer. I really like cars and everything about them. I love seafood and the ocean. Please dm me if you want to chat and id love to exchange kiks.",q4q
"23 [M4M] NY Near, far. Wherever you are? :)","Hello Reddit. Im a 23 yr old black male in search of a good guy to converse with and develop an honest and genuine relationship. While my aspirations may seem of a fairytale nature or above the clouds, Im still a believer in the concept of true love. The reality is sometimes the setting of an online relationship can be less than ideal and there seem to be no incentive for people to be committed when they can just ghost you in a matter of seconds. However, why not take the chance despite the many road bumps? Why not indulge in the wonder of finding the one person you can wake up to for the rest of your life. Whats so wrong in believing in a little starstrucked magic. Theres nothing wrong with it. I guess what im trying to say is that I know there's a great guy out there for me. Someone with a love so pure and hungry that its dying for direct connection. Wherever you are hiding, here i am!

",q4q
"23 [M4M] NY Near, far. Wherever you are? :)","Hello Reddit. Im a 23 yr old black male in search of a good guy to converse with and develop an honest and genuine relationship. While my aspirations may seem of a fairytale nature or above the clouds, Im still a believer in the concept of true love. The reality is sometimes the setting of an online relationship can be less than ideal and there seem to be no incentive for people to be committed when they can just ghost you in a matter of seconds. However, why not take the chance despite the many road bumps? Why not indulge in the wonder of finding the one person you can wake up to for the rest of your life. Whats so wrong in believing in a little starstrucked magic. Theres nothing wrong with it. I guess what im trying to say is that I know there's a great guy out there for me. Someone with a love so pure and hungry that its dying for direct connection. Wherever you are hiding, here i am!

",q4q
"30 [m4m or f or mm ff] Seattle, Portland, and Vancouver","Heading out west from NYC area. Looking for a group while I'm there: 

30 white male 5'11 180lb 6.5 cut. Love public fun and group action and love a good sauna. Guys and girls and ftm are all welcome. 

Seattle 9/8
Portland 9/9-9/12
Seattle 9/12-9/13
Vancouver island 9/13-9/14
Vancouver bc 9/14-9/15

Ready to play. 
",q4q
M4M # SF Gl Bi Wm DL to suck or swap with same,&amp;#x200B;,q4q
"Bottom (m4m) in Western, MA (Springfield), looking to be abused.","Hey everyone

I love to get fucked! I don't care what you look like or how much you weigh, just have a cock and be willing to fuck me. I love big cocks, but not a requirement. I will be getting fucked up on the brown bottle. No lube, just my spit. Fuck me as hard as you want, when you are ready to cum, cum on my face. What I would like for after you cum, is to let me jerk off to a poppers video. While I am sniffing and jerking, I want to be choked, my balls slapped, squeezed, and pulled. We can do this at your place, my place on occasions, my garage, my shed could be fun too, or any number of places. I'm not smooth, but will take any dick. I have been tested since my last encounter a few months ago. 34 years old, 5'11, 163. Will of course send a pic.",q4q
"23 [M4M] NY Near, far. Wherever you are? :)","Hello Reddit. Im a 23 yr old black male in search of a good guy to converse with and develop an honest and genuine relationship. While my aspirations may seem of a fairytale nature or above the clouds, Im still a believer in the concept of true love. The reality is sometimes the setting of an online relationship can be less than ideal and there seem to be no incentive for people to be committed when they can just ghost you in a matter of seconds. However, why not take the chance despite the many road bumps? Why not indulge in the wonder of finding the one person you can wake up to for the rest of your life. Whats so wrong in believing in a little starstrucked magic. Theres nothing wrong with it. I guess what im trying to say is that I know there's a great guy out there for me. Someone with a love so pure and hungry that its dying for direct connection. Wherever you are hiding, here i am!",q4q
2 tops looking 4 a bttm North Bama,"We are a couple looking for a bottom and we are into sucking, rimming, and topping.
Excellent hygiene expected.",q4q
"23 [M4FTM] Looking for a trans guy to fall in love with (Ottawa, ON, Canada)","I'm looking for a trans guy to get to know (IRL or long distance) with the hopes of developing a romantic relationship with him, ideally long term. 18-26 is my age range, but if you're a year or two older than 26, you can feel free to message me, too. I'm a university student into Pokemon and music, and a lot of kink stuff, if that's of any interest to you (feel free to check my post history). This may not be the best place to make a post like this, but I'm just going to go for it.  


I already know what you're going to ask; ""Why a trans guy?"". The short answer is that I dated a bunch of trans guys in a row and that turned into a preference. I've described it in previous posts. It's just that no other type of person feels right. I don't feel nearly as comfortable with a cis guy, cis girl, or trans woman as I do with trans men. Trans men make me feel safe.   


Anyways, please PM me if you'd like to chat. I look forward to hearing from you. ",q4q
19 m4m east texas,DM me for number ,q4q
21[M4A] Long Island NY- Looking to give up my mouth or virgin ass,"Hey there Long Islanders/ New Yorkers! I'm looking for someone who'd love to take my anal virginity, or even make me a submissive toy for their pleasure. 

I'm open to a lot, and willing to travel around the island to you.

About me, I'm tall, fat, hair, and have a small cock. But I'm very obedient and want to please.

Open to men, couples, transwomen or transmen, women, anyone really.",q4q
31 Orlando m4r,"I'm a pansexual cis guy who is looking for any one to hang out with. Long term or casual dating would be great, but I'm not opposed to a hookup even though it's not exactly what I'm looking for. Trans/NB friendly,  Daddy/DadBod type (but I'm losing weight) who prefers younger pm if interested",q4q
FTM4M,Just curious right now. I’ve had top surgery and I am trans but I’ve been really curious about men. Never have I ever been with a guy but strangely have been thinking about being fckd hard in my pssy (haven’t had bottom surgery) not sure about meeting up because I’m trying to be discreet. But I can’t stop thinking about having my pssy licked and played with. KIK works best for me. Message me for details ,q4q
336,Looking for mutual fun in Greensboro. Older for 25-45. I can host.,q4q
29 [m4m] Texas TX f4e wb,"Friends forever... With benefits

Any good guy lay back tops wanna loyal slut wife friend into being ur lil puppy 🐕.  Talk to mii ",q4q
"23 [M4M] NY Near, far. Wherever you are? :)","Hello Reddit. Im a 23 yr old black male in search of a good guy to converse with and develop an honest and genuine relationship. While my aspirations may seem of a fairytale nature or above the clouds, Im still a believer in the concept of true love. The reality is sometimes the setting of an online relationship can be less than ideal and there seem to be no incentive for people to be committed when they can just ghost you in a matter of seconds. However, why not take the chance despite the many road bumps? Why not indulge in the wonder of finding the one person you can wake up to for the rest of your life. Whats so wrong in believing in a little starstrucked magic. Theres nothing wrong with it. I guess what im trying to say is that I know there's a great guy out there for me. Someone with a love so pure and hungry that its dying for direct connection. Wherever you are hiding, here i am!",q4q
19 M4M NJ area,"Live around Middle town area, looking for a meet up and fuck",q4q
30 [M4M] Pittsburgh Curious bear type wants to give head,I have always fantasized about giving head and swallowing a huge load but have never worked up the courage to follow through. I would love to finally try it. Looking for older guys. Big cummers and uncut guys are a plus. Message me!,q4q
31 [M4T] Looking for a loving trans or cis domme in Hove. :),"I keep hoping to find a loving domme in Hove or Brighton UK. :) Preferably for something long term. I'd love to let my sub side out for the right woman. Age doesn't really matter, the main thing in my mind is that we get along, whether we are only meeting once or whether you feel like developing something longer term with me. I'm willing to consider most thing, although I still do have some hard limits. Happy to send pics of me if you want beforehand. I do have Snapchat, kik and whatsapp and you can always check out my profile. Feel free to ask me of any of those. Look forward to hearing from someone. :)",q4q
18 [M4R] #HemetCA -looking for discreet partner,"In the mood to give head, but open to anyone’s ideas",q4q
"23 [M4M] NY Near, far. Wherever you are? :)","Hello Reddit. Im a 23 yr old black male in search of a good guy to converse with and develop an honest and genuine relationship. While my aspirations may seem of a fairytale nature or above the clouds, Im still a believer in the concept of true love. The reality is sometimes the setting of an online relationship can be less than ideal and there seem to be no incentive for people to be committed when they can just ghost you in a matter of seconds. However, why not take the chance despite the many road bumps? Why not indulge in the wonder of finding the one person you can wake up to for the rest of your life. Whats so wrong in believing in a little starstrucked magic. Theres nothing wrong with it. I guess what im trying to say is that I know there's a great guy out there for me. Someone with a love so pure and hungry that its dying for direct connection. Wherever you are hiding, here i am!

",q4q
"21[M4M] Long Island, New York - Anyone looking for a young, virgin ass to use/abuse?","Hey there! I'm looking for someone who'd love to take my anal virginity, or even make me a submissive toy for their pleasure. 

I'm open to a lot, and willing to travel around the island to you.

About me, I'm tall, fat, hair, and have a small cock. But I'm very obedient and want to please.

Open to single men, pair of men, group, whatever.",q4q
336,"

Looking for mutual fun in Greensboro. Older for 25-45. I can host.
",q4q
Q4Q NYC,"Hello! First time poster. (be gentle!)

I’m a 37 year old, non-monog, butch, fat, shy,  lesbian, non binary, queer, woman. (she/her) I lean towards being vanilla but am open to exploring some kinks.

I’m looking for cool people for chill, fun, sexy times. Not looking for serious relationships but ongoing sexual encounters are cool/great. Kindness is a must.

I prefer to be the one doing the pleasuring but I’m shy so I perform best when given clear instruction. 

All genders, except cis men, welcome to apply. Age is less important, maturity is most important. 

Thanks for reading, slide into my dm’s if you are interested.",q4q
Anyone in Oceanside ?,,q4q
"[M4r], 57, NW Indiana","Married, closeted bisexual, looking for a secret lover. I want to feel wanted, my body appreciated, my ass up-ended.  Peek my interest, tease my mind, tickle my body, favor my bottom. ",q4q
"23 [M4M] NY Near, far. Wherever you are? :)","Hello Reddit. Im a 23 yr old black male in search of a good guy to converse with and develop an honest and genuine relationship. While my aspirations may seem of a fairytale nature or above the clouds, Im still a believer in the concept of true love. The reality is sometimes the setting of an online relationship can be less than ideal and there seem to be no incentive for people to be committed when they can just ghost you in a matter of seconds. However, why not take the chance despite the many road bumps? Why not indulge in the wonder of finding the one person you can wake up to for the rest of your life. Whats so wrong in believing in a little starstrucked magic. Theres nothing wrong with it. I guess what im trying to say is that I know there's a great guy out there for me. Someone with a love so pure and hungry that its dying for direct connection. Wherever you are hiding, here i am!

",q4q
[M4R] 27 LONDON guy looking to see who is out there,Like it says on the tin Guys or girls up for mates/dates/fun whatever really DM me,q4q
"[m4m] long beach, ca | discreet","looking for a local fella who needs a little discreet fluffing every now and then. nsa, though always welcome a regular...DL/curious OK. msg age/stats. thanks...",q4q
(21)Mtf4m or mtf,"Heyy I'm here looking for people to talk to and see if it can lead to more. I'm nerdy and bit of a shutin but I've had my fair share of adventures. Pretty easy to talk to. 
Feel free to pm me to ask for pics or get my discord",q4q
"23 [M4M] NY Near, far. Wherever you are? :)","Hello Reddit. Im a 23 yr old black male in search of a good guy to converse with and develop an honest and genuine relationship. While my aspirations may seem of a fairytale nature or above the clouds, Im still a believer in the concept of true love. The reality is sometimes the setting of an online relationship can be less than ideal and there seem to be no incentive for people to be committed when they can just ghost you in a matter of seconds. However, why not take the chance despite the many road bumps? Why not indulge in the wonder of finding the one person you can wake up to for the rest of your life. Whats so wrong in believing in a little starstrucked magic. Theres nothing wrong with it. I guess what im trying to say is that I know there's a great guy out there for me. Someone with a love so pure and hungry that its dying for direct connection. Wherever you are hiding, here i am!

",q4q
[F4F] [F4T] 20 year old GNC lesbian struggling over recent breakup who would really like some company,"Hello, as the title says, that's pretty much what's been going on in my life. I was forced to break up with my longterm girlfriend over her cheating and doing other very unforgivable things, and I'm still reeling over it because it struck me out of nowhere.

I'm not immediately looking for a relationship, or anything like that, but I would just like other LGBT people (preferably other women) to be able to talk to. I am a GNC (gender non-conforming) lesbian, or if you want more plain terms, a butch lesbian. I'm 20 years old, heavily enjoy anime, vocaloid, certain niche games, and drawing. As of now, my main source of income is doing commissions. Also am a furry, if that's something you like.

If you are interested in eventually getting in a relationship with me, a really important fact is that I mostly like trans women/AMAB people. Not that I dislike cis women, because I most definitely do like cis women too, but it's more of a genital preference, I guess? It's... complicated. And no, this does not mean I secretly like men because I have tried that before and I honestly am turned off a lot by the mere concept of dating a man, so that's definitely out of the question. Trans women are women to me, and that's my position on that. I myself am AFAB, if that's important to you.

Another important thing is that you are in the same age range as me, 18-22. If you're 23-25, then *maybe*, but it's more unlikely especially the older you are.

Aside from that! If you just want friendship, then I generally don't care who or what you are so long as you aren't an awful person and consider yourself female or aligned with womanhood. It would also be extremely nice if we shared the same interests.

Thank you for reading my post, and I hope I may get to meet some lovely women :)",q4q
Looking for mutual play in worcester ma,"I am a 30 y/o wm who is curious and is looking for some mutual play. I am 5'8"" 190 lb, and a 6.5"" cut cock. I can host, PM me for more.",q4q
31 [M4A] Curious guy wants long term dirty penpal,"Hi q4q!

So, I'm in the UK and looking for someone to basically be a naughty, flirty penpal with - by email etc, sharing stories, doing some roleplay, chatting about ourselves and fantasies, sharing pics. I'd be up for swapping numbers too for some flirty texts :)

I'm 31, bi-curious, medium build. I've always been in to trans women, either real or futa. I'm pretty oral obsessed, and I love cumplay. More and more frequently I'm getting the feeling that I want to try being with a guy and being the target of the cumplay instead, and I quite often masturbate to cum on my own face or eat my cum after a session.

Anyways, I guess I'm looking for a friendly  gay or bi man, or a trans girl who would be happy to be my teacher and let me explore and worship their cock :)",q4q
"21[M4T] Long Island, NY- Young, inexperienced, looking for someone","Hey there, I'm a white male from Long island, New York, looking for a trans woman, who would be okay taking me under her wing. 

I know some people could see this request as ignorant or offensive, but this isn't some fetish I have. My sexuality is a weird thing, I love cock, balls, and cum, but I'm not very attracted to the male body. Something about the female body is just beautiful to me. That's why I'm putting this out there. 

A couple of things about me, I'm fat, not super attractive (at least I don't think so), and have a smaller cock. I'm more submissive, so personally I'd love giving head, eating ass, and even getting fucked. I wouldn't say no to getting head either, but it's not necessary. 

I also love the idea of worshipping your body, whatever part of you you'd like worshipped. If you want to be cruel, I'm fine with being humiliated or degraded, force to do things for your pleasure. 

I haven't been able to test myself much, but I think I'm a pretty kinky dude, so if there are things you like, I'd probably be open to trying them. 

Unfortunately I can't host, but I'm willing to travel. If you're interested, please respond!",q4q
Wisconsin,"northern wisconsin here, anyone near",q4q
Anyone in Oregon?,,q4q
"23 [M4M] NY Near, far. Wherever you are? :)","Hello Reddit. Im a 23 yr old black male in search of a good guy to converse with and develop an honest and genuine relationship. While my aspirations may seem of a fairytale nature or above the clouds, Im still a believer in the concept of true love. The reality is sometimes the setting of an online relationship can be less than ideal and there seem to be no incentive for people to be committed when they can just ghost you in a matter of seconds. However, why not take the chance despite the many road bumps? Why not indulge in the wonder of finding the one person you can wake up to for the rest of your life. Whats so wrong in believing in a little starstrucked magic. Theres nothing wrong with it. I guess what im trying to say is that I know there's a great guy out there for me. Someone with a love so pure and hungry that its dying for direct connection. Wherever you are hiding, here i am!

",q4q
27 [M4M] Bi guy looking for Skype guys,"Looking for guys who wanna log on and get off. I'm masc, proportional, and hung.

Hairy, muscular, and or submissive are big pluses. PM me and we can swap usernames. 

Edit: Fuck it. If you think you for the bill, add me: sierravvvv@gmail.com. Send a pic and we'll sort it out. ",q4q
m4m nashville area,33Yo dad looking for a cool guy to cum with. Jakemanload@yahoo.com,q4q
26 masc but transcurious looking to have fun with a friendly transguy or queer girl :) nyc or online,"There is something so indescribably relief inducing to talk to somebody who just GETS it. That moment of realizing that you can actually let your guard down for a moment and that the other person isn’t just not judging, or accepting, or thinking it’s interesting, but actually has the exact same type of feelings that we usually have to bottle up and hide. It’s almost unbelievable and you have to keep checking in ‘you really feel that way too?!’

And that parts nice. But then it gets really hot also. Sharing such rare and intimate feelings with another person creates such a fast and strong connection. And understanding each other gives more insight into the other person’s way of thinking than most partners develop in a long time. Just being excited about the other person getting to be themselves is amazing.

Which all just makes it even better when we give in and jump each other already. Smashing gender roles, norms, conformity and gender itself in one hot sweaty act of total physical and mental satisfaction. I mean, if you wanna.

But really, we can chat about regular things. About trans feelings, something I’m super anxious about but feel amazing getting to actually talk about with somebody who gets it. Or we can role play! Swapping private parts, genie wish gone right, freaky Friday deal etc... Or just sext each other silly.

I’m looking to talk to trans guys or trans/ queer questioning girls. For some reason you all just make me feel way more comfortable. Not really looking to talk to other trans girls or cis guys - no offense, it just makes me really anxious to talk about this stuff with you for some reason.

Anyway, hit me up!",q4q
"[M4Q] Moved to northern alabama from OR, looking for like minded people","Looking to chat, maybe something more",q4q
"[F204F] anybody near Pittsburgh, PA",I can never seem to find any girls who wanna experiment and do stuff. I’m in butler county for the weekend. I love in meadville.,q4q
"31 [M4Q] looking for fun with a cute boi, ftm, nb....","6ft, hairy, big and strong pan cis-guy from out of state and spontaneously exploring the front range area for a couple days.  I figure if I'm going to have an adventure it might as well be a sexual one too ;)

I have a strong attraction to androgyny, bois, ftm, non-binary afab's, hyper-feminine mtf people and all the similar and wonderful people on that part of the spectrum.  Especially anyone rocking a punkish, hippie, or raver look ;)

IJust looking for someone that has a few hours to chat, make out, fool around and well ya know ;)

Since people often ask, I've been with several trans people and know we need to discuss boundaries around front holes, dangly bits, and chests.

Send me your stats, Kik, pictures, wants or whatever you think is relevant.

Oh, and I'm kinky af",q4q
"31 [M4M] Wayne, PA. Giving massage.",I’d love to give a full body massage to someone. I cannot host. I am not a professional. Just like giving massages! Please let me know if you are interested. ,q4q
"21 [M4M] Long Island, New York- Looking to lose anal virginity, maybe more","Hello there, I'm a fairly inexperienced bi male, looking for someone, or even a few guys, to take my anal virginity. I'm also happy to please you in other ways, and I'm pretty kink friendly. 

I'm not too worried about looks or things like that, I just want someone sane, clean, and looking for some fun.

I live in Suffolk, near Port Jeff, but willing to travel. Cannot host",q4q
"22 [F4Q] NE Ohio, just looking for a datemate","I’m 22, AFAB Pansexual Demigirl, in NE Ohio. I like sewing, Stardew Valley, Minecraft, Animal Crossing, and animals. Looking for someone queer (ladies, gentlemen, NB friends, gender doesn’t much matter to me, personality does). Fair warning, I’m plus size so don’t come at me expecting a skinny girl. Pm me if you’re willing to chat over Skype (preferred) or discord. ",q4q
19 [F4F] Central NC - College student looking for friends or more!,"Hey Reddit! My name's Eva and I'm a 19 year old university student. I love learning and creativity, and I'm majoring in math. I'm really nature and all things that involve it, like swimming, hiking, kayaking, climbing, stargazing.. but I also love chilling inside and having good conversation, watching a good movie, or having a drink. 

Right now I'm recovering from SRS (I'm post-op transgender), so I'm mostly bedridden and can only go for extremely short walks. It'd be nice to have more people to talk to.

I'm looking for friends and possibly more, if you're near enough. I'm really up for whatever.

Message me! If we click, let's exchange snaps or discord 😁",q4q
"22 M, CO, Colorado springs or fountain","Lookin for a hot guy to fuck my ass, maybe get a little kinky.",q4q
Interesting,"Msg me.. i lik3 discretion
",q4q
"41 [F4F] PDX, Queer poly masc type seeks smart, feisty femme to make each other laugh til we hurt!","Life is too short to be content with boredom; I need someone to join me in shaking  things up! While I'm looking for people to have experiences with, and would be content to simply make new friends, I am hoping for more. I want to feel that zing when we kiss. I want to make you swoon. I want our bodies to hum when we touch... All the good stuff!

Let's make adventures together. We can hike and camp, swim and beachcomb... Hell, we can even hunt and fish and practice outdoor skills together, if that's your thing! Let's go on a picnic in the park, where we enjoy a sumptuous bottle of wine and tell each other our most risqué fantasies; I bet I can make you blush. Let's play frisbee while we're there, and talk about tantalizing topics. Or... Would you like to snuggle up together beside an outdoor fire at night and whisper while we stargaze? Would you like to laze about on a sunny day in the shade in a hammock capacious enough for the two of us, if we squeeze in just right? Let's do all of those things, and more! What is your fondest desire / perfect date / mini-adventure?

I confess, I am a little old school - the internet is wonderful for some things, but I don't want to let it stunt me. Besides, ya gotta meet someone before you adventure with them! So, sure, let's chat and exchange all the requisite details. And then, let's grab a drink. Or a dessert. Or a picnic basket! If the chemistry is right, there are many even more exciting endeavors we will pursue. And I guarantee that you will have a marvelous time!

About me: I am old enough to have had some life experience and accumulate a little knowledge, but young enough to still make mistakes and put my foot in my mouth once in a while. I've got a silly, mischievous side to complement my serious curmudgeonly side. That 'Get off my lawn!' mood is real, y'all.

My carriage and demeanor are slightly masculine of center, but my body is curvy and ample (thick hourglass figure). I am polyamorous, and an above board communicator. I am kinky, and we can certainly talk more about that, if you’re of a mind to, but it’s not a deal breaker if that’s just not your thing. I am kind of a nerd, but I'm a nerd with exceedingly eclectic taste.

I am usually drawn to feminine energy and aesthetic expression. I don't necessarily want or need someone who is a high femme, but butch / boi energy usually does nothing for me sexually. Thick or thin, tall or small, bodacious tatas or member of IBTC, sundress or shorts, high heels or pajamas, I am into all of that! Your skin color is not a draw or a drawback, I love all the colors in the box (though, if you have managed to be paler than I am, I may make a little fun of you). What else? Message me and let's find out! Ooh, please be a non-smoker. ",q4q
"31 [F4R] CHICAGO,IL-Quirky, artsy girl ISO a summer fling","Hi! I'm looking for a fling this summer that could turn out to be long-term. I'm polyamorous so other polyam ppl would be preferable, but if you're mono, that's cool, too. I'm looking for someone who is nerdy and/or a musicians and/or a visual artist and who wants to save the world, like me. Someone who is an advocate of LGBTQ+ or supports the community. Someone I can vibe with. Someone I can trust. Who is gentle and compassionate. And non-judgemental. 
other musicians and visual artists.
I'm quirky, artistic, alternative, feminist and inclusive! I'm an ambivert, as I can be social when I'm not quiet, out and about. I'm romantic, free-spirited, cute, curious about the world and its workings and I love to pick ppl's brains. I enjoy going out, (especially going downtown) and exploring the beach. 420 friendly and a social drinker. My hobbies include drawing, painting, writing, reading and a little music. PM me if I sound like someone that you could be interested in! Have a nice holiday!",q4q
M4A inland empire blowjob,Looking for a blowjob never done anything with a guy but I’m willing to try,q4q
"35 [M4M] Columbus, Ohio - horny af",Hit me up. PMs welcome. I have pics and I can always snap more. ,q4q
24 [M4M] looking phone sex,"Hey, I’m a 24 year old feminine sounding twink looking for a masc sounding older guy 40+ to have some phone fun with, anyone interested hit me up ☺️ 07549870420 ",q4q
26 [FtM4M] Reno Keep Me Company on my Work Trip?,Going to be in Reno a couple days. ,q4q
28 [M4M] Minnesota Looking for hung bulls to fuck my tight ass by the lake,"I've been expressing my discontent for sometime now with the lack of hung bulls in my area. I'm looking for a hung bull preferably within the age of 25-50, 7.5 inches+, preferably around 5 foot 6 inches tall and not too dark skinned. I'm a young stud, in pretty good shape, with a tight ass. I'm a dedicated, submissive bottom just waiting for the right cock to show me a good time. I love running around, spamming assfuck on cooldown, it's a fun game and I'm a god at that matchup. If you can resonate with that, send me a PM with your details and we can meet up by the lake.",q4q
"21 [F4R] Toronto, Canada - looking to make some new LGBT+ friends :)","Hey everyone! I'm a recent University graduate living in Toronto, and I am in serious need of some LGBT+ friends! I'm into video games, cute puppies, pretty women, and being lazy. I'm open to anyone messaging me, so hit me up if you want to chat :)",q4q
31 [q4q] AFAB genderqueer/nonbinary seeking queer male or genderqueer AMAB,"I'm a tomboy femme-presenting, mostly gender-neutral feeling person primarily attracted to guys or male-assigned individuals who are fem, effeminate, genderqueer, genderfluid, etc. 
It's hard to find y'all where I am, so I would love to make friends or a long-distance datefriend.

I'm a progressive/socialist/intersectional feminist; a failed academic in the humanities/area studies trying to find something new to do with my life; love art, books, film, and comics (especially cult and underground stuff), exploring and discussing new ideas; fascinated with getting to know others' way of being and experiencing the world; sexual, sex-positive, dominant/switch, and kink-friendly; highly prioritize friendship. A ton of other stuff. You can't sum up a person in a paragraph. Get to know me. ;)",q4q
He,2678319544im here text me  44 in upper darby off long lane want to come over now,q4q
25 m4m Looking for a quick chat/play/cum session... I’m horny and seem to cum much harder when on the phone with someone listening (or preferably participating). 918.520.4054,,q4q
q4Q 26 - tentative transgirl looking to chat and explore with a friendly transguy or genderqueer gal,"There is something so indescribably relief inducing to talk to somebody who just GETS it. That moment of realizing that you can actually let your guard down for a moment and that the other person isn’t just not judging, or accepting, or thinking it’s interesting, but actually has the exact same type of feelings that we usually have to bottle up and hide. It’s almost unbelievable and you have to keep checking in ‘you really feel that way too?!’

And that parts nice. But then it gets really hot also. Sharing such rare and intimate feelings with another person creates such a fast and strong connection. And understanding each other gives more insight into the other person’s way of thinking than most partners develop in a long time. Just being excited about the other person getting to be themselves is amazing. 

Which all just makes it even better when we give in and jump each other already. Smashing gender roles, norms, conformity and gender itself in one hot sweaty act of total physical and mental satisfaction. I mean, if you wanna. 

But really, we can chat about regular things. About trans feelings, something I’m super anxious about but feel amazing getting to actually talk about with somebody who gets it. Or we can role play! Swapping private parts, genie wish gone right, freaky Friday deal etc... Or just sext each other silly. 

I’m looking to talk to trans guys or trans/ queer questioning girls. For some reason you all just make me feel way more comfortable. Not really looking to talk to other trans girls or cis guys - no offense, it just makes me really anxious to talk about this stuff with you for some reason. 

Anyway, hit me up! 

 ",q4q
33/29 [MF4F/FM] #SoCal/OC - Nerdy couple seeking like-minded poly locals,"We are an engaged couple looking to meet local women or couples who would be interested in dating a couple. Prefer people aged 21+ but we are otherwise open to meeting all kinds of people. Must be okay with kids as we have some. Fellow laid back nerds are our kind of people.

About him: 6'4"", white, average build, dark brown shoulder length hair, beard, hazel eyes and glasses. He is into various genres and mediums of geekdom(sci-fi/fantasy/superhero, movies, books, video games, board games, RPGs etc.) and has returned to school to study computer science and math. INTP if you are into Myers-Briggs personality types.

About her: 5'7"", black, full figured, glasses, she is a nerdy hippie who equally loves to curl up at home with a good book or go camping in the woods. She is returning to school herself in the fall for film studies. INFP.

If you would be interested in getting to know us, send us a PM. We both have kik for further chatting as well.",q4q
34 (MtF) [T4T] (FtM) Eastern PA,"Looking to date with the intention of finding a relationship.  It really doesn't matter to me where you are in the transition process. Myself its been done &amp; in the past for quite some time. Live in stealth, not really sure what else to say about that stuff?

Anywho--- I like history, documentaries, nonfiction books, cuddling, trying new places to eat, ANR (but its not important).

Age isn't a big deal to me. 

So, if any of that sounds interesting you could message me or something.",q4q
[m4m] looking for some fun send me some pics,Im a traveling salesman trying to some good dick when i am out and about. Show me what you working with. 7573901762. I cant take calls during the day but text me ,q4q
"31 [F4F]CHICAGO-Quirky, artsy queer ISO other artsy/musical queers in open relationships","Hi! 
I'm looking or potential poly partners that are either artsy and/or musician types, as I am artsy and musical myself.
I don't believe in hierarchies. Not my thing. 
Exclusively looking for someone in Chicago. I'm not into doing long-distance, sorry.
I'm looking for someone nerdy and who wants to save the world, like me. 
Someone I can talk to anytime, when I'm down, who will listen. 
Someone compassionate and kind and non-judgemental. 
I'm a fun femme/futch into other femmes. Preferably alternative and spiritual types. 
I'm quirky, artistic, alternative, feminist and inclusive! 
I'm an ambivert, as I can be social when I'm not quiet, out and about.
I'm romantic, free-spirited, cute, curious about the world and its workings and I love to pick ppl's brains. 
I enjoy going out, (especially going downtown) and exploring the beach. 
420 friendly and a social drinker. My wardrobe is a mix of colors and dark. Mostly dark, lol. 
I also like kissing and cuddling, lol. I think I'm a switch.
My hobbies include drawing, painting, writing, reading and a little music. 
PM me if I sound like someone that you could be interested in!
Have a nice day!",q4q
24 [m4r] looking to make new friends,"I’m terrible making friends in person so why not the internet :p. I’m 24, male , bisexual and looking to make some lgbt friends. Message me if you wanna chat",q4q
"23 [F4R] Looking for friends to go to LGBT venues with in London, United Kingdom!",,q4q
23/GQ Poly/SoSoCal Mostly looking for chill chat buddies?,"Yo! Feel free to call me Max or Ro, no real preference on that. He/Him They/Them only, thanks. I'm in SoSoCal and hoping to find some chillax pals to text or chat with. I have discord and mainly use that but I can deal w kik or skype just as easily, I guess? Up to you. I'm into music, reading, learning recipes, and YouTube. I'm a filthy fuckin' casual when it comes to video games but I'll crush someone at Headbandz or CAH. I'm a lazy, spoiled, entitled millennial and gross, annoying 90s kid so do with that what you will. I'm engaged, a Leo, and an INFJ in case those are important to your vibe matching. IMPORTANT: If you think reverse racism is a legit thing, or if you don't understand the concept of Intersectional Feminism, or if you support the institutionalized classism of most of the modern world, then please please don't message me. Thanks. ",q4q
"Recently accepted im Bi, guys are really sexy. Looking for kinky chats and real bond building.","Im 25, london, fit and good looing. Lets skype :)",q4q
19M4A Australia,"Hello my name is Angus, I live in Australia. I study sport and exercise science a university. I love it. I am looking for love but I don't mind friends either. 

My interests include sport (AFL and many more), TV shows (GoT, Marvel series, DC series, Rick and Morty, 24, Designated survivor, the resident, Chicago trilogy and Nashville ), Movies, memes, dogs, hanging out with friends listening to music (a wide range) and travel. I would like to say that I'm an extrovert but I think I'm in the middle of the spectrum.

I do have cerebral palsy which does affect my life but not that much. I am also bi (life has dealt me some great cards).

I have Snapchat, Facebook Kik so just ask. 

Thanks, for reading hope I can hear from you soon. ",q4q
M4M - 23 - Spain,"Hi all!

I’m a 23yo gay male from the capital of Spain. I’m currently looking to meet new people/possible dates since I’m pretty much a guy who stays at home and when all my friends are out I don’t have many people to talk to...

My main hobbies are:

-Music: I listen to a fucking lot of stuff, from the deepest of Spanish indie music to the more mainstream pop

-Reading: I’ve been a bookworm since I was 3 and I’m also looking for recommendations. BPD and ADHD make it hard to read but I am struggling to get back to the old habit of reading before bed.

-Travelling: I’m an avid traveler. I have been to some places in Europe and the US but would like to dramatically make that list grow ;)

-Technology: I work on the field and I’m a complete nerd.

Also, I really like tv shows, and things like Star Wars.

Please feel free to PM me so we can talk further :)",q4q
21 [M4M] - Online Dom,"Hi.

I really would love an online dominant man. Please message if that sounds like your cup of tea. :)

Thanks.",q4q
28 [m4m] seeking phone sex bud,Looking for a masc sounding guy 20- 45 into phone roleplay and phonesex. Would prefer doing it over WhatsApp but open to other social media too. HMU if you’re interested ,q4q
q4Q - tentative transgirl looking to explore my real self with a queer girl or transguy,"There is something so indescribably relief inducing to talk to somebody who just GETS it. That moment of realizing that you can actually let your guard down for a moment and that the other person isn’t just not judging, or accepting, or thinking it’s interesting, but actually has the exact same type of feelings that we usually have to bottle up and hide. It’s almost unbelievable and you have to keep checking in ‘you really feel that way too?!’

And that parts nice. But then it gets really hot also. Sharing such rare and intimate feelings with another person creates such a fast and strong connection. And understanding each other gives more insight into the other person’s way of thinking than most partners develop in a long time. Just being excited about the other person getting to be themselves is amazing. 

Which all just makes it even better when we give in and jump each other already. Smashing gender roles, norms, conformity and gender itself in one hot sweaty act of total physical and mental satisfaction. I mean, if you wanna. 

But really, we can chat about regular things. About trans feelings, something I’m super anxious about but feel amazing getting to actually talk about with somebody who gets it. Or we can role play! Swapping private parts, genie wish gone right, freaky Friday deal etc... Or just sext each other silly. 

I’m looking to talk to trans guys or trans/ queer questioning girls. For some reason you all just make me feel way more comfortable. Not really looking to talk to other trans girls or cis guys - no offense, it just makes me really anxious to talk about this stuff with you for some reason. 

Anyway, hit me up! 

 ",q4q
M4M 22 Gay male in Florida looking for an OLDER MALE Phone sex partner [NSFW],"I'm 22 years old. tall and skinny, tanned skinned and i'm looking for an older phone sex partner who loves preforming oral sex on men but who doesn't want reciprocation. 


There's certain things that I love hearing a man say that arouse me. and I also love it when a man talks in a medical/scientific vocabulary about preforming oral sex on a man and who is very knowledgeable about the male sexual anatomy. 


I have lots of pictures too, but i'm only interested in seeing close up pictures of your mouth. I want a man to keep in touch with regularly. If you're interested, hit me up.
",q4q
21 F4F Ohio for a girlfriend,"I’m pansexual and looking for someone near enough to me to actually have a relationship. I’m open to polyamorous relationships (with lots of communication!) and I’m bad at flirting. Hmu if you identify as a woman, I want a girlfriend! &lt;3",q4q
28 F4F London. Nerdy water gypsie looking for a +1,"Hey! 

I’m a big gamer and very much into my sci-fi space genres be it games, movies or tv, I live in a narrowboat floating around the Kingston/Hampton court area of London and I would love some more nerdy girlfriends be it romantic or platonic. I work long hours that doesn’t get me a lot of social time and even then big crowds make me uncomfortable. Hopefully this will produce something nice :)",q4q
23 F4F - SF Bay Area,"Looking for a fwb in the Bay Area.

Me - 23F, fit/athletic body type, white, STD free. I’d consider my personal style chapstick/tomboyish, but I’m still fairly feminine with long hair etc

You - 18-30F, in decent shape, femme, STD free",q4q
23 F4F - Michigan,"Hey ladies! I'm very new to all this. I'm currently looking for some girly friends online (maybe more!) 

A little about me: currently working as a bartender. I looovee taking walks, working out. My fave music is EDM, hip hop, and r&amp;b. 
I'm thick, with big breasts and thick thighs 🤤 

I'm looking for: any cute ladies to chat with! I have tried everything and can't seem to get anywhere! 

I hope to hear from some of the beautiful ladies I hear about on here! 😘 

P.S i am willing to exchange pics",q4q
22f Chicago looking for a girl to be my fwb,"Hey! I’m a chubby, but very cute girl looking for a feminine girl to hang out with. Message me! ",q4q
[M4M] Wanting a FWB,"I want someone nearby (I'm in Salem, Oregon) that I can experiment with. I am a bi bear, learning about my man-loving side. I'm new at this, so I need some help.

I'm 30, and I like younger. I also like fem and twink.

EDIT: Location ",q4q
"33/M4M/NY, USA Looking for online pen pal.","Hi all. I just joined here, and I'm looking for some people to chat with. I don't have many LGBT friends, and living in a rural area, it's not always easy to find them. So I thought I'd give this a try.

I'm willing to write about anything. My hobbies are rather typical. I like reading, going on day trips, etc. I'm a foreign language nerd, and am trying to decide what to learn next. I have a lot of interests, though, and want to learn as much as I can about virtually anything.

Right now, I'm only interested in being pen pals. I'm not looking for dates or a relationship. If you just want to have someone to write to, bounce ideas off of, etc. feel free to send me a PM!",q4q
28/post-op TF 4 F or TF/Seattle,"Hey girls. I'm a 28 year woman who recently had her SRS so I'm still a little sore. I'm currently in a poly-open relationship with 2 partners. I'm looking for friends who are down for hanging out at bars (preferably cap hill) or cuddling..... becoming good enough friends to the point we could be FWBs. 

if you wanna know more about me, I'm a gamer/nerd. I currently work as a security guard for Microsoft in Redmond. My main reddit account is /u/heroofdarkness , but the one I'm posting from is where I keep all my nsfw reddits and posts. ;)

PM me if you wanna talk more. &lt;3",q4q
24 M4M looking for other gay men to chat and flirt with,If you're interested message me ! I'm into fem guys and muscle jocks. HMU ,q4q
[r 4 r] seeking gender fluid/nonbinary friends and dates,"Hello! I'm a masculine or neutral-leaning queer female (fluid and sometimes identify as nonbinary) looking to chat with other nonbinary/genderfluid/ gender non-conforming people and make friends. I'm also looking for a feminine AMAB or fem guy to date. I enjoy being chivalrous/ gentlemanly in relationships, although it need not have that dynamic. I am progressive, feminist, and socialist-leaning and prefer the same in a partner or friend.

Look forward to hearing from some cool folks!",q4q
24 M4M looking for a feminine man to chat with,Message me if you're interested. Please be over 18 yo.,q4q
24 M4M / bi guy looking to chat with other gay or bi men,I'm a bi guy who recently came to terms with his sexuality. I'm into feminine guys but I don't mind talking to anyone . I'm looking to network and make friends. ,q4q
17/m4m/Serbia,"So here it goes, i might have had the worst day yet today. And it just tore me apart. Ive gotten so lonely and its really gotten to a point where im not ok with it. I would love to at least talk to somebody. Idk what else people write. So if youre up for a talk, hit me up? Im not even sure if theres a private chat on reddit. Oh yeah btw this is my first post because im hesitant about everything. I started writing my interests and i realized i sound basic af so im avoiding it. 

Thanks",q4q
20/F/w4w,"I’m 20 and have never done anything with a girl but I really want to. I live in PA north of Pittsburgh, south of Erie. My name is Rachel btw :)",q4q
[20//F//Canada] Bi Gal Looking for online friends or more,"Hi there!!!! I'm a 20 y/o bi female who just hasn't had a lot of time to talk to people or explore a large part of myself. Currently I'd just love to have some people to talk too throughout the days&amp;nights regardless of where things go.

I'm not against IRL meetings but I live in literally the middle of nowhere so I don't think that'd be a good thing to expect.

As a person I'm into drawing, music, reading, anime, and board games! So feel free to talk about anything really. ",q4q
[28] [M] [NYC] Bi guy looking for discreet fun or just kik chat.,"anyone under 40 or any type, as long as your in NYC!",q4q
37 [M4M] Bi NC here,Bi M looking for guys for discreet fun or just to chat.  Charlotte area here.,q4q
Slsl,,q4q
31 [M4M] London - Blowjob buddy,"I like sucking cock. 

I'm looking for someone who is clean and in shape, who likes to be sucked. I can suck your dick on a regular basis. No frills or strings attached. Other activities are optional. 

Let's trade pics on Kik and then meet up! ",q4q
[T4R] Gurl’s club?,"So, not sure where to actually post this, but I figured this could be a good place to start. 

I live in Indiana (yay Bible Belt 😝) and while I’ve found a couple of actual support groups (I’m planning on checking them out starting Jan) I was wondering if there’d be interest from any other locals that would want to have get together gurl’s night style. Try in different outfits together, have some wine, share grooming/ makeup tips/ tricks/ etc., and just hang out in general as your comfortable self (whatever that means to you). Not exclusively thinking just other trans folks, but please be respectful and not creepy? 

Not sure if I’ve described what I’m hopeful to start or find here, but if you have ideas/ suggestions, hit me up. Or if there’s a better subreddit to post this to, please point me in the right direction ^_^ 

Hugs and love to you all ",q4q
[21] T4R -The Netherlands- Slightly autistic MtF would like to not be lonely anymore thanks,"This is basicly a repost of my post on vanilla r4r, which led to nowhere since that place is 90% 'Murican.
So yeah, erm, I am a 21 Y/O transgirl living in Gelderland and studying in Utrecht, I am not on hormones yet but am getting close to my intake, am bi, am weeb, go to gym and there goes my grammar skills, damn you dyslexia.
I am mainly looking for someone who accepts and respects me whilst also living close enough to me so we can actually do stuff, i kinda need to go shopping for new clothes with someone for example...
So ya i hope that wasn't either too little or too much info, If you have any questions feel free to ask, and to all non-dutchies reading in, erm sorry, no.",q4q
18 (M4A) - NC,"Curious about traps &amp; transgenders honestly... (;
Cis male looking for someone to introduce me to something new.. :*",q4q
"5'1"" beefcake looking for something dark","5122070781
pics first plz",q4q
28 [TW4M] Seattle area pls read must be open minded,"So I'm a trans woman but I am still more guy than woman (I have some facial hair and short hair stuff like that) due to not being able to come out yet, but I have been on hormones for more than a year so I have boobs so I don't know where I fall honestly anyway I'm looking for an open minded guy for my first time yes I never been with a guy but always been into men (it's a complicated and long story lol). Maybe if we hit off we can be fwb or something I'm not looking for a relationship right now.About me I'm kind of short average body type nothing to special tbh I'm not one of those awesome beautiful trans woman that you see I'm really average lol. If  my awesome description caught your attention lol and you are interested pm me and I'll get back to you :).",q4q
26 [R4R] Discord server - Queer friends &amp; Dating 18+,"I've created a Discord server for queer/lgbt people for friends &amp; dating as I'm tired of not seeing any dating spaces aimed at the queer/lgbt commmunity.

Check us out if you're interested and see for yourself :D

https://discord.gg/KbJdQme

(You must be 18+)",q4q
27y single chubby guy from Portugal,"looking for friends all over the world, be my guest to pm me :) please, no perverts, not into hook ups.",q4q
29 [m4m] Atlanta,"Hey anyone want to chat/hangout? 29m here, laid back professional guy",q4q
"32 [T4R] Denver, CO - Queer trans sub looking for play partner","I'm a 32yo queer af transfemme looking to add some kink to my life. I am connection, communication, and consent focused.

About me: I was AMAB, but have been on hrt for almost a decade. No surgeries, I have boobs and a dick. I tend towards female pronouns, but do not demand them, and am flexible in my identity and presentation. I am overweight, but I do stay active, whilst always trying to better myself. I have tattoos and piercings. I'm a pretty big nerd, and love all sorts of stuff from table top games, to video games, to cool rocks and insects. Gardening and plants in general are probably my biggest hobby. Also love camping, roller derby, cooking, climbing, hiking, and all sorts of other stuff.

I am very strictly a relationship anarchist, or for the sake of simplicity; poly. I live with a wonderful partner. I prefer you meet when its appropriate, and hopefully get along.

Kink wise I am a switch, but extremely submissive leaning. Would prefer to find a Top/Dom(me) partner, but I am somewhat flexible. I have a wide range of kinks, from mild to extreme, but love things such as training, pain, humiliation, degradation, protocol, etc. I am very responsive, and I would imagine a lot of fun to beat. I play with safe words, but have few limits. Of primary importance to me is creativity, having fun, and getting to explore some intimate and vulnerable places.

I am also above all things a people-pleaser, and enjoy learning and facilitating the kinks of others. I am very service oriented, capable of doing oh so many useful things, and will return many times any energy you bless me with, one way or another. I do not want to bottom from the top, I am not a gimme sub.

I have no interest in engaging people without some sort of connection. The easiest way to ensure I feel no connection is to be poor conversationalist and generally failing to spark anything in me at all.

Thanks for reading!",q4q
[mm4m] two guys in pa looking for other guys to chill or play video games with,"32 y/o pansexual male and 21 y/o gay male looking for any guys 21 to 35 of any sexuality (gay/bi/pan etc) who are looking for new friends to chill, chat and play video games with. we are looking for someone in the harrisburg,pa area, if this is you pm me and maybe we can set something up!",q4q
18 [r4r] anywhere - looking for someone to talk,"hiii! my name's jay and i'm a human. i'm interested in languages, drawing, writing and music: i also really like watching youtube and tv shows. PM me if you're interested!",q4q
"21 [M4M] Hairy Bear Bottom Looking for FWB in Springfield, MO","Hairy chub bottom looking for long term fwbs in Springfield and surrounding area for playdates. We can chat online a bit and send pictures and see where it goes from there. I'm not too hung up on looks or age, but I do ask that you be respectful of me and I'll be more than respectful of you. 

That said, I enjoy hanging around the house naked, and I have a tight ass that needs to be used. Looking to hear from you!",q4q
"29 [M4M/T] Nerdy Top Searching In Fort Worth, TX","29 year old lanky black grad student in the Hulen area of Fort Worth looking for fellow gamers, movie buffs, book lovers etc. to hang out and fool around with. Looking for cute guys, crossdressers/sissies, transwomen in the Ft Worth area. If you're interested in chatting and getting to know each other, send a PM or message me on KIK @ target.man ",q4q
"30 [F4F] Nerdy, gothic femme looking for the same","I'm currently single at this time and I'm looking for a fulfilling, long-term relationship full of everything mutual and a fulfilling, relationship with a lovely alternative woman.

NO MEN! That part of my life is pretty much bupkes! Sorry! -^
I want open communication. Someone I can text with and looking for someone in the Chicago area, uptown and downtown!

Looking to hang out of course while getting to know her.
About me: 30, 5'11, quirky, artistic, femme, alternative (goth/emo styles), feeling dominant these days, (Not BDSM-related dominance but dominant in general), romantic, free-spirited, cute, curious about the world and its workings and love to pick brains! &lt;3

Trans women and non-binary/genderqueer femme/female aligned ppl welcome!

Poly women welcome as well!

I'm quite queer and I find being queer fun and exciting! Feel free to message me! =)

If you have KIK, leave your KIK username when replying!",q4q
26 for CD or Sissy,I'm looking for a CD or sissy for fun...maybe more if I meet the right person. If you wanna get to know me send me a message.,q4q
NYC Couple Seeks Man (Pic),,q4q
40s NYC Couple seeks Man,"Hi Reddit Land!

We are both new to reddit and hoping to make a great connection or two.  We are a  professional, progressive, clean, healthy couple looking for good men to have on going fun in and out of the bedroom.

We are both slim and fit and have busy, active lives. We are drug and disease free. We are the discreet, sweet wholesome couple next door - 
that happens to enjoy 3somes.

We prefer men who are similar - 40-50ish, fit, drug and disease free, as well as kind, intelligent, healthy, progressive, and honest. In short, we are looking for great guys who whose company we enjoy in and out of the bedroom.

We are open, but fairly vanilla in the bedroom - joy and pleasure for all is what we are mostly after. She is straight. He is bi. Ideally you are bi as well.  We prefer the MMF variety of threesome but are also down with MFM.

Out of the bedroom we enjoy live music, the beach, and great food.

If you think we would be a match, please respond articulately and with a picture or two.

",q4q
Sucking a huge dick,I like and want to Suck your dick.,q4q
30 [M4M/T] Looking for the right partner in Hove/Brighton UK,"Well, it's what the title says really. 😛 I don't care if my partner would be male, trans or any non binary, but I'd prefer them to be feminine and younger. That's about it, if we otherwise hit it off then I am happy to chat. 😊


So you know a little about me from the start tho. I am a geek, I love reading and music. I will read anything that catches my attention and same with music. I have a few shows that I do watch, Game of Thrones and Rick and Morty first and foremost. I live in Hove but I'm originally from Iceland.

Let's chat. Maybe we can plan a meet up. 😉 Add my on snap with my username or on kik by adding 2 to it. 😊",q4q
[M4M] looking for bi friends in Copenhagen.,Or even Europe in general. I'm mostly looking to just talk to people.,q4q
19[m4m]SC- Looking for a real Dom online,"Hi, I'm new to both BDSM and dudes (jacked off a bunch to huge cocks tho). What I want is a serious dom who will respect my needs as a sub...as well as take what is rightfully his anyway he sees fit to. I can't get a lot of free time so I would like this to be over the internet and mostly in daily tasks with some real sessions when I can. I would like for this to be a long term thing. a kind of FWB online. I will do most of what you say, including, but not limited to: spanking, light CBT, chastity, bondage, eating cum of surfaces you should and shouldn't eat off of, foot stuff, some humiliating tasks, and getting ass blasted almost at will. I don't have toys and I won't get any to stay discrete, but i'm good at improv. PM if horny to abuse me. I'm so horny I feel like 10 dicks at once couldn't be enough. No Scat or blood",q4q
"I'm 37, gay and I've never dated. I'm going to SF this sept and I need advice on finding a husband.","I'm 37, gay, asian, darker skinned, no stds,effeminate and I've never dated. Any tips on how I should find a husband? I'm looking for specific tips or anecdotes. I know about which gay clubs to google and I know about the usual dating apps like grinder, scruff, okcupid, match, tinder, etc. Please give me advice about your experiences on these apps.

I would like specific advice on what to do to find a husband. If you know anyone from SF or if you're from Sf, then u can PM me. Telling me about the gay culture of SF will be really helpful. Thanks. I went thru a lot of awful things. I have only had sex twice and I went thru std scares. I have been sent death threats. I am from a homophobic city. I have been violently attacked by homophobes. I have never dated since I'm asian and a lot of gay guys have been racist to me and called me racial slurs. I am hoping that my vacation in SF is permanent and I find a husband there.

tl;dr I'm 37, gay and going to SF and I'd like advice on finding a husband.",q4q
[M4M] Sacramento Ca,18 yo college student here looking for a fwb type of   Meet. I'm 5'5 187lb bottom here if that matters. I'm also clean and disease free as should you. If you are interested message me. ,q4q
18 [F4F] Indianapolis area- masc lesbian for masc lesbian,"Looking for friendships &amp; possibly a relationship if we click. Must be within reasonable driving distance. Not into femmes for relationships, but friendships are welcome.

I'm 5'7"", 120 lbs, butch/boi, blonde, I love reading &amp; taking walks.

PM if interested.",q4q
25[m4R] - queer peeps! Let's Genderfuck each other until we forget our preferred pronouns! :),"Hey there. So, I really need people to chat with who want to tear down oppressive gender norms and roles as much as I do. Or, really, the whole concept of gender to begin with. Super sick of heteronormative bullshit, so help me fuck it up!

If you are a queer or curious woman, trans, or gender nonconforming individual, feel free to hit me up. If you are a cis man, hit me up only if you are also queer (e.g. bi, pan). I'm a LITTLE less interested in dudes just because I am already all too familiar with the perspective.

I'm a masculine presenting bi person, non-cis but not quite trans just because I have not transitioned at all and I don't want to claim a title that much braver people use.

We can roleplay or chat here, or we can chat on another medium, or even meet up if its right. Sometimes it just feels SO good to talk openly about it all with people.

I don't really know what to expect. But message me?",q4q
34 [m4m] Seattle-Portland,Bi and looking for some fun. Send me a PM. ,q4q
25 M4M White guy from Croatia looking for a black man,"Hello, 25 year old bi guy with an athletic body looking to meet a black man for a gay sex experience in Zagreb, Croatia. ",q4q
29 M4M - Michigan or ATL,"Hey anyone want to chat/hangout? 29m here, laid back professional guy",q4q
25[m4R] - queer peeps! Let's Genderfuck each other until we forget our preferred pronouns! :) Nyc or online,"Hey there. So, I really need people to chat with who want to tear down oppressive gender norms and roles as much as I do. Or, really, the whole concept of gender to begin with. Super sick of heteronormative bullshit, so help me fuck it up!

If you are a queer or curious woman, trans, or gender nonconforming individual, feel free to hit me up. If you are a cis man, hit me up only if you are also queer (e.g. bi, pan). I'm a LITTLE less interested in dudes just because I am already all too familiar with the perspective.

I'm a masculine presenting bi person, non-cis but not quite trans just because I have not transitioned at all and I don't want to claim a title that much braver people use.

We can roleplay or chat here, or we can chat on another medium, or even meet up if its right. Sometimes it just feels SO good to talk openly about it all with people.

I don't really know what to expect. But message me?",q4q
"21 [TM4M] North/Central NJ, Looking for Friends or More, Preference to Autistic or Trans People","I'm a pre-T autistic trans dude. I need more trans masc people in my life, and would love to meet other LGBT autistics. PM me if you're interested.",q4q
"19 [FtM4M] Charlotte, NC Area. Looking for Dates or More","Pm if interested, the title pretty much says it all. I'm almost two years on T and 2 and a half weeks post top surgery. ",q4q
"25 [M4M] Long Island, NY - mostly straight but like penis sometimes","Hey, I'm a bi guy looking for some sex with another man. Just a nsa fwb set up. I'm in Suffolk ",q4q
36 [F4F] Toronto BBW in (hamilton) looking for fun/friend,"Hello ladies I am a 36 year old married BBW looking for an ongoing play partner At times my husband may or may not be in same room with his bf we are very open couple I am 5'5 about 200 lbs I have 36 D chest and a shaved. My hair is multi colored, red with black tips I like it both rough and sensuous, it all depends on the mood We can text, pm here or KIK if ya want",q4q
38 [M4M] near toronto (hamilton) looking for friends and or FWB,"Hey guys 38 year old bi married guy here
5'7 bout 200 lbs
shaved head and goatee
pm me for my kik, lets chat",q4q
Bi Arabic Daddy looking for subs on kik,"Kik:dom.daddy42 Saudi hairy bear here, looking for skinny or fit subs to serve me as my personal cum dump
",q4q
20 Denver first time,"I'm a 20 yo fun bi guy just looking for a one time ""experiment"" im disease free and you should be too. My body type is slight chubby and hairy, and my preferred body type is slightly masculine femmes. If this sounds interesting then just PM me ",q4q
24 M4M London. Curious guy looking for his first gay experience,,q4q
[M4R] | Toronto Area | Part time CD seeks partner for occasional/ongoing.,"(Lots of pics/videos in my post history. Take a look, it's obviously NSFW) 

Hey everyone.

I'm a (generally) straight normal guy in the Toronto area who has recently started crossdressing and letting that side of me out. 

Because of this, I've also become sexually curious about other men,  cross dressers, and trans-women. 

I'm mostly inexperienced with men and trans-women,  having only experimented once before, but it was enough to know that this is something I  want. 

Im versatile,  but 100% okay with just being a bottom right now.  I like to cross dress and be feminine but there are also times when I don't want to do that and just want to remain masculine. I would like someone who's okay with both of those sides( although I'll probably always be wearing cute panties regardless ;p) 

I'm mostly attracted to feminine qualities,  so trans,  cd, and smooth fem boys are what turns me on, but I might be also interested in a normal dude if you're cool and don't just send me a cock pic. 

I'm 28, clean, ddf, hiv neg, and I live alone. 

I would prefer if you were also a little inexperienced, and looking to explore,  as well as not super aggressive if you're masculine. 

anyway,  feel free to Pm me. I like pics,  and have kik. ",q4q
18m looking for guy and girl orgy on Skype,My Skype is group chats,q4q
[NSFW] [T4W/T] Looking for fun in Rochester NY April 20-23,"Ill be in the Rochester area looking for some fun during Toracon, I am looking to treat a woman nicely and maybe be pegged by one too. PM me if you are interested.",q4q
Coming to San Francisco this week? Meet up?,"I'm going to be in SF on business and would love to meet up with someone for some fun. Really into meeting someone fem who likes older guys.  40s here, very passionate.  
Check my profile for some pics. Hope to hear from someone. ",q4q
24[F4F] | South FL Area | Searching for a Gal Pal!,"Thanks for viewing this post!  
I have a very hard time making friends in general but even more difficult to make lady friends with ladies similar to myself.  
I'm looking for an adventurous sort of gal that would love to try new things with me out in nature and be willing to hang out every weekend.  
  
To be brief, here are some of my interests and things I would prefer if my future gal friend would be into as well..  
-**Harry Potter**  
-**Adventure Time**  
-**Photography/Filming**  
-**Naturey**  
-**Metal Enthusiast**(or at least like some Death, Obituary, or Kreator)  
-**Cat Lady**  
-**Wine Enthusiast**  
-**LGBTQ**(you can be straight, but as long as you support it. Personally I am bisexual, just want to get that out there as soon as possible)  
  
and the following are not at all necessary but more like.. bonus points?  
-**Pothead**  
-**Chiptunehead**  
(if you don't know what a chiptune head is, basically a lover of [this](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MYUZk_YINgo) kind of music)  
-**Steam Gamer**(so we can play games) 
  
  
So after reading all of that and your precious self also happens to live in miami, FL, please please please message me and let's get a beautiful friendship started.  
You don't NEED to live in miami, but at least be ok with visiting or having me over (eventually obviously).    
*I don't mind long distance pals either but i really need to form a connection with someone nearby so that i'm not always stuck in doors waiting.*  
  
Picture for picture (meaning you send me one, and i'll send you mine)  
  
  
  
I'd also like to clarify that this is not for dating, however I am not opposed to it, but my main interest is to find a friend and hopefully best friend?  

",q4q
Detroit,"[M4M] 27yo., looking for having my first time.",q4q
32 [M4R] Sydney Australia - Need More Fun In My Life,"Hey all, I have been single for a while and searching for a partner whether it's just for casual fun or possible relationship within metropolitan NSW area.

So what to tell about me? Well, I'm openly bi and also consider myself polyamorous. I'm a total pop culture geek when it comes to comics, television, movies and whatever else. I have a quirky but humorous attitude. I like to travel and so far, have been only traveling within my state area but do wanna see the world someday. I can be fun and spontaneous.

As for whom I'm looking, I am currently mainly attracted to guys and transgender females but I am open-minded for others and that's what brings the poly side of me, I guess. And I wouldn't mind being monogamous instead but only if you're the one I found and looking for so you never know. 18-50 are preferably my age limit and... I don't know, just be good and respectable.

It's all I got to write so gentlemen and ladies, gimme a holler and tell me about yourself with a face pic (I don't reply to those without it since I do wanna be cautious and all).",q4q
20 [M4R] - Bored AF,"A bit about me - I'm bisexual. I am borderline obsessed with animals and nature. I really enjoy food and cooking, I'm the kind of person who lives to eat instead of eating to live haha. I've got a bad case of wanderlust, I'm quite adventurous and love to try new things. I love music, I'm more into rock, metal and old country, although I'd listen to almost anything. I can maybe be a bit on the quiet side but nothing out of the ordinary really. If you are a decent conversationalist feel free to message me.",q4q
"M4M, Cairns, QLD, Australia. Looking for a young fit guy to explore with.","As the title says I'm looking for a young guy 18-24, I'm 19, who is fit and just wants to have a bit of casual fun and explore ourselves.",q4q
"[F4F] anywhere, someone to flirt with?","Bored tonight, not ready for bed yet, looking for someone to flirt with and hopefully make me feel nice. Doesn't have to go anywhere, just whisper sweet nothings and talk a little sexy to one another. You know, feel good stuff. There are plenty of pics of me around reddit. ",q4q
20 [M4M] USA - looking for.....,"I dunno what I'm looking for tbh. I'd prefer some new friends at the moment, but if something else happens then I wouldn't mind. 

I'm 20, into horror movies, tons of music, playing instruments, going out a lot, traveling, meeting new people, sleeping lol, photography, and a bunch of other stuff. 

If you wanna chat then send me a message!",q4q
[M4M] #gastonia looking for a versatile top to fill my curiosity,"I'm white male, 5'6"" about 4.5"" cock, DDF. Skinny body build. Looking to give a BJ for the first time, and be a bottom. Would like to try being a top if there's time for it and the mood is right. Must host and be DDF. Msg if interested
",q4q
"21 M4M Western NC, mostly straight (never been with a guy, looking for someone to experiment with.",Very curious about the male body and reeaaally wanna suck cock. Hmu. ,q4q
"24Q4A Anywhere, agender person looking for a femme bff to talk and be cute together","Hi :) I'm a femme looking agender person in Arizona. I'm looking for friends either in person or online. I'm in a poly marriage with a man, and I don't know a lot of other people since I moved.

I'm pretty sure I'm asexual or at least demisexual. I'm more interested in finding good friends to do hair and makeup, talk about stuff, and just have fun. I might end up being interested in having a girlfriend but it's not my main focus.

I like listening to history and mystery podcasts. I have a cat and two dogs and a husband. I love crafts and sewing and fashion. Um if you want to know more just message me!",q4q
M4A straight curious guy looking to broaden my horizons,"I will start off by saying i have never been with another guy but lately i have hard an insane urge to suck cock and have my butt poinded. I am normally submissive with women. I have always found trans women very sexy. As for me i am 5'10 200lbs tattooed 7""uc brown haor hazel eyes with a big bubble butt, and basically hairless. I am just looking to chat with somone new and see where it goes from there. I am basically open to anything or anyone. So if anyone feels like chatting hit me up. I am deffinatley open to pic exchange. Hope to hear from you all soon.",q4q
25 M4M,"Hello everyone!

I'm interested in exchanging PMs with someone or messaging through kik. I enjoy philosophy, literature, music, as well as video games, movies, and politics. I can talk about mundane things (like what you did today, what you feel) as well as more substantial issues (current events, cultural issues, academic topics).

Thank you for your time, and I look forward to hearing from you!",q4q
"23 [m4m] central nj, looking for someone to chat with and maybe more","I'm a bi curious guy interested in talking to someone near me to maybe do more with. I've never been with a guy, but I'm interested in trying it. 

I'm a big guy, around 300lbs, built like a bear. I'm 6'2''

PM me and we can exchange kiks or just chat on reddit :D",q4q
23 [M4M] Central Valley/Fresno - I want to explore my submissive side,College guy bottom into being submissive. Would like to try out being a pet. Always wanted to get collared and leashed and serve my master. ,q4q
[M4M] 27 mwm in Michigan/anywhere needs more,"Like the title says, I've been married to my wife for a couple of years now, but I'm not getting everything I need.  I'm bi, but I haven't been with a man since before I met my wife.  There's a part of me that's missing without having some man-time in my life.  I'm not just looking for a hookup, I'm hoping to find someone to talk with and become friends with, in addition to bedroom times.  I'm not limiting myself to my local area, I'd love to talk with anyone if you feel like we could click.  Get in touch! :)",q4q
20 [M4M] southeastern PA- Bottom looking to get fucked,"So I've been with a guy once, and while I enjoyed it, he was not hung. Four inches, curved like crazy, and just overall lackluster. I want to get fucked by at least a normal sized cock. I'm very inexperienced but would love to learn

Bit about me: blonde, 5'9, 250 lbs at 25% body fat (husky but built like a bear). Let me know if you're interested",q4q
20[M4M] south Orange County looking for FwB,"Kinda new to the whole gay thing haha..
Want someone who can help me out with some kinks and rough edges haha",q4q
"19 [M4T] Minnesota - Never talked to a Transgender in a sexual orentation way, but would like to try :)","PM for my snapchat if you're interested in showing me the other side, im beyond curious ;)",q4q
"18 [M4M] Sydney, virgin, willing to give oral, no reciprocation required. Looking for a fun time.",DM if interested ,q4q
41 M4M Phoenix AZ / Tucson AZ,"Dutch bigger/bear bottom (sometimes versa), 41 5'9 210 6uc on holiday looking for fun. 12/1-3 in Phoenix, 12/4-6 in Tucson.",q4q
Sacramento CA here 18 year old Latino male 5'5 looking to chat. Maybe trade pics?,,q4q
"M4M, who knows?","I'm generally looking for someone to chat with about turn-ons, fantasies, etc. I'd also love to exchange pics! ",q4q
22 M4M Central Arkansas?,Bear looking for anything. ,q4q
27 [M4M] looking to experiment in North Jersey,"Hey q4q, I'm a 27 year old bi history teacher from central/northern nj. Im 5'7"" with blond hair, in shape, average build. I'm looking for someone close by to experiment with. If you're close to my age, send me a message with your age and kik, and we can start getting to know each other :) ",q4q
25 [M4T] Central Florida,"Hello! 

I am in Central FL, im bisexual, and have always had a thing for transgender women. Im in shape and pretty good looking.  I would really like an ongoing FWB type situation.

Message me if youd like. Maybe we could chat a little.",q4q
18 [M4A] #HighPoint NC -- University freshman looking to service you!,"Hi there! I'm a freshman at HighPoint Uni and I'm eager to please! I am 100lbs, but fit and toned, tan, and im told im cute.

However, due to being an on campus freshman I cannot host or drive so you must be able to do both! I know its demanding but thats the cards im dealt with haha. P.M for details ir kik me at Trevahr and lets talk! Dont be shy!",q4q
29 M4R - Looking for friends/more in Baltimore,"I'm 29 white male... I've just moved to the Baltimore area and would love to meet some new people! Male/Female... if people are curious - I'm bicurious ;P  Also athletic 5'10"" 155lbs... hmmm... I'd put up more but rather disclose more through conversation. kk hope to hear from you all! Or well most of you ;)",q4q
29 [M4M] Just looking for a JO buddy (maybe more) in Central New York.,"Just looking to explore a little bit. I'm bi-curious and I would love to just watch some (straight) porn with someone, maybe jump in the shower together or something. Might be down for more depending on looks, personality. Hit me up, send me a pic, let's hang out!",q4q
MarlboroPozPig,,q4q
21 M4M #DMV #DC,"curious masculine young guy looking for fun. chatting, pics and meeting up if you're in the area. Pm me pics, I could reall use a buddy",q4q
"[M4M] 28yo. Looking for Exploring Buddy / Hangout Buddy in Los Angeles, California (Glendale Area)","I'm 28, white. I have a buzzed head and facial hair. I could use the gym to drop about ten lbs, so I would say I have an average build. I really want to meet people for exploring: both the area and ourselves. 

I would like to meet a guy who is in a similar boat to me, who would be down to find a friend, hang out, maybe watch some Star Trek or other geeky shows, find some microbreweries, and then see what else it is we share mutual interests in. 

Really inexperienced when it comes to most of everything with guys, so just throwing that out there. ",q4q
50 [M4M] San_Jose looking for a guy in the bay area,Can I come by abd visit?,q4q
"31 M4M/T Curiously craving it in Orange country, CA","All I can think about is having a cock in my mouth and ass. My ex gf got me into pegging and inevitably my desires for the real thing got stronger. I'm looking for someone that can help me experiment.

I'm open to an ongoing thing, but one and done is okay too. I'm not a big guy, 5'6"" 145. I'm your typical sports guy, laid back music, etc.",q4q
"Kik group: Sissies, Femboys, and Admirers message me to get in .... my kik: newkinkyfemboy",my kik: newkinkyfemb,q4q
"29 M4M Texas, looking to experience",Have always been curious about being with another man and am looking to indulge in my curiosity. Would like to chat on kik first and then maybe see where things take us. Message me for my kik and let me know where you saw my post. ,q4q
33/Male/Bi-Curious/#Edmonton,"Hey, 33/M in Edmonton. 5'11, ok shape but improving. Limited experience with a guys but hoping to change that. Looking to chat and see where things go from there.",q4q
20 [m4m] looking for a top Northern Ky,Looking for a hot masculine top with a big dick in NKY,q4q
18 [M4M] Wisconsin - Looking for a cute top to be my friend,"I am basically looking for someone to talk to. I would love to be friends and to just talk casually! I recently have just started to play pokemon go. If you are nice then we can meet up and maybe get into something a little more. Thanks!

I currently leave in the wisconsin area if you would like to talk ",q4q
42 M4M Back in Ohio,"Looking for someone to hang with. Into video games, the outdoors, and great sex. Looking for a FWB in NE Ohio area.",q4q
"18 [M4M] Virginia - Just want some dick, bonus points if you'll choke me.",,q4q
29 m4m Oregon,"looking for a guy 21-34 to talk to, see where it goes. ultimately looking for something long term and serious, but again, willing to see where it goes. PM me if interested",q4q
42 [M4M] Visiting San Antonio looking for something extra,I've been wanting to find someone to top me for the first time but haven't had any luck. Will be in San Antonio for me next couple days and hope to find what I'm looking for.  PM me or kik bipantylovr and let's set something up. ,q4q
27 [m4m] lookin for a chill phone bate bud RN white SoCal dude here. RedHead. Horned AF!,,q4q
"20 M4M Guy looking for chat, PM me and let's talk",,q4q
20 [F4F] UK - Looking to experiment [x-post from r/dirtyr4r],"Girls only please!

Okay, I'm on a throwaway so I don't have to lie: I love tits.

I love the idea of just sucking on somebody's titties and playing with them and I want to see if reality is as good as the fantasy.

Also, I've been wanting for years to just play with a girl's perky ass. Not like, anal stuff, but like just smacking it and jiggling it around.

Essentially I just kind of want to play with a girl! I've never done it before, I'm nervous about it, but I want to try.

To be honest I don't think I'm at a point yet where I want to dive into that pussy. I just really, really want to play with someone's boobs.

Also, I'm pretty self-conscious so you probably won't even have to reciprocate in any way.

If you're a woman in the London area, and would like to help a closeted bisexual woman experiment please hit me up. I'll happily send you pictures and the like.

EDIT: Men. I am not interested in you watching while your girlfriend and I play around. If your girlfriend wants to meet up with me she can message me herself :)  ",q4q
42 M4M visiting Myrtle Beach,"Big dick daddy ready for some fun. 6', Swimmers build, 8.5"" 
",q4q
"28 [m4m] Orange County, California - Sub looking for hung dominant dude","Like to play with guys occasionally.  Good looking 5'8, 180, Asian, Sub, Masc 4 same, discreet, hung, clean, smooth jock from Huntington Beach. CA.  Always horny.  Even when I'm suppose to be working, sex is always on my mind haha.  Down to make friends to chill as well. Pic available via email.  Stocky, hairy, nerds, +.  Into all types.   
",q4q
29 m4m-looking to talk,"like the title says, just looking to meet someone to talk to, get to know someone and see where it goes. hit me up",q4q
27[M4M] Indiana bi guy looking for new friends,"I don't have a lot of people near me that are not judgemental about who I am so I'm trying this to meet new friends. I'm bi , a gamer and a big reader. I love pop culture stuff and I'm also a good listener. I'm 5'7"" kinda chubby with a beard. I'm on most of the day so don't hesitate to hit me up. 
Kik is hermit357",q4q
(F4F) PNW looking to chat,"Looking to make new friends, someone to chat with. 

Moved to Washington recently. Love craft beer and hiking. 

Big fan of movies, horror genre in particular. 

I'm a tall white girl with tattoos. Pretty laid pack. Love to talk to people within Washington or Oregon but I'm down to talk to anyone. 

Message me to chat or my kik. Love to talk music movies just about anything under the sun. ",q4q
[F4F] north Alabama and mid TN,"Looking for a bi or lesbian female to become friends with and maybe more :) I'm an animal lover, I love swimming, I'm a bit geeky, and a child at heart...two things That might turn you off from me: I'm a BBW, and I'm also married. Yes my husband knows I'm looking and is ok with it. Message me for more info please.",q4q
26 [M4M] Ghent/Belgium,PM or answer if you want to talk to a (mostly) straight boy about his curiosities.,q4q
"30 [M4M] Palm Beach to Delray, FL","Newly single. 30 yo. Asian husky guy. Top mostly. Likes short, nerdy guys all shapes and sizes, 21-35 yo.

Going to a movie (CA:Civil War) tonight in Delray with friends. PM if interested!
",q4q
[M4M][M4MT] Houston - Looking for a regular top FWB for beginner,"I've recently been exploring my bi side more and Id really like to find someone I can get to know and have a real FWB relationship. I'm 29, black, 6'3"", and in decent shape, have a few extra pounds to lose, but I'm working on that.

What I'm looking for is someone who is vers or a top. Im recently vers, have topped a few times but finally tried out the other side and like it more then i expect. Id love to have a friend who I am comfortable with and loves to top me, or cum in my mouth. Age is not a big deal, but I don't think I'm ready for any monster cocks just yet.

Send a pm if you are interested, send kik un if you have one.",q4q
28 [T4F] Colorado/Online - Looking for a female friend,"Hi girls. Looking for a fun female for chatting, and maybe more. Right now, I just want a female friend that I can be friends with. I can skype, share pics, etc. I'm working on my second master's degree, sane and fun! Let's chat! ",q4q
30 [M4M] San Francisco Bay Area,"I'm looking for a new friend. 

Bonus points if you enjoy receiving blowjobs. ",q4q
"[T4F] New Zealand, looking for?",20yo FTM looking for a chill person. Not looking for drama or anything serious.,q4q
[NSFW] 23 T4W Looking for some fun during my Time @ Anime North in Toronto,"Hello q4q,
I am a young trans woman who will be in the Toronto area May 26-30th for Anime North and have some fun with a woman to treat me nicely.... I am very interested in trying anal and pegging like the girl I am, Feel free to message me if you are interested in anything.",q4q
20 [m4m] Looking for a relationship in the Louisville metro area.,"As the title says, though honestly if you want to message me even if you don't live around here, be my guest. 

Like I said I'm twenty and I live around the Louisville metro. I like table top games like D&amp;D and the World of Darkness saga and I do a lot of casual gaming. I don't watch much of anything but I'm always open to suggestions. :)

Hit me up if you're interested or have any other questions!",q4q
[F4F] be cute with me!,"32 yr old F trans woman here looking for people to flirt with and send me cute good morning texts :) there are tons of pics all around reddit of me, and my boobs especially. Just look at my post history. You're welcome, lol. I like travel, cooking, trying new foods, the beach, sailing (only ever done it on a lake), music festivals, nerd bars, clubbing, 420, friends, film/tv, friends, and sex. Maybe not in that order, lol. I look forward to all you cute girls messaging me! :)

Now for the part I shouldn't have to say. If you're messaging me BECAUSE I'm trans. Don't. That's creepy and it objectifies me and fetishizes me in ways I don't like. 

",q4q
[FM4R] New York City - queer threesome,"Two queer babes looking for a third queer babe of any gender (but no straight men) to have a threesome with. We are also open to a couple if you're a really great fit. Tonight is our last night in New York! We highly value good communication, consent, and respect for boundaries. We like aliens, glitter, rock climbing, spanking, booties, sushi, and feminism. We're very cute, fun and freaky. Message for pic exchange ",q4q
19 [M4T] S England,"5'7 Average build, Black hair, Caucasian looking for a relationship maybe later on, or FWB. Looking to see where it goes, Pm me :).",q4q
20 M4M SF Bay Area,"Looking to help a curious guy explore his sexuality. I'm bi myself so I know my way around and I want to help someone explore ;) Other guys around my age feel free to message me, I'd also love to start an ongoing fwb type thing. I'm a college student, 5'11'' with a slim build. Preferably in the east bay area.",q4q
"19(m4r) Orange, California Friends or More?","I am a turning 20 this week, been trying to find more friends, and hopefully that special someone. I am a geek/nerd, I love videogames, but I am also an outdoorsy person, I love fishing, hunting, hiking and snowboarding. But I also enjoy just staying in playing videogames, DnD, reading Books, listening to music, or watching movies. I love talking to people and learning things. I am still trying to find my path in life though, right now I am looking down the path of EMT. But who knows what will happen. Just gotta keep pushing forward. Feel free to hit me up, any gender anywhere?",q4q
30 [T4A] Colorado queer looking for friends/lovers/relations,"I'm a 30yo, poly, queer, fat, radical, kinky, 420+ friendly, gray ace, transwoman living in Denver. I cohabitate with one of my partners and our wonderful furbabes. Looking for meaningful connections of any and all types. I'm fairly nerdy, into a wide range of things. Easy to get along with, but will not suffer fools gladly. Send me a msg and lets chat! I'm open to most kinds of relations and dynamics, so long as chemistry is there. Thanks for reading!",q4q
19 [M4M] Anywhere - Want to get to know someone,"Hi! Thanks for taking the time to read my post. I'm looking for someone who is around my age and wants to get to know each other and maybe build a relationship.

With that said, here is a little bit about me. I'm 5'9"" about 135lbs. I love to travel and meet new people. I listen to a large variety of music, Rock, Pop, Jazz, I'll listen to everything. I watch a ton of movies, any genre, but my favorite genre would have to be horror. I play a lot of video games in my spare time, but I only play on consoles. I don't really watch any TV shows other than American dad. That's enough about me for now I suppose. Looking forward to hearing from you. :)",q4q
33/Male/Bi-Curious/Edmonton,"Hey, 33/M in Edmonton. 5'11, ok shape but improving. Never been with a guy but done about everything short of. Looking to chat and see where things go from there",q4q
40 [M4M] Traveling New Zealand,"Dutch guy traveling NZ. Bear/bigger, versa/bot, for friends or fun. 

Arrive 11/2 Christchurch, 16/2 Queenstown, 21/2 ferry to North Island, leave 3/3 from Auckland. ",q4q
"31[M4T] Dayton,OH",Would love to experience my first tgirl. Never had a cock before and want to please.,q4q
27 [F4F] 18+ all female lgbtq group chat,"Hi gals! 

Telegram is a messaging app a lot like kik but is available on desktop or mobile devices (or both!). Team Sparkle is a group of gay/lesbian/bi/pan/trans/etc women who are pretty awesome and fun to talk to! We have 47 members and have been chatting for over 2 months. Our ages range from 18-43 and we are pretty diverse. We started out on kik but migrated to telegram so people could use their laptops. 

In our group we chit chat about day to day life, support each other during trials and give excellent advice, get drunk on skype together, and just enjoy getting to know everyone! If this sounds fun continue reading!

Our rules:

-You must be 18+ 

-You must be an lgbtq female 

-You must treat everyone with respect and generally be a decent human 

-No lurking or creeping, only join if you plan to actively participate

 -You must verify with a picture that fulfills the requirements I give in private. 

If you're interested in joining us please send me a message with the following:

-Age 

-Location 

-How you identify 

-Your telegram username


I get tons of messages to sort through so I won't track you down if you leave any info out. Looking forward to chatting with you ladies soon!",q4q
26 F4F WI/Anywhere,"I'm a single mom and I'm expecting in September. My daughter is 2 and a half. I am in an open relationship with my fiancée who's a transgender woman. She sees other people, but so far I have not. She thinks it would be good for me to get out there. At the moment I think I'm looking for something casual. I do have kik and Snapchat. Otherwise we can talk on here, email, or text when we get more comfortable.",q4q
"25 [T4A] Looking for a FWB, Midwest","Hi there,

I have been on HRT for a few months and look fairly female. I am looking to expand my social circle and want to start exploring my sexuality in a safe, sane and consensual manner. Please PM me for more details if you are interested.
",q4q
35 [F4F] NYC - Let's go out!,"I would love to expand my social circle a bit and meet some new people.

Ideally, I am looking to meet easygoing, fun-loving bisexual or gay women who want to go out and enjoy the city.

I am in Brooklyn, but I am all over the city. I work hard, but I make sure to enjoy myself as well. I am very laid back and easy to hang out with. I can carry on a conversation and get along well with most people.

I am always up to try something new, which is particularly easy to do in NYC. I love museums, hiking, the beach, live music, eating and drinking, trivia nights, and movies. I am all about getting some drinks or checking out a new restaurant or neighborhood.

If this sounds like something you might be into, send me a message and tell me more about yourself and we can talk. 

Please be interested in meeting up. Email and chatting is lovely, but I am hoping to make some new IRL friends to go out with. I am more than happy to voice verify, exchange photos, and all of that.",q4q
31 [M4M] Columbus OH - Bicurious Wednesday,"In town for business on wednesday. I've been curious for a long time, but I finally decided I want to try the real thing...

Looking for discrete, patient, normal guy willing to show me the ropes for the first time. Safety is a necessity. Must be D&amp;D free.",q4q
25 (M4M) Los Angeles,"Hey all! I hope you're enjoying the long weekend. I've been out for a couple years now and I feel ready to start dating, though new friends are always welcome :). I'm kind of a nerd and enjoy video games and Scifi, but I'm also active and love going to the beach and hiking.  Shoot me a PM if you wanna chat!",q4q
"27 &amp; 29 [mm4m] Palm Beach, Florida","Sup gentlemen. Just seeing who's around. 29 - 5' 11"", Asian ""panda bear"" type, 210 lbs, black hair and eyes in 6 year relationship with 27 - 5'9"", white cub, 200 lbs, brown hair and green eyes",q4q
"24 [m4m] Bay area, California - Attractive curious straight dude for younger bro.","Finally getting the nerve to try this. I'm an attractive 24y/o from the Bay Area, never been with a guy before but I am becoming increasingly curious and really want to try it out. Ideally you're a bottom, 18-21, smooth, hairless and slim. I really want my first experience with a guy to be good. It's important that we both find each other attractive. We can talk more about how it can work out (message me!) Please send pic in first message!",q4q
18 [TM4R] SW England - ideally looking for a fwb,"Pretty small (5', 110lb) pre-everything, not particularly masculine, and could use some physical interaction. I'm not hugely experienced and can be pretty insecure, so I would love another trans person to interact with, although I'm really not picky. I'm not looking to just trade pics or cam. Pm if you're interested. ",q4q
"26 [M4M] Maine, Curious guy","I've never been with a guy before but have been feeling really curious lately.  If you'd be willing to go slow and show me the ropes, let me know!",q4q
19 [M4M] East Coast USA/Anywhere - Looking for that special nerd!,"Hello! I am a 19-year-old guy from the east coast of the US. Currently a college student, but hoping to work in the medical field when I finish. I'm 5'7"" and 230 lbs.

My biggest hobbies are video games and music. I play a lot of different games, so chances are we have a game in common. My favourite games right now are League of Legends, ESO, and Warframe. I also listen to a large variety of music. Some of my favourite artists are: Kendrick Lamar, Macklemore, Cher, Evanescence, Fall Out Boy, and Panic! At the Disco. I also enjoy cooking, mainly baking, and TV shows. Right now I'm currently watching South Park and American Horror Story.
I'm a pretty easy-going guy, so feel free to PM me if any of that interests you or if you'd like to know more!

I'm looking for someone around my age, but I don't mind if you're a little older.

I'm also not interested in hook-ups, so please only message me if you're looking for an actual relationship. :)

I have face pics/skype/kik/whatever as well, but I like to get to know people first before giving that out.",q4q
27 [m/m][USA][PA] Looking for something serious and long-lasting,"I'm 27, I live in the Philly suburbs, looking for something that isn't just FWB or one night stand.  I'm looking for a serious relationship with somebody I can love and be with for a long time...I'm very laid back, I love music and old movies.  I'm kind of a nerd.  I'm obsessed with doctor who.  Wanna know more, PM me!",q4q
"making custom videos, dirty ;)",,q4q
22 [m4m] Twin Tiers NY - Looking for the lucky one,"Hello! I am single and looking for someone to get to know and share things with, and eventually a life, even if we end up just being friends. I am into a wide variety of music, i love movies and tv series. I'm a bit of a trekkie and pretty open minded. I'm a chubby dude and i love to cook. I'm hoping someone out there is willing to give me a chance, i have kik and other forms of contact, facebook and the like to make things easier. Let me know if you are interested, i love to talk and list! I could always use friends!",q4q
19 [F4R] Ireland- wondering is there's Irish people here,"Like the title says I'm wondering if there's any other Irish people on here. 
I'd love to know and possibly chat :) ",q4q
"22m [m4m] - looking to dirty talk / chat on reddit (no kik, etc please) - Kinky bottom","Hey everyone, 

I was just looking to start a chat with another gay guy. Preferably close in age to me (18-26). PM me or leave a comment here. Wanna dirty talk and meet new people.

My kinks: BDSM, group, non-con. chocking, frats/college, etc ;) 
I prefer to be the bottom.

Send me your kinks and we'll see where it goes.",q4q
19 [M4M] Looking for that special guy.,"Hello! I am a 19-year-old guy from the east coast of the US. Currently a college student, but hoping to work in the medical field when I finish. I'm 5'7"" and 230 lbs.

My biggest hobbies are video games and music. I play a lot of different games, so chances are we have something in common. My favourite games right now are League of Legends and Runescape. I also listen to a large variety of music. My favourites are pop and rap though. I also enjoy cooking, mainly baking, and TV shows. 

I'm a pretty easy-going guy, so feel free to PM me if any of that interests you or if you'd like to know more!

I'm looking for someone around my age, but I don't mind if you're a little older. 

I'm also not interested in hook-ups, so please only message me if you're looking for an actual relationship. :)

I have face pics/skype/kik/whatever as well, but I like to get to know people first before giving that out.",q4q
"19 NW iowa, seeing whose here.",I'm a Bi currious guy from north iowa looking to talk and maybe more? message me if your interested.,q4q
"37 [M4M] looking for a friend in New London, CT.",I've been married to a woman for 13 years. I got married rather than deal with the fact that I am gay. I have recently come to the decision that I need to be honest with the world. I am not ready to come out yet but I would like a friend that I can be myself with. Not looking to hook up or have a romantic relationship at this time.,q4q
"22 - M4W/T -Vancouver, BC - Looking for an androgynous girl to peg me","So, I'm a young bi guy in Vancouver, BC, and I want to meet a girl who would like to role-play a MM encounter. 
Basically, we go on a 'date' where you're packing, the idea being to have an encounter where we both act like men and I'm bottom or vers for your strap-on. 

You would take on an androgynous or masculine role and could play top, but I'm not really into a dom/sub aspect. 

I hope no one minds me posting this here, it is a M-W encounter but it has pretty strong queer aspects I feel other subreddits might be judgmental or negative towards.",q4q
"25 [M4M] Washington, DC - looking for a fwb [NSFW?]","I'm not sure what qualifies as NSFW, but I'm looking for someone who wants a long term nsa relationship. I'm basically looking for someone who enjoys receiving handjobs and oral, and who is ddf and responsible about it. 

As for me, I'm pretty athletic, quite geeky, and a big gamer. I'm a grad student, so there's that. I think I'm pretty chill and relaxed, and definitely more sub than dom. 

As for who I'm looking for - pretty much anyone with similar interests, and definitely someone who knows what they want, has a take charge personality, and is maybe a bit kinky. Like with anyone meeting for the first time, while I'm happy to jump into it, I also prefer to take things safe first and work into more interesting stuff as our mutual comfort level grows. I know this isn't craigslist, but I don't think either of us want to worry about any ""gifts"" that keep on giving. 

If you're interested, PM me and we can chat. I'm looking forward to hearing from you. ",q4q
"18 [TM4M/F] Charlotte, NC/ Anywhere Looking for Relationship or FWB","I'm 18 years-old, ftm transgender, and looking for love (lol gay). I'm pansexual but I do have a slight preference for men. I would love to meet other trans men. Also I've been on testosterone for 3 months so far and am pre-any surgery. Pm me for more details/pictures. ",q4q
23 [M4M] Toronto - Looking for FWB,"Hi everyone! I'm a 23 year old European guy. 115 lbs for 5'9”, blonde with blue eyes. I'm bi, mostly gay, but I've never been with a guy, only girls. So I'm looking for a guy to experiment with. Either someone who has a similar amount of experience (meaning: little to none) or someone who will be patient, gentle, and respectful. I need someone I can talk to, so I'd rather meet in a public place and talk first, and then maybe go to your place if things go well. I haven't come out to anyone I know, so you will have to be discreet. Message me if you're interested. If you wanna exchange pics, send a face pic, not a dick pic. I like to be surprised.",q4q
"30 [M4M] Twin Cities, Mn - Looking for FWB","I am currently in an open marriage. Because I am bisexual my spouse understands I have needs she cannot fulfill and allows me to do what I need. The only rule is I am strictly bottom. 

I am kind of heavy but I am told I have a very attractive face and ass. 

Hit me up if you're in the area.",q4q
21 [T4R] Europe/Anywhere - FWB Anyone?,"Hey everyone! I'm a 21 y.o. newb CD from Europe. I'm looking for a...someone. Doesn't matter which gender, although if you're male I do insist on being the sub. I'm quite intelligent and fit, don't know if passable yet but I'm always improving. Being able and willing to travel is a must, of course. Not interested in dirty talk and stuff like that, I really want someone serious. Looks are not that important, although you must be able to move by yourself and stuff like that. I repeat, I am **not** interested in dirty talk, I want someone **serious**. I repeat, gender **does not matter**. 

Pm me and maybe we'll find each other in this crazy world :)",q4q
Looking for a friend,Long Beach California ,q4q
27 [M4M] #Winnipeg - Geeky guy seeks same.,"So I am a quiet, shy, reserved young fellow and I am noticing a serious lack of intimacy in my life right now... you want to help with that?  
  
* Need a cuddle buddy? I can do that.  
* FWB? I'm a friendly person.  
* LTR? challenge accepted.  
* One night stand? Less likely to happen, but feel free to woo me.  
* Help you with your thesis?  Maybe  
  
Looks wise, I have this slim/average body type going on for me.  I'm 6 foot, 175 lbs (if that matters to you). I go to the gym about 3 times a week.  My friends tell me I am handsome, but I don't really photograph well... I blame the camera. Nerdy looking, most of my wardrobe has some sort of superhero on it. I like to play on my PS4 and also go out to Friday night magic every so oft.  Also, I am a Native American.  
  
Looking for someone similar to me, I have a preference for men who are tall and who also wear glasses.  Bad eyesight is such a turn on.  Also: firefighters, police officers, businessmen, pizza delivery guys, nerds, geeks, Award winning magic the gatering players also float my boat.  
  
Feel free to message me, get a discussion going.  If we click, maybe meet for coffee at Stella's or something.  ",q4q
"23 [T4R] Virginia - androgynous, pan dmab looking for friends and maybe more","Hi! I'm a 23 year old trans woman who's been on hormones about 11 months and am stuck in the androgynous phase.  A huge nerd (I play way too much destiny and D&amp;D), recovering mtg player, and a music lover. I'm in SE VA and do software development. A picture of you gets a picture of me!",q4q
"32 [M4M] Brooklyn, NYC - Guy in an open relationship looking for a friend with benefits","I [32M] am in an open relationship with my boyfriend [29M] and I'm looking for someone who's willing to be a friend first and foremost, but willing to play around on occasion.

Me: I'm an IT professional working out of my home in Brooklyn. Love gaming, travel, driving, having small get-togethers at home or going for walks around the city. I don't go out drinking at all except to the pub around the corner. I'm fairly geeky and love life! I'm 5'7"" tall, quite hairy with a trimmed beard. I could be considered a ""cub"".

Boyfriend: The sweetest guy in the world, at least in my opinion. :P He's going to law school and is equally as geeky as I am. Mainly into video games as well as Marvel comics. He also enjoys coin collecting. Oh, and he's also asexual, hence the open relationship.

We both love to stay in and talk shop, so to speak. We're more content playing games together rather than going out spending money at the bars. We'll go for drives on occasion, too.

If you're interested, hit me up and we'll get it on!",q4q
35yo bi M4T,"35 bi white male looking for MTF or FTM in NC, prefer in or near Durham.",q4q
"21 [M4M] NYC Manhattan Just Want to Cuddle, Watch TV, and Enjoy Each Other","To be honest, I just want someone to indoor date with. I just want to cuddle and enjoy time together watching TV maybe. I don't really want to have sex now, but I'm fine with making out. Any one out there who just wants to cuddle?",q4q
24M looking for love anywhere( its hard ),,q4q
[21] M4M Looking to experiment. Near DeKalb IL,"Im a 21 y/o male looking to explore some fantasies. I specifically want to suck cock. Thats it. Im a bit on the heavier side, but not that bad. Im more towards the DeKalb area. Send me a PM if intrested so we could chat.",q4q
26/25 [MM4M] San Diego - Gay Couple Looking for a Third (x-post from /r/SoCalR4R),"Hi /r/q4q! Time to try this again :) We're a college-aged gay couple in SD, and we're looking to explore the world of threesomes. Ideally, we'd like to get to know you a bit better before getting raunchy. A little bit about us:

* 25, bottom: 5'11"", ~150 lbs, average cock. Loves giving and receiving oral, and getting pounded anally. Ears and nipples are sensitive.
* 26, top: 5'8"", ~150 lbs, above-average dick. Loves giving and receiving oral. Ears and nipples are extremely sensitive. Really enjoys pleasing his partner.
* We are both from mixed ethnic backgrounds, moderately good-looking, and fit (hit the gym 2-3 times per week + hiking once a week).

* What we're looking for: a relatively and mutually attractive, vers/top. We have no preference when it comes to height or ethnicity.

We live together in our own apartment, so we can host. We'd like to meet you for coffee first though, so please PM us if you're interested! A pic would be helpful, too :)",q4q
M4MM - Atlanta - looking for a spit roast,"28 male, looking to fulfill a fantasy. I've always wanted to blow a guy while his boyfriend fucks me. I'm recently single so I'm going to check some things off my bucket list. 

If you're interested pm me, I'm willing to drive if you're willing to host. Or we can figure something else out. 

Hope some couple out there is willing to help me check of my list. ",q4q
"Looking to experiment in Louisville, ky",Pm me,q4q
"30 M4M/T Curiously craving it in Orange country, CA","All I can think about is having a cock in my mouth and ass. My ex gf got me into pegging and inevitably my desires for the real thing got stronger. I'm looking for someone that can help me experiment. 

I'm open to an ongoing thing, but one and done is okay too.  I'm not a big guy, 5'7"" 145. I'm your typical sports guy, laid back music, etc. ",q4q
21 [M4M] Paris - Unusual request,"[WARNING NSFW &amp; VERY EXPLICIT]

Hi everyone, so this is a bit of an unusual request. I'm a straight male (I got groped by a dude once, didn't like it). However recently I started having a fetish for facefucking... Watching it, doing it, and guess what... I'd like to receive it.

I'm looking for someone with a big dick (trans, male, shemale, whatever) that would enjoy facefucking me. Maybe I won't like it seconds into starting this, but I promise that my body will be yours for an hour. 

Do what you will with it (no body damage or anything - if unsure about one of your fetishes please ask me. The idea is to have a real dominant / submissive dynamic going on (me being submissive ofc, really not much more than a fuck doll that responds to your commands), but don't impose things that can be very hardcore. Thanks :)

I posted here but it someone knows of a subreddit in French for Paris, please tell me. I'll also post to /r/r4r/ for better visibility. If you want more info about how I look, first, know that I'm *gorgeous*. Lol, no really I'm ok looking and I might fit into one of your fave categories. Ask by PM

Thanks for your time! (Yes, this is a throwaway accnt as all of this is an experiment for me, and if it doesn't work out I'd prefer keeping it for myself.)",q4q
24 [M4M] Toronto - Looking for a FWB possibly even more,"Hey there reddit. I am a 24 year old white bisexual male who is searching for the right person to be his FWB or possibly even to be in a relationship with. I am a university educated, adventurous, open minded person, who likes to try and live life to the fullest. I am looking to meet a really good friend who I can hang with outside of the bedroom. Someone I can go to the movies, or go grab food with. Someone I can connect to and share my feelings with, as well as have great sex. It doesn't necessarily have to be a relationship but if nothing else a good FWB. I am not looking for a one night stand or an occasional booty call. I love to travel, and play boardgames, and go to the bar and watch the sports game with a beer, and to explore the city, as well as to stay inside and cuddle and watch netflix. I am about 5'11 and about 170 pounds. I am looking for a guy in Toronto who is between the ages of 18-30 who is looking for the same thing I am. All I ask is that you be open minded and be disease and drug free as I am (420 is ok). If this sounds like something your interested in don't be shy hit me up and well see where things go. ",q4q
"48 [M4M] FWB - Toledo, Ohio area","6'3"" / 260, good looking bear-ish (more fuzzy than hairy) masculine guy looking for the same. 100% bottom, looking for FWB with a 100% top guy my age or younger. Hung++. Very sane and normal, DDF, and HIV-   Play safe only",q4q
18 t4f/t looking for a mistress/domme,"Hey
I am a pre op trans woman,
And kinda figuring out where I am sexually now, looking for a domme or mistress because I am kinda submissive and definitely like the bdsm community and all
 
Feel free to drop a line and we can talk or something :-)",q4q
M4M bi curious sub bottom - SoCal SD,26 bi curious male looking to lose my anal virginity,q4q
M4T - Anywhere! Am curious to possibly explore some new horizons about my sexuality,"Hello my dear readers!

I'm 19, and currently located in the little island known as Britain (unfortunate since the overwhelming majority of people on here are American and awesome, I'm totally missing out!) Recently, I had a revelation that I may be attracted to transexuality (preferably MtoF, but I don't wish to be overly choose), and it would be amazing for someone to help me understand myself, and to join me in this journey of identity and sexuality. 

I hope you're all well, and I wish you luck on your search for love or anything else you seek! ",q4q
"21 [F4F] #SoCal, Looking for new friends","21F Just moved to Temecula, CA and sadly, I know no one in the area. I'm looking for some cool queer ladies to chill with/drink with/shop with/ work out with and/or cuddle with. I can only entertain myself for so long. If you're in the same position as me or just looking to add some ladies to your crew send me a pm :)

Fast facts about me:

-I'm an outdoors-woman (let's go hiking)

-Women's empowerment makes me randy

-I have an intimate relationship with Netflix

-I like dogs more than people

-Beer

-I have a passion for the biological sciences

-If you've seen the show, ""It's Always Sunny in Philadelphia,"" and didn't like it...we probably have nothing in common.

let me buy you a drink?",q4q
21 [M4M] Looking for FWB,"Hey, im 21 5""10' 180lbs, kinda hairy, 420 friendly Im in Toronto and looking for a fbuddy. 
i like bottom but i can be flexible. ",q4q
24 [M4M] Looking for SF FWB,"I'm 6', 420 friendly, burrito friendly, cute, white, masc, and very chill.

Looking for a long-term fbuddy, a hairy guy (could be cub/otter/bear) who likes to bottom and cuddle, who can host in SF. Send me a pic and we can connect from there :)",q4q
"M4M bottom, SLC","I will be in SLC (Salt Lake City, UT) next month for a conference and I am looking for someone to hook up with while I am there. I am an athletic bottom, 180 lbs, blue eyes, brown hair. I am a total bottom and want to suck you off and have you fuck me :) ",q4q
[M4M] in NE Ohio looking for a fwb.,"Just like the title says. I am 41 and fit with an 8.5 inch cock looking for a fwb/son/playmate. 6'0"" 155# swimmers build. Message me, let's play!",q4q
26 [M4M/T] Tacoma WA Looking for friends and more!,"As the title implies, Im looking for friendship and possibly more. I a very easy going laided back person who gets along with everyone from any walk of life. I like to see the good in people and embrace change and growth from new experiences. I love videogames and anime. I do have a kik. PM me and ill share. I look forward to meeting you!",q4q
"[MF4T] Austin, limitless possibilities :)","Hello!

We're a couple with a bed that's just too big. Cheesy, but true.

Huge fantasy to be with a Tgirl. Would love to find someone to get to know, go get dinner with. Just see if anything clicks.

Thanks for reading!",q4q
34marriedM4M - looking for a Bear to share my kinky side with,Looking to exchange messages and maybe skype. I am a 34 MM 6'0 180lbs looking to explore my bi side...... ,q4q
"21 [M4M] Mesa , AZ. whats up?","i really want to suck a cock lol, shoot me a pm :)",q4q
"20 [M4M or F] NoVa,Falls Church, Spring Field, Annadale","Hey, i'm an Asian in my 20s just looking for someone to experiment  with and out of curiousity if anyones curious my kik is jnguuyen12",q4q
M4M Want to experiment?,"I'm 40 years old, bi curious. Asian so I look much younger and I like to keep fit ;)
I want to eventually meet with a like minded male. Any age is welcome, pm me!",q4q
Closeted guy wants to experiment in Michigan.,I'm 25 and have never been with a guy and i think it time to change that. Any guys around?,q4q
M4M- married bi-curious,"now i love the ladies but I've always wondered about being with another man. Particularly sucking them off and having them cum in my mouth. Also taking a load in my ass. I have a prostate toy so I know I love my ass filled. How are you gonna lure me into sex with you? I've been hard all day, every time I've stood up I can feel the precum covering my thighs and cock. I'm at work today so I'll be responding on my breaks but I'm already hard and dripping. Get my attention and it may turn out to be a long term JO buds thing. Water sports are a big plus!!! Please leave my wife out of this. I don't share her and I'll never leave her.  For chat only!!!!",q4q
27 M4T - Experienced Male dom in search of an MtF/sissy partner for wonderful explorations :) (Central NC - Chapel Hill/RDU),"Greetings!

As the title says, I'm a 27 year old, cis-male Dom seeking an MtF or Sissy submissive/trainee for ongoing kinky fun!

My interests include:

- Rope Bondage
- Impact (spanking, whipping, etc)
- Sensation play (ice, wax, tickling, electricity)
- Breath control (choking, etc)
- Orgasm control (denial, edging, forced)
- Behavior training (obedience, mentality, the psychological aspects of power exchange and D/s)

My limits:

- Scat
- Animals
- Underage folk
- Permanent harm

If you're in the area and that all sounds like something you might want to consider/negotiate, shoot me a PM! :D
",q4q
20 [M4R] Looking for an anal trainer,"Hi, I live in Orange County and I am looking for someone who can ""train"" me, you know, anal and stuff. I want to learn how to feel good in those parts of my body, but I cant do it by myself. Message me if you can help me!

Edit: This is for OC California",q4q
19 [T4R] Looking for new chatting buddies!,"Hi my name is Raegan or just Rae for short, I'm transgender (born male, identify female) and I've been feeling pretty lonely recently, and was hoping to find more people to chat with recently! I love video games and all sorts of weird music, as well as playing some instruments sometimes. If you would want to talk, Skype would be great, pm me if you are interested!",q4q
"M4T/F Tallahassee, Florida",Hey there! I'd love to find a trans girl to experiment with or a girl to have some fun with pegging. Feel free to message me if this is your kind of thing!,q4q
M4F or T Portland Oregon,Hey I'm new to town. Just got out of the military. There is just something about a feminine figure behind me that drives me crazy. I am very willing to reciprocate. I hope this doesn't fall on deaf ears. If you want to know more feel free ,q4q
26 [M4T] DC/MD/NoVA,"I'm 26, educated, attractive and in good shape. Looking for a transgirl to have fun with. Would enjoy mutual oral and so forth.",q4q
25 [m4m] looking for a BF/FWB colorado springs,"Hey I'm a bi guy looking for another guy to hang out with and get to know on a more personal level. I love being active and outside,  video games, movies, shooting, really anything adventurous! If your interested in chatting or meeting up Eben if you don't live near by drop me a line i love meeting new people!",q4q
26 M4M - Anywhere. Guy looking for cubs and bears.,"Hey,
Looking for guys to chat with and trade pics.
I'm usually into cubs and bears, but muscular guys and slimmer guys are cool with me too.

I'm 5'6"", with blue eyes and dark blond hair.
Pm me with pics if you're interested.  I can pm pics too if you'd like, just ask.",q4q
23/m4m/Internet- Looking for an online thing.,"So, I figured I'd try something a little different this time. I believe in getting to the core of things, the things that really matter, and then working your way out. So, maybe it's best to tell you about the core things of me. There will be some vulnerability, but I'm keeping that saved for when some basic trust is built. There will also be more shallow things at the end (since we're working our way to the outside.)

I believe knowledge is the most special thing that we, as humans, can have. There's many types of knowledge, and many people out there who can really grasp one area of knowledge really well. This is how groups get their power. We have the potential to come together and each contribute something beautiful and significant. So it's about recognizing your individuality, but also about the beauty of the group.

Self knowledge is probably the most important. If you strive to know anything, it should be yourself. Learning and growing in self-knowledge is an ongoing process that never ends, and to me that's so exciting. It's an adventure that never ends. The more you learn about yourself, the better your life becomes, with the proper motivations to make progress, of course. For me, this introspection is so key. It's needed in my partner too, because I can't imagine going to him and telling him all my insights without him being able to reply thoughtfully and share his own. Being able to grow together is such a beautiful idea to me.

People fascinate me and touch my heart. I'm always trying to look deeper and explore the human experience (part of that is just my future-counselor mentality). They have such potential, and such powerful stories and experiences. I want to listen, to learn, to experience this life as fully as I can, and listening to people's stories is one of those ways for me to do that. Then the other part of my calling, I feel, is to uncover ways to help move them forward, to move us forward.

I fall for people fast. I love being in love, and I know that I do things much better when I have a romantic interest in my life. It's not that I require them to function, but they compliment and enhance my life in many ways. They also have the potential to heal and validate me from old wounds in ways that I personally can't.

Also, I feel I should be upfront: I have a physical disability. I'm more than happy to answer any questions you have (aside from “how do you wipe?” That's none of your concern.)

And the last deep thought is this one, done by Bo Burnham. This piece is easily the most moving to me: 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dQTZVnDE2Qw

Now for the more....shallow(?) stuff. I'd really like a guy who makes an effort to take care of himself and look nice (the slender/athletic types are my favorite.). I prefer more on the masculine side as well. Other than that, I think I'm pretty open to the different types, but twinks are my favorite, if I had a favorite.
I think this is all I can think to put up here. Feedback is greatly appreciated. I'm trying to make this a science. :D Thanks so much for reading. I look forward to your messages.",q4q
21[M4R]PA I want someone to lick my ass,PM me,q4q
[M4M/T] Northern CT - Young married guy looking to explore with someone experienced and dominant,"I am a recently married 26 year old white male looking to explore some of my more recent cock-based fantasies. This would be a first time for me and I don't want to rush into anything. 

I'm looking for someone 35+ with a kinky dominant side who is getting hard at the thought of turning this bi-curious boy into his bitch for the evening. I'd love a big cock but I'm open to smaller if we click right.

I am very open minded and would love some kind of roleplay scenario where I must take orders or face the punishment. You can dress me up however you'd like and use me for your pleasure. Only hard limits are no blood and scat. HMU if you're interested. I have pics to trade.",q4q
M4M- Looking to get bred in all 50 states,"Hey guys,

I am a 28 year old guy who has a new goal of getting bred in all 50 states by a guy from that state. Obviously willing to travel.

I'm 5'11 170 brown hair and eyes average build. Pretty wild in the sack.",q4q
[M4A] Western PA looking for my first bisexual experience,"21yo guy looking for a couple or man to guide me through my bisexual urges. PM me if you wanna talk more about it!
",q4q
25/27 [MM4M] Suffolk LI.,"Hi guys,

Two in shape/attractive guys here looking to experiment. Never had a threesome before but we are very interested. We can travel but preferably within our county. Hit me up if you're interested!",q4q
M4M Winnipeg 26 Geeky Guy,"I want to see what's out there in the frigid barren wasteland we call Winnipeg.  
  
I am a geeky guy: comic books, video games, MtG.  I also work out, and go to stand up comedy shows.  Well adjusted boy next door type.  Looking for similar kind of guy, everything is on the table.  
  
Stats? 6'0 - 167lbs - Average/Slim - Hipster Glasses - Brown Everything   
*Str 3  
*Per 5  
*End 5  
*Chr 5  
*Int 8  
*Agl 6  
*Luck 6  
  
",q4q
23 [M4M/T] Boston MA/NH area – Curious straight jock wants to experiment with cock,"In shape tall jock type looking to experiment with sucking cock, being submissive to another man. Possibly getting fucked if we click.
",q4q
(M4m) San Francisco visitor,In town visiting. Bigger bear bottom. 25 years old. Tight ass. I Would like a secret meet up. Anyone near the marina down?,q4q
20 [F4F] Southeast US - Looking to see if we click,"Hey! I'm a 20 year old college student (History major) who loves Drake, Gilmore Girls, Taylor Swift, trashy reality television, and PBS American Experience documentaries. I also play guitar and love photography (and pretty much all mediums of it. Right now I'm super into buying old Polaroids off eBay.) My interests are a little bit all over the place, but that just means we probably have at least one thing in common! I'm a curvy redhead with a cute face and an awesome sense of style... but your picture gets mine.

PM me if you are down with chatting, being friends, and maybe something more if we vibe.",q4q
25 M4M I want an experience.,Im straight/curious. Looking to experiment with another mans penis.,q4q
"31 [M4M/T] Lawrenceville, GA - Looking for a FWB","Hey gang.  I'm a goofy, geeky, bi/pansexual, bear-type guy, in a polyish marriage, looking a friend to have fun with.

I'm into gaming (tabletop/PS4 mostly), music, TV/movies, acting, being a bear, etc.  6'6"" (no really), reddish brown hair, green eyes, beard. 

I don't really have a type I'm looking for, although anyone falling somewhere in the gender-fuckery spectrum is pretty much my favorite thing of all things. Must love unbearable bear puns. Bi a plus (my wife would like to be involved occasionally).  Ultimately, we're looking for a third for our relationship, but really just looking meet some fun people right now.",q4q
"27 [M4A] Curious, straight guy in Maine with a high sex drive looking for someone to chat and explore with.",Basically what the title says. I'm straight but very curious and very open to new things. Local is cool but I like making new friends so it does not matter where you are from. Send me a message and spark my interest.    ,q4q
27 [mf4mff] -Couple or f,,q4q
"33 [M4M] Orange County, CA - Friends With Benefits?","Only been with one guy so far, but he was strictly bottom. While it was nice, it's not really what I want from another guy. I want someone whom I can be friends with, but have it go that extra mile now and again if the mood strikes. 

Myself, I am 5'11, with red hair, beard, blue eyes and I'm around 145 lbs last I checked. When i'm not working for a shipping company, I love playing video games, going for drives, listening to music (just about anything really, just not a huge country fan), and am a bit of a Star Wars nerd. 

As for what i'm looking for? Body hair is a bit of a turn off, even though I myself am not completely hairless. Less is definitely better, though. Obviously I want to find someone into similar stuff as myself, and someone around my same age or younger would be ideal. ",q4q
"28,26 &amp; 26 [MMM4M] West Palm Beach, Florida","We're a pair of average guys wondering who's in the area. 28 y/o Asian panda bear and 26 y/o Caucasian sensation, together for 5 years, looking to possibly make some magic with another 26 y/o otter bottom buddy.",q4q
24 [M4M] O.C. Questioning sexuality and exploring,"Like the title says im questioning my sexual and i wanna explore it more to confirm if i am bisexual or not.This is not a Booty Call! I'd like to find someone to help me explore the other side in an intimate way. I am looking for someone who i can be friends with and hang out, with a casual sexual relationship, where there's no drama and no emotional attachment. Basically a friends with benefit.
I prefer White or Asian, who's down to earth and doesn't talk or act like a girl. Your a guy act like one, if i wanted someone feminine id be looking for a women. Someone who can interchange between dom and subs but more sub would be nice, being only one is just not fun. Im looking for explore everything not just a quickie, thought sometimes quickies are fun. Id like to start out as friends and a progression from there.
If you think we can connect and be friends send me a message with a pict, we can go from there, your picture gets mine, and i will answer any questions anybody has to ask.",q4q
27 [F4F] Phoenix and surrounding areas - I want to please you...,"I've been searching for so long to pleasure another woman that my desire is bursting at the seams...I want to touch you softly with my fingertips, run my fingers through your hair, and kiss your soft neck, I want to slowly bring my hand up your inner thigh and tease you through your panties...and so much more. I want to take you over the edge over and over again until you're moaning for me to stop. You won't even have to do anything but lay back and enjoy yourself, and give me some feedback ;) Does this sound like something you want? Trust me when I say that this is about the only thing I want right now, to pleasure you. PM me if you'd like to not only chat, but make this happen.",q4q
"[MM4M 43, 37] NoVA couple looking for cub/bear types","Couple looking for fun times with cub/bear/otter/daddy types.

Especially into guys with hairy legs and ass who love to have it rimmed and double-teamed.  A HUGE plus if you're uncut.

Big bonus if you're into (at least giving) WS.",q4q
m4a 30 minnnesota,bi guy who likes to try new things!  Hit me up if intrigued!,q4q
M4M 45 Reading PA,Looking for friends to hang out with and see how things go from there.,q4q
Looking for RP of anykind with anyone:),I like everything except scat and gore so bring it on!!! I love incest and rapeplay and petplay :) whatever you want hehe,q4q
"23 [m4m] OC, California. Bear looking for relationship/friends","6 FT. 290 LB. Blue Eyes, Shaved head, Beard . Big nerd and gamer as well as educated and goal oriented. Looking to make some new friends in the area or more possible.",q4q
"[M 4 F/M] 20 year old, looking for anything in Marquette, Michigan.",Horny bisexual college student. Skinny/athletic.,q4q
"Boone, NC 24 m4r: Looking for someone to play with, online or in person","I'm a senior at Appstate. I'm an easy going person who spends most of his time studying or surfing the web. I'm pretty shy around new people, so my social life here hasn't done well so far. 

I have a long distance boyfriend (edit: we're open), but am rather lonely here. I'm a pansexual male looking for anyone around my age. I'm interested in anything from messages and pictures, to phone sex, or meeting in person (taking things a touch slowly in person, of course, to make sure we're compatible and comfortable with each other.) In person I'd be interested in anything from simple casual sex to a full relationship.

I'm versatile, though I only have experience as a bottom. I'm also a switch, if you're kinky, though I'm fairly inexperienced in that regard.",q4q
19 [T4R] Southeast Wisconsin - I'm looking for more friends to meet/text!,"I feel lonely a lot and I figured I would come here and try to meet people! I am transgender, but I'm pre-everything still sadly (my gender assigned at birth was male). I play video games a lot, a lot of WiiU currently, and absolutely love music, I collect CD's and Vinyls! I will be heading back to college in SouthWestern Wisconsin soon though! I'm really bad at thinking of what else to write about me, I have always been bad with that, so if sound interesting message me?",q4q
29 [M4M/T] Long Island looking to experiment,Attractive (if slightly chubby) guy looking for someone on LI to have some fun with and try something new.  Message me if interested. ,q4q
19 [M4M] - looking to suck a dick regularly in Montreal,"title says it all, im a kinda a twink, indian looking to suck and possibly get fucked,. Can wear panties or bras if you have any ",q4q
Tucson [m4m] 29 bottom,"I am a 29 year old bottom, looking for a dick to suck and then fuck me.  PM me and we can exchange pics and talk. Posting here because I hope to find a redditor who is better than some average guy on other services :) ",q4q
22 [M4M] - looking for my first in Columbus,still a virgin and ive always fantasized about having a man use me. If interested or want more feel free to pm me.,q4q
20 [M4M] Tampa. Let me suck your dick.,"Title. Looking for a friend who I can occasionally suck off, and have you return the favor.",q4q
21 [M4M] Romania. Looking for a mate.,"If anyone from Romania, or knows somebody, redirect him here.",q4q
25 [m4m] New and Curious.Let's have some fun!,looking to explore and need a fun guide ;) trying to be open to whatever you tell me to,q4q
25 [M4M] New York - Fuck my bottom boyfriend and try to steal him from me,"I'm the top in a relationship with quite honestly one of the most beautiful guys I've ever met, but sadly, over the three years we've been together, our sex life has basically gone to shit. I know it's mostly because of me (I have some stresses in my life that are keeping me from being sexual), because he could pretty much get pounded any day of the week (he loves anal). I think he's also used to much bigger guys (I'm around 4.5, 5 inches) so he's had to adjust what he expects out of sex, and that makes me feel disappointed.

To remedy this and to feel somewhat better, I want you to fuck my boyfriend. I'm not going to set anything up though, I want you to seduce him while we're out at a bar, or wherever. I want this to open organically, feel the pain of losing him to you when he decides he'd rather sit on your dick than mine.

He's 5'8, White/Latin, thin, with a bubble ass.",q4q
"25 Agender for M or T; Someone to talk to, maybe more.","I'm a bit of an odd one: I prefer masculine pronouns or none at all, want to be intersex, physically, and am in the process of HRT to appear more masculine. I enjoy gaming, drawing, writing, roleplaying, linguistics, Astrology, and am in the process of writing a Strategy RPG. I'll turn 26 in January; proud Capricorn.

I'm a Demisexual individual, so there has to be some kind of chemistry--which is why I want to talk. I'm extremely easygoing, but don't do small-talk well; let's discuss ideas or fandoms... or let's roleplay. I have a slew of characters that don't get nearly enough action.

I want to chat mainly over-the-internet, but would very much like to meet in person, eventually. I am generally more attracted to males and transmen, but I'm not going to automatically rule anyone out.

I live in East Michigan with my partner; we are polyamorous and looking for, preferably, another couple or perhaps the right third. I like to discuss sexuality, but in a detached, objective sort of way--making a move on me is probably not going to go like you'd hope before there's any kind of personal attachment.

I prefer to chat over Skype. PM for details.",q4q
19 [M4M] SF East Bay - Any bicurious guys out there?,"Looking to help a curious guy explore his sexuality. I'm bi myself so I know my way around and I want to help someone explore ;) Other guys around my age feel free to message me, I'd also love to start an ongoing thing fwb type thing. I'm a college student, 5'11'' with a slim build. Please be around the Concord, Pittsburg, Walnut Creek area.",q4q
24 [T4M] lonely FTM in Alabama,"Hello! I'm a FtM transgender guy in Tuscaloosa, AL and i've had lots of trouble finding anyone interested in someone like me. Maybe it's the curse of living in the south- whenever I post personal ads people always assume i'm a trans woman. Anyway, I'm posting this in the hopes that I can reach out to the hidden cult of bros interested in other types of men.

A little about me: I'm white, average build, kinda short, and pretty hairy. I'm androgynous, but masculine. I have first and second hand proof that i'm pretty good looking but I will provide pictures via PM just to prove it to you. My main hobbies include video games (nintendo mostly) and having fun in the real world. 420 friendly. If things get serious I might even let you see my actual reddit account instead of hiding behind a throwaway.

Sexual stuff: bottom4life, but i do like being a top sometimes. I enjoy kink/BDSM, but vanilla isn't a dealbreaker. If you've been wondering, I have a vagina that I sometimes use.. but I enjoy anal more. If you want to be disappointed, I give horrible head.

Even if you're just curious, send me a polite PM and I'll be happy to chat about anything.
",q4q
24 M4M hudson valley NY area. looking for some fun,im mainly just looking for a cuddle session maybe some jerking off. please hit me up if interested. i prefer someone hairy between ages 22 and 35 but really im not picky. again send message if interested.,q4q
24 M4M hudson valley NY area. looking for some fun,im mainly just looking for a cuddle session maybe some jerking off. please hit me uup if interested. i prefer someone hairy between ages 22 and 35 but really im not picky. again send message if uinterested. ,q4q
25/24 [MM4M] San Diego - Gay Couple Looking for a Third (xpost from /r/SoCalR4R),"Hi /r/q4q! We're a college-aged gay couple in SD, and we're looking to explore the world of threesomes. Ideally, we'd like to get to know you a bit better before getting raunchy. A little bit about us:

* 24, bottom: 5'11"", ~140 lbs, average cock. Loves giving and receiving oral, and getting pounded anally. Ears and nipples are sensitive.
* 25, top: 5'8"", ~140 lbs, above-average dick. Loves giving and receiving oral. Ears and nipples are extremely sensitive. Really enjoys pleasing his partner.
* We are both from mixed ethnic backgrounds, moderately good-looking, and fit (hit the gym 2-3 times per week).

* What we're looking for: a relatively and mutually attractive, vers/top. We have no preference when it comes to height or ethnicity.

We live together in our own apartment, so we can host. We'd like to meet you for coffee first though, so please PM us if you're interested!",q4q
21 [M4M] Arlington VA/DC Looking to try Things Out,"Hey all, I'm a 21 year old male who lives in Arlington and goes to school in the area.  I'm new to this whole thing but have fantasized about it for years so I would like to make the leap and try it out.  

I'm 6' tall, and thin (around 160-170).  I love to go for runs and am primarily an outdoors person when not studying or working. 
You can PM me or Kik me, and I am 420 friendly.

Kik: DLukeye
(pictures available)

",q4q
F4F in Atlanta or B'ham for my 1st,"My husband gave me consent to flirt, meet, date, fuck a girl... I'm nervous but excited!!! ",q4q
M4M in Ohio,"Hey handsome, hit me up. I am looking for someone to hang with in North-Eastern Ohio. Will share pics, so neither side gets disappointed. Gaymer at heart, farmboi by birth. Let me plant it deeper ?
",q4q
26 [m4T] looking for my first time,"I've always wanted to try being with a tgirl, if there are any in the area looking to have some fun pm me. 26 attractive, in shape, decently hung. ",q4q
"(San Jose,CA) Gaymer Top ISO Gaymer Bottom",,q4q
38 M4M NYC turned on by tons of freckles,"I am bicurious and find freckle faces really cute. Anyone out there covered in freckles? Would love to chat with you, maybe hang out. I'm 5'11, brown hair into geeky stuff and I also have freckles. ",q4q
Looking in wv or south west va,"Very minimal experience, looking for a guy to have fun with, wouldn't mind a regular.  Willing to try most anything. ",q4q
24 M4M looking to experiment in East Michigan,"Like title says, i'm looking for a guy to experiment with in Michigan. Let me know if you're interested.",q4q
Anyone in El Paso?,"wm looking for someone to chat, sext, maybe meet with.  I'm a professional man with a lot of friends around town and need to be discreet.  Hope to hear from you.",q4q
27 year old crossdressing married man looking for someone to hang out with.,I am looking for someone who I can hang out with and watch football games and go hiking with and is also ok with me crossdressing. If you would like to talk just PM me. ,q4q
19 [M4R] San Francisco Bay Area - ltr/fwb,"I'm a student majoring in Computer Science and hopefully I'll be transferring to an amazing university sometime next fall. (I'm a cc student). Big gamer, though school hasn't given me much time. That'll probably change some time in November when Smash 4 comes out haha i guess you could call me a big nerd then, cause I like anime/manga, reading, etc. I also enjoy outdoorsy stuff like mountain biking and hiking. I'm usually not one to shy away from a challenge :p
 
Ideally, I would like to find someone I connect with, possibly an ltr. I'm also open to the idea of a fwb, but I'd like to get to know you a little before we do anything. I'm bi, so anyone interested feel free to reply. Ideally, you would be 18 - 24 and close by. ",q4q
32 [M4F] Vermont- Looking to get pegged,"Hi all. Southern, VT guy here looking for a women to fulfill my pegging fantasy. I've done it before and really enjoyed it and would love to find a regular thing. So if you are around and want to get freaky let me know and PM me. Thanks.",q4q
22 [M4A] Long Island submissive looking for a fwb/ltr,"Hey I'm from Suffolk, Long Island and it's so hard to find any type of meaningful relationship so I figured I'd see if this gives me any luck.

I'm 5'11 180 fit a very kinky and open minded individual. I identify myself as a pansexual. I'm a normal acting guy when you met me but I can be quite the feminine submissive when needed ;) I'm a switch for females/fem acting males but prefer to be submissive it's my comfort zone hehe. Anywho I dont know if Im typing too much so Ill leave it at that. 

If you are interested please get back to me &lt;3 ",q4q
Sissy trans M2F looking for a female who would like to peg me,"I am in Albuquerque, New Mexico, slowly beginning to transition M2F, using meds that have feminizing effects, seeking an open minded female who would enjoy pegging me, and other naughty, kinky stuff like Hotwife, cuckolding, feminization, large objects and large dildos, feminization.",q4q
37 [M4A] WI - Questioning and looking for people to talk to about being trans*/*queer (x-post r/MeetLGBT),"Hey everyone. I really want to explore my identity, both gender-wise and sexuality, and maybe break out of this confusion. And I thought, hey, why not make some friends at the same time! I'd like to know others' experiences, and if not comfy sharing, maybe just hang out and have a drink and get to know each other.

If interested, drop me a PM, we'll talk.
",q4q
18 [M4M] mid Wales/West Midlands - Guys 18-28 for hookup!;),"Hey I'm 5ft9, Blonde, Blue Eyes, 150lbs from Mid Wales looking for guys between 18 and 28! Message me if you're interested for some fun! ;)

http://imgur.com/IWzx7P9?desktop=1",q4q
"26 [M4M] in Canada, looking for friendly people to chat with","Hey:) I love to talk about sex and all aspects of it. Personally very much into prostate toys as well, love to discuss that with others that appreciate it",q4q
31 [F4F] Virginia - looking for something discreet,"Female based in Roanoke, VA (but willing to travel within reason) looking for discreet friends with benefits relationship.  Looking for other women only.",q4q
27 panty wearing bi curious male looking for a friend. Hershey,Hey I'm 26 around the hershey area. I live to wear women's underwear and lingerie and would like to find someone that also does or appreciates it. W/m around 140.,q4q
M4M bottom looking to chat/skype,,q4q
"25 [m4a] portland, Looking for friends, maybe more","Portland, OR. just for clarification
Hi everyone I'm a nerdy bisexual guy who is going to moving up to the portland area next month and hoping to make some new friends. I am generally more of a bottom when it comes to relations i've had with men. and i've been described as a bit of a bear. 

I like movies, food, i'm an avid gamer table top and video, I like good conversation and i'm also extremely shy. It's why i'm posting here i want to talk with people before I meet them. 

and well making new friends is my number one priority but hey if something more comes of it awesome.",q4q
24 [M4F] DC/MD/VA - Kinky bi guy looking for pegging partner,Looking for an open minded queer girl to chill and go on adventures with (both sexual and otherwise).,q4q
"(San Jose, CA) Gaymer4Gaymer",Bear gaymer here looking to dominate a submissive gaymer twink. PM if intrested. No rush. Please be neg. I am ddf and clean. ,q4q
27m4T in Florida,"Hello there,

I'm a 27 year old bisexual guy. I've been with men and women but have always had a huge desire to fool around with a ftm or mtf. Let me know if your interested in florida",q4q
London [MM4M] professional couple for bottom,Mid thirties professional London couple for fit younger bottom for an ongoing relationship. Lets trade pics and chat further. You must be DDF and clean. Adventurous is ++,q4q
"22 [m4m] San Diego, CA - Looking for a friend and or boyfriend.","Hello :) I am 22 year old bisexual male that is finishing up college. I'm looking for males around my age or a bit older, preferably gay or bisexual.

I'd love to start out by becoming friends, having coffee every so often and see where things lead--ltr would be nice.

I enjoy reading news/novels in Spanish, tap dancing, listening to jazz music, taking random adventures during the day, and spending hours in a library. What are you into? 

In terms of guys, I tend to gravitate towards otters, cubs, geeks, and jocks but, I am not one to be held down by my preferences. If you're interested, feel free to send me a PM.",q4q
m4m in Philadelphia area,"hey just seeing what is out there.

i would love to maybe meet up with another guy in the area to talk and what not...",q4q
"22 m4m UK, London, Looking for an inexperienced gay/bi/bicurious friend to talk to","Hi, I'm mostly straight and firmly in the closet. I want someone to talk to and share with who is going through similar feelings and experiences. 

I enjoy pc gaming, a few books now and then, and I love going for a pint. I'm a big fan of film and work in IT.

Feel free to contact me if you've gotten this far, I'm very relaxed and (I hope) easy to talk to. 

Thanks!",q4q
"28 M4M London UK, up for fun in person and online",,q4q
24 M4M or MF - West LA - Looking to explore with a guy or couple on my free weekend,"This is my only free weekend for a long time. I'm looking to explore with a guy or a couple. I'm 6'1"", 160lbs, and have been reserved to try this, but my curiosity is taking over. PM me if interested.",q4q
22 f4f central Alabama,"Hi there, I'm a girl who likes girls and is having trouble finding someone in my area through okc/tinder/whatever. I'd love to chat with you and am hoping for a short-term thing. ",q4q
"27 male Florida looking for friends/relationship, even long distance","Where you're from doesn't matter, as long as you're cool to talk to and over 18.

I'm a gay dude who is really into sports and video games, looking for gay guys to chat with and get to know. Relationships or friendships are the preference here.

Message me and we'll figure out a way to chat!",q4q
"21/male/ san jose, ca :) looking for a cool guy to play with/ secret lover","hey everyone, Im a chill, down to earth kind of guy. I'll keep this short. Im just looking to reach out to other guys in my area. Im in south san jose around oak ridge mall.  I'm looking for a guy to hang out with swap head and maybe more :) I have pics of myself on my profile if you wanna know how I look.  please PM if interested.  I hope to hear from someone :) 

Skype:
Flower_Sky408",q4q
"31 [M4FM] NYC/Brooklyn- Looking for two other people for a fun, light, interesting arrangement","Hi, my name is Greg. I'm a heteroflexible M, 31, live in WBurg, looking for another guy (gay, bi, heteroflexible) and a woman (gay, bi, heteroflexible) interested in a MMF arrangement. I love making out and oral with hot guys while a woman watches. Whether she wants to join in eventually is up to her. Ideally the evening would begin with some drinks and conversation, maybe dancing. And hopefully if things go well, we'd take it back to my apartment.
If this intrigues you, message me and I'll send you a few SFW photos and maybe you'll think I'm cute enough to play with.",q4q
20 M4M Pittsburgh PA,"I've never been with a guy but I'm in desperate need of trying new things with an open minded guy. We'll have to take it slow of course but if anyone in the area is interested, inbox me. Oh btw I'm 5'11 160 in pretty good shape.",q4q
"[GenderFluid4A] Seeking anyone who is satanic, or follows the left hand path. Or just anyone :p. East Tennessee or anywhere.","Hello, as the title said I am looking for Satanist, I would rely like to meet spiritual, theistic, or Luciferian Satanist but really I would like to meet anyone who identifies as a Satanist. I am a spiritual Satanist myself. Ii believe in ones individual mind over the group mentality. We can go into our satanic thoughts later though. Any one who is Pagan, Wicca, or anything following the left hand path as well. 

Away from my religion I am a normal person really I love video games, Pokemon, Zelda, Elderscrolls, and Fallout are my favorite series.  I am extremely involved in my community I am currently starting a community theater with the hopes of bring a artistic outlet to my struggling community. I love reading probably read over 50 biography's.  

I would very much like to meet someone who is open to a person that wants to constantly better themselves. Someone who is romantic, sweet, open with their emotions, and loves to fall in love. 


I have just turned twenty, however I do not believe that age really means anything. 
Another thing you should know is that I am a gender fluid individual.  I do try and dress as a girl some times, and it should be noted that in no way am I passable. I would like to meet someone who would like to help me explore this area of my life however.

Well any way I would love to hear from you sometime.",q4q
"[M4R] 22 year old in Utah looking to fulfill some fantasies, bi-sexual, submissive.","22 year old male. I can do a standing back flip. 5'10"". Looking to get fucked in the ass or pegged. Preferably while wearing a dress or skirt. 

Down for almost anything else, too. 

I'm definitely more submissive and like it on the bottom but I'm a bit of switch :)

Can link to my main account.

^^^^^^^butI'mavirginsoyeah ^^^^^^^^:(",q4q
22 [M4M] Looking for bi friend on long island,"He there I'm new to this but i'm a bi male looking for another guy to fool around with somewhere on the island, preferably Suffolk county. I'd like it if you were around my age something between 21 and 23. Please respond with a picture if you can ",q4q
24 M4M London. Looking for a jackoff buddy,"Completely NSA, and not romantic. I think Im a relatively good looking guy. Shoot me a pm if interested :)",q4q
27m looking for male/female Atlanta [sissy-ish],"I'm not a ""full blown"" sissy.  I just like being more of the girl in the relationship.  I like alot of girly stuff too but you wouldn't know likely unless i were to have told you (and i just have! lol) Feel free to PM me to chat/questions/whatever.",q4q
"19, Dallas/Denton TX, Friends w/ possibility of future benefits?","Hey guys!

I'm bi-curious, but have no idea how to meet other gay or bi guys outside of the internet...

I'm looking for a guy, girl, really whoever I can hang out with, and if the sexual attraction is there, see what happens if you catch my drift.

Basically, a friend with the possibility of future benefits.

I'm 19, white, athletic with a beard. I enjoy fishing, hunting, and just chillin playing xbox. 

Just send me a PM! ",q4q
32 [M4A] bi bottom looking for tops in Tel Aviv.,"Hi boys! I'm a chubby 32year old in Tel Aviv. I'm not too experienced, but I know that I love kussing, sucking cock, and getting fucked. What more is there to say? Ask, and I shall tell!",q4q
32 [M4A] bi bottom looking for tops in Tel Aviv.,"Hi boys! I'm a chubby 32year old in Tel Aviv. I'm not too experienced, but I know that I love kussing, sucking cock, and getting fucked. What more is there to say? Ask, and I shall tell!",q4q
M4CD/T (Anyone who identifies as female really) 19 So Cal,I'm just seeing what is out there. Preferably we just talk and see if we click. A no pressure sort of thing. I am a pretty introverted person so hopefully someone similar? Even if you aren't perhaps we can still get along. I don't particularly care about age or location. I would prefer to meet eventually and if you live closer that would be easier. I look forward to hearing from all of you!,q4q
25m4m masculine guy in the south looking for someone to talk with,"Hey everyone. Kinda new to all this

Uh about me, im 25, into fitness, 6'3, dark hair and eyes. Im pretty masculine, i guess im into youd say more twink or fem like guys. Anything else ya wanna know, just ask. Im into skype, chat, etc. pm me",q4q
27 M4CD/T,I travel all over the united states for work but i call so cal and las vegas home. Looking for someone to get to know and chat with...hopefully it can grow to a relationship of some kind.,q4q
23 M4M/T Looking to skype with bear/older men,Pm me please! :),q4q
"26 [M4M, M4T], Philadelphia Suburbs looking for something new","Hey Philadelphia and surrounding area friends. I'm 26, white and from north of philly. I'm looking to text and maybe try something outside my usual routine. I'm kinda just looking for a cute guy/trans around my age to maybe text and have some casual fun. Message me and we'll go from there. I'm In okay shape and 6'1. Let's chat",q4q
30 [m4m] - curious in SF or LA,"I'm in SF a lot, and also LA. Curious for a first timer like me, who wants to fool around a bit, chat, etc. PM me?",q4q
[M4M] 30 Asian looking for older gentlemen for Friendship with benefits,"Hello Everyone (anyone?)
I am an Asian, former student that has had no contact with anyone due to my focusing on my education. I am trying to ease back into meeting people. I love older men.
PM me if you want to chat.",q4q
Hey guys.,"So it's pretty kinky for me. But I want to exchange pictures. That's right, THROUGH EMAIL! It's a huge turn on for me. Looking for a guy to show his ass just like I'll show mine. Shaved is a plus.",q4q
40M - m4m - looking for...,"Someone to hang with near Niles/Warren/Youngstown Ohio area. We can trade pics if you like. Hit me up, let's hang. I'm 40 with a swimmers build, but I work out with my nephews to stay in shape. Love cats, computers, the outdoors, video games, and oh...did I say computers...lol &lt;nerd&gt; Looking for friends at least, possibly more.",q4q
20 [m4m] Looking to explore and just have fun,"Love sitcoms, video games, and would love someone who can show me music. Dude, I would love to watch movies with you.",q4q
18 [q4q] Louisiana - looking to explore my bisexuality,I'm an 18 bi-curious male that is looking for another man to experiment with in person. If you are interested PM me.,q4q
[408] Gaymer bear 4 Gaymer twink,"22yro latino Dominate top gaymer looking for a submissive bottom gaymer. I am a bear who is looking for a twink to dominate and have fun with. I live in South San Jose and work in Sunnyvale. Lets get to know each other. In no rush. I am clean, DDF (420 friendly, I share). Lets hang out, play games, and shoot the shit and have some fun. Kik me or PM me and lets get to know each other

Glasses +

Open to any ethnicitys
Please be clean and safe
I am mobile and can host

Kik: BillyShears17",q4q
"33 [M4M] SF bay area. Looking for a jack-off buddy, maybe more.","I'm 33, 5'11"" 165, white guy, pretty good-looking. I'm Looking for someone interested in hanging out, maybe watching porn and jacking off, maybe trying some oral or body contact or really whatever, as long as it feels right for both of us.  I had a jack-off buddy in high-school and I've always sort of missed it, so I'm kind of looking for a similar vibe, low-pressure and fun.  Also I've been crossdressing a little bit so if that interests you maybe we could try some of that.  But it's not necessary.",q4q
"Kelowna 18yo bicurious m4m, looking to experiment as a bottom.","I'm looking for someone in the Kelowna, BC area to safely and descretely experiment with as a bottom. Send me a pm if youre interested ",q4q
M4M in Louisville,Looking to experiment. I'm in shape and handsome. Anyone?,q4q
19 [M4M] Vancouver - bicurious guy,Hey! Looking for some bicurious fun! Drop me a message! ,q4q
"24yo [m4m] East Orlando, Florida looking for fwb. Let's have some great fun?","Hello, 

My stats: 
24yo
White male
5'10""
215lbs 
6"" (cut)
Bisexual
50%dom/50%sub

I'm looking for a straight acting hottie. I live a stressful life and need someone to help relieve that stress via a sexual outlet. I'm not looking to create a relationship, although I would love for the sex to be hot, steamy, and passionate. However, perhaps we could eventually create a friendship (if that makes any sense) My goal is to have this last long-term. 

Unfortunately I'll never be able to host. This arrangement will always need to be discreet.

Ideally we would meet up to fuck, jerk off together, give each other BJ's, or fulfill each others fantasies (bondage really turns me on) or really whatever we feel like at the time. When were not doing this we would still be naked (the idea of naked male bonding fascinates me) shall we watch netflix in the nude? Also, if we ever felt like driving down to south Florida there is an nudist recreation center for people under 30 I wouldn't mind visiting sometime.  

My ideal fwb is a rugged guy with facial hair and tons of body hair and in decent athletic shape (I want a nice ripply set of abs to lick with a nice happy trail that leads down to your pubes. Another added bonus is foreskins. I find foreskins very arousing) I know my mister perfect exists out there somewhere. 

However, as stated by my stats at the beginning of the post, I'm a bit overweight. I won't lie, I'm extremely embarrassed and ashamed of my body. I want someone to help me feel better about myself. Perhaps we can be gym buddies? I would love to start visiting the gym a few times a week, but I don't want to do it alone. I have no idea what I'm doing and don't want to look like a fool. Nonetheless, I have managed to lose around 30lbs in the last couple months due to walking a lot more and diet change. Whatever, it's a starting point. If I could ever manage to find enough motivation, my goal is to have the well-sculpted body of a Greek god. ( at this point I don't think that will ever happen, but there's always hope)

Also, for the sake of posting it here is one of my bondage fantasies that would eventually be required to happen. 

I would love to be tied naked and spread eagle to the bed. One limb pointing at each corner. I want to be tied so tight I can't move a single fucking muscle. All I'll be able to do is inaudibly beg for mercy with a ball gag on my mouth. As I'm laying there completely naked I want you to strip naked and jump on top of me. Sit down on my stomach facing my genitals and completely block my view of the torture you're about to force me to endure. I want you to milk me until I'm about to cum, then stop. Edge me over and over again. Make it seem like hours. I WANT TO BEG FOR RELEASE! Finally let me have it, but don't stop. Go beyond the point where my penis becomes unbearably sensitive to touch (you know what I mean) and keep stroking. As I'm literally begging you to stop perhaps tears are forming in the corners of my eyes from the overstimulated nerve endings at the head of my cock. I want you to turn around momentarily and whisper in my ear ""isn't this what you asked for?"" You'll continue to keep stroking me as I plead for mercy. Finally I'll cum a second time. But Don't you dare stop under any circumstance until you get a second cumshot from me. 

Does this sound incredibly hot to you? If so, please contact me. This is my most desired fantasy!

",q4q
26 [m4m] Central Jakarta - Meet and hopefully more,"I'm a closet CD, so this is a longshot, but anyone in Jakarta please PM me",q4q
"26 [m4m] Long Island, New York - Bicurious","Never done anything with a guy, but looking to experiment. Looking to suck and get fucked, but down to try anything. You need to host.

I am 6' 175lbs in good shape. Don't know what I'm doing, but I want to learn.",q4q
"27 M4M vegas/so cal/slc, ive never touched a cock other than my own",Travel a lot and im a very currious guy. Not fat but I could lose a few pounds. Not looking for too much to start with but who know where it may lead. Another first timer would be great but someone who can really show me the ropes may be better.,q4q
29-m4m or m4t-SoCal/L.A. Looking to make friends (with benefits?),"kik - AlnBored 

6' Asian Man looking to chat, flirt, meetup?...send me a message",q4q
24 [F4F] NYC - Bi/flexible woman looking to explore more,"I've had experiences with women in the past and would love to cultivate a casual relationship for more fun. I'm 5'7"", dark hair, light eyes, fit but curvy (size 6), and light skin (though I'm not white). Looking for another femme bi female or girl who likes girls and is ok with a casual relationship. I'm normal, laid-back, love red wine, comedies, and into healthy living. Let's meet up, have some food, wine, and conversation and see where it leads us :) Pics welcome!",q4q
20 m4m norcal,Age/race/looks are an afterthought. Let's chat? :),q4q
[M4M] Los Angeles. bicurious looking to experiment.,Kik: sanfrisms,q4q
24F [F4F] Brampton/Toronto- Looking for someone with similar interest,"Hi, 24F, Bi-sexual. I'm looking for a lady to hangout with who shares similar interests or personality or a friends with benefits type of deal. I have very little experience with women. I'm only looking for WOMEN right now.

Things about me : I'm currently a student at U of T, (St.George).If your a U of T student huge plus but not a deciding factor. I don't have many hobbies but i do love video games , usually played on my PC , but not confined to it. I'm usually interested in co-op or FPS games. I enjoy knitting and other crafts such as crochet, fitness , 420 friendly. I try to learn new things all the time and would be interested in trying new things with you. I'm not sure what else to write here but if you want to know more about me send me a PM.
",q4q
"18 [M4A] San Francisco East Bay - Looking for a friend, possible FWB/LTR","I am a college student majoring in computer science. Looking for someone around my age for a friendship, maybe can become an LTR but if not a FWB is still nice. I'm bi so anyone can feel to PM me :)",q4q
30 [M4M] San Francisco/Los Angeles,"I'm in SF a lot, and also LA. Curious for a first timer like me, who wants to fool around a bit, chat, etc. PM me.",q4q
21 [M4M] NYC - Looking for another student to experiment with,College student in the city looking for a FWB to try things out with. Drop me a line if you are in a similar situation. :),q4q
"[m4m] 21 american in Bremen, Germany","Just moved to Bremen recently to attend University.  I'm mainly looking for a friend/fwb.  I'm not opposed to a LTR, but we'd have to see where that goes.  I'm pretty masculine, thin/fit, good looking etc.  We can talk more if you're interested!",q4q
24 [m4mf] [m4m] Looking to experiment with another guy or a guy and girl in LA area.,Curious about giving a blow job and receiving anal. Looking for someone with similar interests. ,q4q
24 [F4F] DMV,"bisexual female with very little experience with women looking for a friends with benefits situation to explore my sexuality further. My preference is for a woman, but I'd be lying if I said I wasn't open to anything. PM me if interested!",q4q
18 [M4M] Washington - seeking somebody with similar values (x-post r4r),"I am a highly focused student looking for somebody who is passionate about social change. I'm interested in multicultural studies, personal development, personality theory, education, and civic engagement. I work at my school in a position that deals with advocacy and social justice, through interaction with students and representation on college governance committees.

I would like to find somebody ready to explore a stable, growth-oriented relationship. I am not interested in anything casual right now. Location isn't a big deal to me - I can travel for the right person.",q4q
Dutch bear 38 looking for fun times CA/NV (or Netherlands),"Dutch bigger bear, 38, 5'9 225lbs. 

Traveling around CA and NV (basically SF-Sac-Reno-LV-SD-LA) 2/25 through 3/18. Looking for chasers, younger guys, couples or fellow bears for anything from coffee to sexy times. 

edit 27/2: will be in the Sacramento area for the next few days",q4q
"21 M4M in SD, CA - Looking for a friend w/ the intention of a LTR.","I'd love to meet a cool guy, become friends, and see where it goes from there. PM if you're interested :)",q4q
"29 m4m Louisville,ky",I'm very discreet looking to try new things!,q4q
"35 [M4M] Birmingham, AL","I will have a hotel room in Downtown Birmingham on the 25th if anyone wants to come play.
35 mwm
5.11
175
7 Cut
",q4q
"23 [M4M] San Diego, CA - I'm bi-curious. My girlfriend wants to watch me experiment","The title pretty much says it all. But for those who like elaboration:  
I'm a 23 year old guy. I'm slightly curious about being intimate with another guy.My girlfriend is 24. She likes gay porn, and thinks it'd be hot to watch me experiment. ***SHE WILL NOT BE PARTICIPATING, JUST WATCHING*** If you're local, and you *can host*, please, post here, or shoot me a message with a picture, and your ideas. We're hoping that whoever satisfies this for us is pleasant enough we'll want to have repeat encounters.

Personally, I'm curious about sucking, getting sucked, fucking, and getting fucked. However, my gf's fantasy involves me being serviced, without returning the favor(s). I'm sure if we find you eligible to meet, we'll be able to compromise somewhere. ",q4q
"23(m4m) - Anyone in Portland, OR/Metro area?","Hey pretty new to all of this stuff but would like to find some others that are new to all this too. Not really sure what all to put but i'm athletic, love being outside, all that. Looking for friends but not opposed to some experimenting if your down. PM me if interested.",q4q
"21, bi-curious male looking for someone in the Detroit metro area","Pretty self explanatory, I'm a 21 year old male in the metro Detroit area looking for a fuck buddy. I have no experience with another man, but I'm willing to try almost anything. PM me if you're interested.",q4q
"31 [F4F] Northern Virginia - Attractive, fit soccer mom for same","I'm a married, white mom who keeps herself in good shape, been told I'm quite attractive, very nice body, if I do say so myself, who's looking to meet a new friend in my area (I'm in Prince William County, but can certainly travel around NoVa). I'd like to meet someone like myself - keeps herself in good shape, is a settled mom, someone I could be friends with, but also someone who's interested in exploring a bit. I've played around with a woman in the past, but it was a while ago (almost ten years), and lately I've been thinking about giving it another shot, before I'm too old and boring ;)

You should be educated and intelligent, enjoy having a drink on occasion, should be completely clean and safe, should enjoy shopping, museums, coffee, movies, bars, the usual :) Redheads and Asian women are a big plus, younger than me is fine, but please be at least as emotionally mature as a 30-something :)",q4q
24 [m4m] looking for friends/fun in Virginia,"hey guys, i'm just looking to chat on here for now. my stats: 24yo 6ft 160lbs athletic blond 7''cut vers/bottom. Mostly interested in talking to other guys who are in decent shape and might want to trade some pics (I have some posted to this account already.) Definitely up for friends or more if you live in my area. So yea.. hit me up!",q4q
20 F4F Looking for something real in PA,"I'm a college student in a small town who is getting frustrated trying to find another girl who likes girls out here. I'm looking for a lady who can appreciate my goofy sense of humor, Chinese takeout, cuddles, and jamming out to 90's alternative rock. Shoot me a message if you fit the bill and we'll see where it goes from there.  :) Pic4pic",q4q
25 M4M bicurious experimentation in Pittsburgh,"25 year old male in pittsburgh, I've never done anything with another guy but am curious to experiment. i'm average height and run or lift every day so i'm in pretty good shape with a decent-sized cock.
i'm looking for a discreet guy in the same situation who is also fit(abs are a huge plus for me), wants to do a little exploring, maybe massage each other, shower together and jerk each other off...then see where it goes after that if things seem to be going well?
PM me and we can trade pics and figure something out",q4q
26/f/WA [friendship/relationship/chat/whatever] Just lonely and need some friends in Vancouver/Portland! Maybe even a girlfriend? [x-post /r/meetpeople],"I moved to Vancouver, WA back in April and I've been focusing on my business (I make nail polish! Lucky 13 Lacquer) but I desperately need some friends in the area! I'm on IRC a lot and take some time to get comfortable around people but I'd love to go play board games or wander around the mall or something.

The tl;dr about me:

* Vegetarian and for a relationship hoping for someone who's at least mostly vegetarian. I still eat seafood occasionally (mostly in sushi) so I'm not going to be a pain about it.

* I love nail polish. It pays the bills and keeps my busy!

* I ride a motorcycle.

* I'm into a lot of fandoms (Doctor Who, Star Trek, Sherlock, LotR, Harry Potter, Firefly)

* 95% lesbian but overall queer/pansexual. Predominantly interested in ladies for a relationship but open to anyone for a friendship, though I tend to be more comfortable with women. I have zero issues with trans people and in fact I generally feel more comfortable around trans people. See the next point for why.

* Genderfluid-ish. I'm pretty comfortable on the feminine(ish) side of the gender spectrum but some days I feel downright boyish.

* Sober. Not into drugs at all and I've been working on a 6 pack of Mike's Hard Lemonade for about 9 months now. It's still half full.

* I love board/card games and video games. My favorite card game is currently Star Fluxx.

* I have a [kitty](http://i.imgur.com/gC6XR.jpg).

[My favorite recent pic](http://i.imgur.com/YmWFyqm.jpg) and [a fun trio](http://i.imgur.com/zb867jH.jpg) of pics from when I first got my hair cut.",q4q
"22 [M4M] (Houston, TX) Gym-rat academic, looking for a twinky foil","22-year-old Master's student here (English). Recently discovered a passion for the gym. Transplant from Waco, and I'm so glad I'm out--both from my hometown and of the closet. :P

I'm a huge fan of twinky guys--the snarky, sarcastic ones with a sensitive side. I'll dish it out right back atcha, so don't be shy about it, but also don't be afraid to communicate if things get rough. Being an academic, I'm a giant dork as well, so bear with me and my awkwardness on that and I promise you you won't regret it.

PM me if this sounds interesting to you, and hopefully things will go from there. :)",q4q
"m4m 24 DC/VA/MD sub, fem bottom looking for dom, masc top","Hi there, looking for a local man who knows how to treat a fit, slutty cocksucker. ",q4q
"Bear 4 Twink (San Jose, CA)","Looking for a submissive twink that I can dominate here in the 408

PM me",q4q
26 [M4M] Philly suburbs. Looking for a femme guy or cd,"
Hey Philadelphia friends. I'm 26, white and from north of philly. I'm looking to text and maybe try something outside my usual routine. I'm kinda just looking for a cute guy around my age to maybe text and have some casual fun. Message me and we'll go from there. I'm In okay shape and 6'1. Let's chat
",q4q
Minneapolis [M4M/F/T] looking or someone nearby to party with,"Well, reddit, my 21st birthday is coming up. Just within the last year have I been able to recognize and come to terms with my sexuality, so I figured for my 21st I'd go to a gay bar just for shits and gigs seeing as  I've never been to one. I'd love to meet someone there, or meet up somewhere else and go. Interested in anybody interesting, don't really care what ya look like. As for me, I'm an atheist, pothead, musician, pansexual, and a liberal. Your conservative parents worst nightmare. If anybody is interested in hanging out and seeing where it goes, be it friends or elsewhere, pm me. Thanks",q4q
M4A 21M Looking to skype?,"21M A little chubby and inexperienced

Hi everyone, I am still very new to this, but I am looking for someone to skype with. No faces, but look at and talk dirty to each other while we do things to ourselves. 

PM me please",q4q
37 [m4m] Northern California gay guy looking for sock fans,"Basically I have a sock fetish. I like wearing them when I'm horny, and I like seeing other guys wearing them. I like athletic socks, sports brands, white with colored stripes, and pretty much any length.

I prefer guys who are my age or younger, relatively smart, mature, good sense of humor, relaxed, independent, attractive. Cis and trans guys are all welcome.

Message me if any of this interests you. It would be fun to meet up with someone, but we can just chat if we're far apart or not a good match.

To be clear, I don't identify much with the foot fetish, so be aware of that if you contact me.",q4q
"22 [M4M] Chicago Northwest Suburbs. College guy here, curious and wondering if anyone here wants to explore with me","Hey everyone, I'm a regular curious guy and looking for someone similar who would be willing to get together and have some fun. I haven't done anything really with guys before so I think it would be nice for someone in my boat to join me in figuring out stuff together. I'm 22, nice, 6' tall, skinny (165lbs), I think the internet would call me an otter but I trim. I'd prefer if you were a handsome and in shape college aged guy but I'm open minded so hit me up if you want to. DDF is a must. Let me know if you're interested!",q4q
39 [m4m] Nebraska - looking for fwb,"Married, have played with a few guys but nothing intense. Would love to find some around my age, to have some relaxed and safe fun with. Available to meet anyone in Omaha or Lincoln. Feel free to follow me, and let's chat.",q4q
"24 [M4M, M4MF] SF Bay Area First timer looking to explore with a guy solo or in a MMF threesome.","I want to try to give a blow job. I think it would be fun to try it for the first time with a girl doing it with me. If it's just me and another guy though, I would still be interested. I'm 6 foot 160lbs caucasian. This would be my first time, but if I try this I really want to go for it. PM me.",q4q
"21 [M4M] Estes Park, Colorado","Just looking for someone to befriend/ talk to in the general area. I'm still new here (moved right before the flood), and still don't really know my way around, nor do know of any other gay men in the area, so it would be nice to at least have a friend, or more if it came down to it. I love to hike, read, write, try new things, see new places, cook, play video games, have in-depth conversations, drink, and meet new people. 
",q4q
"24 [M4M] Tampa, FL.","Recently came to terms with my bisexuality, and looking to talk (possibly more, once I get to know you a bit better) with fellow-minded gentlemen. Interests are video games, reading, and recently got into working out. PM with a bit about you, and we'll exchange chat info.",q4q
34 curious closeted M Iowa,"Just testing the waters, is anyone from Iowa here?",q4q
25/MTF/pan/Minneapolis,"New to identifying as female, having kind of a shakey start. Looking to make friends with other trans folk in the area. Or not, as long as you're super cool.",q4q
28 [cd4cd] Looking to play with another CD in SF Bay Area,"Hi there- I'm a closet CD and would love to find someone close to my age to dress/play with. I'm 28, 6'1, 170lbs, medium build. I just love how excited I get when dressed and would love to get my hands on someone and vice versa.

By day, I'm a working professional so this will need to be very discrete. PM me for more info/pics :)
",q4q
23 [MF4R] Chicago Homoflexible friends looking for a third over Christmas,"We're just two homoromantic BFF's looking for our first mixed gender threesome(s). We're looking for partners of either gender (or those who are genderfluid). We both dabble (to different degrees) in kink, have experience with group sex, and have engaged with both genders. We enjoy good books, trashy TV, and between the two of us have interest in every nerdy thing under the sun. I'm what's politely called a curvy woman, 5'5"", 36DD, 180 lbs. He weighs in at 155 lbs, 5'7"" and (if I may editorialize) has abs for miles . Pics and additional info available via PM.",q4q
"38M, SF Bay Area. Thin, normal, curious. Looking for sameish for possible exploration.","Any curious guys that might want to explore? I'm low-key, mellow, open to whatever I suppose. Message me!",q4q
23m/Los Angeles,Hey all; I hope your weekends are going well. I'm recently out and looking to make some gay/bi friends around my age to hang out and possibly explore with. Shoot me a PM if you wanna chat!,q4q
40 [M4M Straight/ Bi] Looking for a Specific Situation,"I am a Bi-Guy early 40s bear-type looking for Straight and other Bi Guys to meet up on Skype for one-on-one play with sound but without faces. We can look at each other instead of porn films and have fun. PM me.
",q4q
25m4m near ohio looking to explore a bit,"25 male
Here. 6'3, dark hair and eyes, a little
Pale, kinda the stereotypical hetero
Guy. I like being active and working out. Id love
To find a chat friend maybe even a phone or skype buddy if there is
Something there. Lately ive felt an attraction
For more fem and twink guys. Pm me :)",q4q
"25 Bi-curious M LF M, Dallas","I'm a 25 y.o. male who is looking to venture into my bi-curiosity. I'm looking to fool around and discuss what exactly I might be up to trying in more personal messages.

I'm mostly looking for Caucasian though I won't turn down anyone who is willing to be understanding with this exploratory need of mine.  

I'm 6'0, 230 Lbs and willing to exchange pics and such.

PM please :)",q4q
29M4M/Bi in DC/NoVA for male-male exploring,"Just like it says. White, average/thin build, 5'10"". Relationships just with women but have had a few sexual encounters with men and I'm craving it. We can chat or whatever first and friends are fine, but I'm also looking to explore that deeper (in all senses of the word). Send me a PM with thoughts or something about yourself.

I'm in the Fairfax area.",q4q
BiCurious 40 M NY looking for fun friends,"Hi Im a bicurious guy on Long Island, 40 220 lbs 6'3"" lookin to expand my sexual horizons. I figured id contribute to the group with my latest fantasy.

My current fantasy is to explore with a MF couple. In my fantasy Im seduced and lured into trying everything. Its always no pressure and erotic. It starts off with the 3 of us getting to know eachother over a glass of wine or a joint, laughing, talking, getting undressed, and setting up any guidelines or limits for the night. Then the couple decides that they are going to share and use me for the night, starting with a relaxing hot oil massage. I lay down naked on the bed and feel warm oil slowly drizzle across my back and I feel 4 hands begin to smooth it and rub my body. The stimulation is very erotic and sensual making me tingle and squirm as they release all the nervous tension that built up inside of me in anticipatoin of this moment. as I begin to relax and drift into the warm rubbing slick relaxation It becomes hard to tell whose hands are whose and whose body is touching me where. The hands work my body from both ends. One starts at my neck and shoulders as the other starts at my feet and ankles. Every few minutes I feel more oil splash down and more muscles are freed from their sexual tension. As they meet in the middle one is massaging my lower back as the other works their way up my inner thigh when I feel 4 sets of hands rubbing my virgin bottom. They kneed my tight cheeks, telling me how much they like my little ass, hands slipping down to my balls massaging them up to my taint, as I feel another stream of hot oil flow down the crack of my ass. Hands continue to kneed my cheeks massaging in the new oil and spreading my ass to make sure not a single spot is missed. By this time Im hard as a rock lying on my belly, squirming and dying in anticipation for whatever is still to come. As I feel a hand reach under me between my legs for my cock I perch my ass upwards to allow access. The warm slick hand begins to caress and stroke my stiff member and I groan with delight. Then the other set of hands begin to rub the oily crack of my ass from where my cheeks meet to the base of my balls and back again, and again , and again until Im virtually bucking back and fourth between that and the sweet hand making my cock tingle. Slowly I feel a small finger slowly enter my ass as the other hand continues to rub my ass, The feeling is intense as my ass slowly accepts it and then begs for more. Now Im on the edge of lust and insanity as they tell me its time to roll over and have the other side done. I roll over exposing my throbbing cock and the woman gets on top of me and straddles my stomach. The feel of her warm wet pussy on my stomach makes my cock ache. She pours more hot oil onto my chest and begins to massage my chest as I feel her man lift my legs to expose my most sensitive areas. As she leans down to massage my chest she plunges my face into her breasts just as I feel a hot mouth wrap around the head of my cock and a finger re-enter my longing ass-hole. This is almost too much for me to handle simultaneously but she jiggles them in my face and tells me to relax and enjoy, its just the beginning. Just then I feel my entire cock swallowed by her man. He hungrilly takes me in time and time again sucking and licking as he strokes my swollen prostate. Waves of pleasure begin to consume me. As I moan and squirm she turns around and slides her dripping pussy into my face. I cant help it, all I want to do is bury my face in her shaved glory. As I lick and suck her I feel her breasts on my stomach and now I feel 2 mouths wresting over my pulsating cock. Its intense. Somebodys sucking my head and stroking the shaft as somebody else is sucking my balls and fingering my ass. I wonder how much more of this I can handle. Then Its just 1 hungry eager to please mouth on my cock, her head bobs up and down, her hand slips and slides up and down my rigid shaft, her other is focused so her finger is inside me rythmically tapping my prostate completely making everything in the world slip away. Suddenly her pace slows down and her hand strokes my cock slower with a firmer grip. I open my eyes and see his hard shlong poised right above my face. Instinctively I reach for it and take the head in my mouth. My first taste of cock! I cup the balls with my left hand , try to take as much in my mouth as I can and then start sliding it in and out of my mouth to lube it up. He enjoys what Im doing and looks down at me as he runs his fingers through my hair. I cup my right hand and fill it with saliva and take him back in my mouth again sliding my right hand his length, taking as much cock in my mouth as I can, and rubbing his swollen testicles in my left. The more I get into this the faster she goes on me, Im bucking under her, sucking him and loving every second of it. As I begin to suck off the bottom of his rigid rod harmonica style I feel a second finger enter me and begin to pump my ass. At first it hurts, but as I feel more lube shower down on my ass it slides easily and I begin to thrust against her, Up into her mouth, down onto her fingers, in deep, down deep, rubbing his cock, sucking it for all its worth, almost at the point of exploding when she stops short and rolls a condom down my shaft with her mouth. ""He's ready for you baby, and Im MORE than ready for him!!!"" she says. I look up at him still sucking on his cock as she lays down next to me. ""Shes all yours"" he says. I release his dick promising to return later and get on top of her. As I enter I see that spark in her eyes. I begin to slide in and out but must do so slowly because Im still on the edge. She's loving the attention, digging her nails into my back and lightly dragging them down my back, grabbing butt cheeks in each hand and grabbing tight, pulling them apart and pulling me deeper inside her. Thats when I feel his latex covered cock pushing at my back door. Instinctively I stop moving and she pulls my cheeks apart wider. I feel warm lube drip on my ass and off his cock around my hole. Slowly he enters me from behind, she tells me to relax and enjoy as she begins to rock beneath me. As I rock with her I feel myself being filled and cant quite decide if its pleasure or pain. He stops half way in and she begins to rock under me stronger and faster. I begin to rock against her, going deeper into her on the instroke and forcing him deeper into me on the pull out. Its utter ECSTACY!!! Finally I cant handle it any more and she starts rocking fast and hard beneath me till I cum loudly. I collapse in a sweaty mess on top of her and she whispers in my ear ""The rides not over yet"". Thats when he begins to put the rest in and it all starts all over again!!!
",q4q
Who's in L.A.?,"Kinda bored. Just seeing who's out there who might want to talk or hangout. 23, blonde hair, brown eyes, slim, kinda pretty. Am I allowed to say that? I'll go first: Sup?",q4q
24M Central Mass,"...just looking to chat with some cool people.  Under 30 if possible, but there are exceptions to every rule.",q4q
20 M4M Northern Cal,"Looking for friends to chat with and maybe, if you're near my area, get together sometime.
I'm in the Shasta County area in norcal. PM me for #.",q4q
27 m4mf in Central MA,Bicurious and looking for a laid-back and fun couple to grab some drinks and fool around with in the Worcester area!  Don't mind driving a little ways depending on circumstance.  Throw me a pm and we'll talk.,q4q
24 [m4m] looking in Virginia (757),"hey guys, i'm just looking to chat on here for now. my stats: 24yo 6ft 160lbs athletic blond 7''cut vers/bottom. Mostly interested in talking to other guys who are in decent shape and might want to trade some pics (I have some posted to this account already.) Definitely up for friends or more if you live in my area. So yea.. hit me up!",q4q
"Dallas, TX - 24 M4M looking for someone to go on a date","This is probably a long shot, but...  
  
I'm not really looking for anything serious, nor am I looking to just hookup, but I'd really like some companionship at the moment.  If you're around Dallas, TX and think you're looking for something similar let me know.  I hope to hear from you :)",q4q
M4M/MF/MM NY-631 40 yo Bi M for uninhibited fun,"Hey. 6'3, 215, Bl Br 40 yo guy looking for fun times with fun people. I'm on the south shore in Suffolk. Just getting out of a bad relationship. Very sexually deprived, frustrated and bicurious. In need of stress free pleasure with disease free ppl who like to play, teach, please and be pleased. 420 friendly and looking to try everything to see what I like and what I need practice on lol. I love oral, giving and receiving massages, trying new things, edging, pleasing my partner and reaching new plateaus. Let's enjoy each other and make fantasies realities!",q4q
[40-M4A] NYC,"Looking to get to know someone at first, lets see where we go ultimately FWB.
Older professional preferred if your out there.
Send me a message and lets go from there.
High hopes and looking forward!",q4q
"22 (m4m) SF, CA.",Looking to meet guy in the area for a date or more. ,q4q
28 [M4A] bicurious in West Texas,Looking for a bisexual best friend.,q4q
18 bi curious male looking for FWB near RI,"I'm a 18 year old college student in RI. 5, 6"" trim, shaven chest, 100% clean. I'm curious, I've never done anything with a guy before. Looking for a friend with benefits around 16-25 years old but can be persuaded. Looking to hang out and play videogames, watch the game, cuddle, fool around, things of that nature. Looking in and around RI. Message me if interested or for more info.   ",q4q
M4M NoVA- curious looking to explore,24yr old height and weight proportionate curious guy wanting to experiment with another guy.  Been curious for a while and now just ready to act.  Willing to try anything and everything with a person who is patient and safe. Send me a pm with a picture and a description of yourself and I will do the same.  Maybe this can turn into a regular thing or a friendship.  Thanks. ,q4q
20 F4F Utah- Looking to experiment,"I have been very interested in experimenting lately. 
this is me http://i.imgur.com/nt9MEcn.jpg
this would most likely be a one time thing. pm me if your interested!",q4q
M4m/t SoCal. 25,Hey everyone. This all came on so suddenly. I just started feeling these strong desires and feelings. I'm a 25 year old male who wants to start exploring and talking with other bis. Hit me up. Repost from r/bisexual,q4q
28 [m4m] bay area looking to chat,"hey i'm a 28 asian male in good shape. going to be in the bay for a bit and seeing if anyone wants to chat. find some common interests, hang out maybe? a bit sarcastic at times, love the outdoors, watching onld movies, etc. so yeah.",q4q
24[M4M] LA/Ventura - Giving It A Shot,"As my username implies, there's a first time for everything. 

While I've never been with a guy in any capacity and I have a girlfriend, I've always been open to exploring my sexuality and I consider this another aspect of that exploration. 

I'm 24, 5'7"" and height/weight proportional. I've been told I have a very nice cock(if that sort of thing matters). 

I'm in the far north of LA/south Ventura area. I can host but can't travel(I've had a few drinks, if that wasn't apparent :])

PM me with whatever dudes who are experimenting are into(I'm not quite sure what that is myself).

If you seem cool and are down to watch the new season of Always Sunny after we do whatever we're gonna do, I'll probably respond.",q4q
23 [M4M] SoCal Looking to experiment,"I'm a straight male, looking to see the other side of things. Im from orange county Ca. Willing to try anything once. ;)",q4q
"22 [m4m] Bicurious in La Crosse, WI",I've always been curious about erotic experiences with other men and would like to meet up to experiment. Anyone in or near my area?,q4q
[m4m] 18 ohio looking to chat,"Hey guys. Just looking for a nice guy to chat with ;)

I'm about 5'9'' skinny, white, short brown hair, pretty athletic. Feel free to leave a comment or pm me
",q4q
"23 M4R New Orleans, avoiding homework and looking to procrastinate ;)","Bored and putting off doing American Literature homework for the moment. 

I'm 23 white male, looking for those around the same age to chat and see what happens. I like sci-fi, movies, TV shows, fantasy, video games, reading, and theatre. E-mail me and we'll see how we click together ;)",q4q
"24 [M4M] Cleveland, OH area","Hi all. I'm not really expecting anything to come of this but I've been trying and failing to find someone I click with and trying to find new outlets. I'm on the nerdy side but don't have a lot of nerd cred. I love Doctor Who, other scifi, board games, technology. Not a gamer nor have I read comics. So I lose a lot of nerd points. I do like to go drinking but am not a smoker. I enjoy the outdoors: biking, swimming, kayaking. But truthfully I spend a lot of time marathon watching shows on Netflix. I want someone to cuddle up with. 

I'm 24, 6'2"", skinny, pale white, have a moderate amount of chest hair. I'm pretty much a top but open to trying bottom if it is the right guy. I'm a college graduate with a full time job and I live in Stow. A big part of my problem is I'm picky. I can get on with most people personality wise but I prefer the nerdier types who like having fun bizarre conversations.  I tend to like skinnier, shorter guys.

All PMs and messages are welcome.",q4q
21 [M4M] the only bi Lubbock guy? :/,"Hey y'all, just... well... you know... realized recently that I feel pretty experimental, and I don't know anyone around here open to that. I'd prefer someone around my age, and uhhh... beyond that, well, I'm a student, I'm a pretty chill guy... message me!",q4q
"20[M4M] Seattle, WA. Curious and looking to experiment.","I have always identified as straight,  but I'm very interested in trying sex with another guy. I'd like someone around my age (18-30), who wouldn't mind showing me how it's done. I've never done anything like this before, and it would probably be a one time thing- though if I really like it I would be open to more. 

Message me if you're interested!",q4q
"[M4M] Nashville, TN","this may be a long shot, but haven't had much success with any of the other sites, so...

i am a good looking (so i've been told, not just my opinion lol) man, 6'5"", dirty-blond hair, green eyes, avg build. total geek, str8 acting (if that matters). celebrated 41 this summer, though i've been told i look in my 30's. 

looking for a man to get to know with the goal of a long-term relationship. i generally find i have more in common with younger guys (30-40) though i am open to younger and older. it's about chemistry and personaility, though i will honestly say that i do not find chubby men attractive (sorry.) race does not matter to me, nor does being feminine or masculine.

hit me up if you want to know more.",q4q
"21 [F4F] Las Cruces, NM","I know this is a long shot, but PM me!",q4q
27 [m4m] Looking for another in DC area,"I'm looking for someone to get together with regularly in the DC area. I live in the city, off one of the metro lines. I'd prefer a slightly dom guy, but I'm generally open. Message me, I'm happy to talk about myself. ",q4q
m4m,"20 year old looking for a 18-22 cute gay guy in the Pomona ca,near LA. ",q4q
25 yo greater la area looking for a daddy,"So I love the idea of strong daddy type tossing me around. Pinning me down.  Being agressive and assertive.  But I can't seam to fine one in real life.  Are there any out there?  Hairy, built, maybe a little gut.  Facial hair.  Can anyone help me out.  6' 175 fit brown hair blue eyes white military type guy.  Hope you are out there daddy.",q4q
"23 [M4MF] Madison, WI. Couple or single guy please","I'm new in town and have never done anything with a guy before. (Except a straight devil's 3way.)

I'm looking to find a couple that wouldn't mind sharing me between them or a guy that wants to just fool around. I'm down for straight sex for sure. As far as with a dude goes: I'd definitely like to try BJs; anal penetration (either direction) is only a maybe at this point.

Comment or PM me if you think you fit the bill.",q4q
19 M4M Bay Area Curious and 420 Friendly?,"I'm 19 M and will be returning to the Bay Area in a month. I've been curious and just wanted to see if there was anyone that would be willing to help out? In San Francisco would be convenient, but overall bay area would work. I'm not too sure about going all the way, but curious about giving a blow and maybe dabble in 420 or more. &gt;: ) I'm fine for just hanging out and not necessarily having anything sexual happen either. Anyways, PM if interested and we'll see how we (hopefully) click! ",q4q
[M4M] Looking for a guy in Maryland area that is a little kinky.,"Ideally around my stats (24, white, great shape, college grad, masc) and is into stuff like orgasm denial, ruined orgasms, edging, chastity, bondage, etc.  

If anyone out there is interested and in the NoVA, MD area around Frederick, or DC area, shoot me a PM.

If you're a longer distance away but are interested in chatting and seeing where things go, feel free to PM me too. :)

",q4q
35 [m4m] bi bear in connecticut,Lets get together for a drink and see...my first time please be understanding,q4q
21-[T4A]-New Jersey,"Looking to get back on the horse, meet some people maybe date. It's been a while and as a pre-op, pre-T transguy I have a hard time meeting people. I'm bi and interested in having my first relationship with a man but if we click, we click. [This](http://www.okcupid.com/profile/villageidiot91) is honestly the best way to read what I'm into and see pictures of me and stuff. Quick TL;DR on me if you don't want to read my OKC, I love movies, especially making fun of awful B horror movies. I play video games and am 420 friendly. Love to listen to music and really want to go to more concerts. Very artistic as well. I'd like to find someone who is willing to take it slow, maybe cultivate a friendship before diving in. Preferably males around my age, preferably bi or pansexual and a top. Feel free to PM me.",q4q
26 [M4M] looking for a pen pal. I'm bisexual and need someone to talk to.,Just need a friend.  I am in a straight relationship and need someone to talk to who understands me.  Thanks :),q4q
"29 m4A, bored as all get out and can't sleep","Send me a private message. I have pix, I have a fantastic personality, I'm a solid conversationalist, etc. etc.",q4q
Hookup in Ohio,I'm a black guy looking for my first time on top and bottom. I live in toledo and prefer chubby guys I'm 18 but not out of my parents house yet so we'd have to be discrete ,q4q
23 [m4q] Bi male for phone or cyber,"Not really looking to meet up at the moment, but would love to find someone for phone sex. Cyber or penpals would be cool too. Open to one time or regular thing. I'm interested in guys, gals or couples. PM me if interested.",q4q
24 m4m looking to explore a bit. Kentucky,"24 male USA here living in Kentucky. 6'3 , dark hair and eyes. Pale white, nearly kept short hair, trimmed beard. Love working out and staying in shape. Would love to find a sexy guy to Skype or talk to on the phone. Had curiousity about Twink and more fem type guys for a while. Pm me",q4q
25 male seeking feminine MtF in North Carolina,"Hiya! Like the title says, I'm 25, Male, and looking for an MtF girlie in North Carolina for a long term relationship. I am quite kinky, so it would be super awesome if you happen to be submissive as well, but even if not, I'd love to talk! I am looking for someone who is very passably feminine, either pre or post op",q4q
(M/M) 24 bi top in NY(hudson valley area) lookin for a cute bro to cuddle with :3,"hey guys, im in Middletown, Ny. im white, tall, avg. build, looking for a bottom bro around my age or a lil younger. just a cuddle buddy and gamin buddy and stuff like that. would love an ltr.",q4q
25 [M4M] Connecticut - Looking for a masc dom for ltr.,25 year old masculine bi-curious virgin would love to find a masculine dominant man for a relationship. I'm new and inexperienced so I'm looking to follow someone that is willing to lead the way.,q4q
20[M4M] Curious guy in Houston,"I'm a newly bicurious man who's never experimented with another guy before.  Looking for someone around my age with experience to help me discover this side of myself.

I'm 6'3"", blond, thin/fit body type.",q4q
23/27 [fm4f] - looking for a playmate,"My husband's 28th birthday is coming up at the beginning of June and I would like to celebrate it by having another girl play with us in the bedroom one weekend soon. DD free couple, females only, pics requested and available upon request. Please let us know if you're interested! PM or comment for more details.",q4q
"29 [m4m] Arlington, TX Near Cowboys Stadium - Seeking Verbally Abusive Face Fucker","Not into much kissing, body contact... I like to be treated like a bj service and thrown back out into the street with a face full of cum.  Bears are fun, daddies are fun, chubs are good too :)

I like a guy that can call me a piece of shit while holding my head down on their swollen cock, not letting me up for air (look at my username - who would have guessed?!)

29/m, 5'10"" 185lbs hispanic.  SuckBuddy817 on Grindr and Adam4Adam, arlingtonuncut on Squirt, Manhunt.  PM me for e-mail",q4q
25[m4m] finally looking to have my first experience in Philadelphia,"I recently came out as bisexual and am looking to take the plunge into sexual experience. What does one do when he recently came out and embraces his bisexuality? I have 0 sex experience but a 100% drive to take the next step so here I am. I am looking for someone around my age who is interested in helping me engage in this experimentation. Looking for someone who could guide me through the process of sexual experimentation. I want someone to celebrate these ""firsts"" with. You must be drug and disease free . I am 6'3, black hair, average body type.

I look forward to hearing from you and hopefully we can work something out. :-)",q4q
26 [M4M] South Carolina - Sort of new to this,"Tall (6'2) average built white guy looking to chat, maybe more. I enjoy video games and the nerdier aspects of life, but I also enjoy kicking back and watching sports. ",q4q
20 [F4F] Northern California (San Francisco Bay Area) computer science student looking for friends and more,"Hello there!

I'm a 20 year old nerdy computer science / engineering student looking for another girl to befriend and possibly date. I would love to trade Skype's and perhaps meet up in person sometime. 

My current obsessions include OFF (the game by Mortis Ghost), Homestuck (it's a bit of a guilty pleasure), and Magic: the Gathering (I'm always up for a game!); I also like to cosplay. Hit me up if you like any of those things / want to talk about them c:

I'm super partial to fat, nerdy girls :U

[Here is a picture of me.](http://i.imgur.com/r3AVp.jpg)

Have a great day!",q4q
"26 [F4biM] - Bay Area, looking for another bisexual to cuddle","Basically, I'm single and miss having the company of a queer man.  I love movies, finding adventures, and really want to find someone I enjoy spending time with.  If you're in the San Francisco Bay Area, send me a PM.",q4q
35 (M4M) los angeles - looking for a Top for a relationship,"I'm going to pretend this is Weird Science and list off the ""dream man"" I'm looking for and maybe someone who fits the bill will read this.
Looking for: 

* 30-40 Hung(ish) top 
* Fit like you stepped out of the ladybonersgw subreddit 
* Good cuddler 
* Nerd at heart 
* Into board games 
* Family man who wants kids at some point 
* Lives in LA 
* good cook (optional but hey this is my fantasy) 
* Likes to read 
* Neg and disease free 
* Non-smoker 
* Likes to get bjs more than give 
* Loves a beautiful ass 
* Looks good in a suit or uniform 
* Social and outgoing 
* Good decent guy",q4q
"(M4M) 18, Norway, Oslo. Just someone to hang out with :)","I'm an 18 year old male living in Oslo and Sandvika ('bout 40 mins from Oslo, I move back and forth, parents are seperated). I'm really just looking for a fellow bi or gay guy to hang out with as I've not been able to be so open about my sexuality with any of my current friends (I'm Bi btw). When I say hang out I mean talking, wathcing movies, going out for drinks etc. If it leads to anything more that's wonderful, but as stated I really just want a friend. PM me (:",q4q
"(M4M) Hey guys, looking for a down to earth guy.","I'm 24 and recently moved to the Boston area, I'm kind of new to being open and only dated a guy briefly in college. I'm looking for FWB with emphasis on friends as I may be moving soon. I'm a young professional looking for someone smart and funny who we can just grab a drink and have fun. ",q4q
"[M4M] Dallas DFW First time, looking for same or some experience","I've never been with a guy but wouldn't mind trying. I don't really want a random hook up, I'm looking for someone else who's on the same level as me. Hopefully start with chatting, pictures swapping and go from there. Just PM if you're in the area and we can chat.

5'9 26 White 160 tone build gl",q4q
25 WM4M East Bay California,Looking for another guy who is new to this as well. I am 6'1 and 225 pounds with brown hair and brown eyes. Just looking for another guy to chill with (maybe burn trees) and jerk off? If I am really feeling it maybe play with my ass a little. Who knows?,q4q
"[T?4F] 22, FL - Gender-confused (male-assigned) looking for a lady.","Title says it all. I'm either a trans girl or a guy who reallllllly loves embracing my feminine side. I'm looking for a girlfriend, either in the romantic sense or someone I can girl out with.",q4q
"19, F4F New Zealand","I posted this in l4l but seeing as the last post in there was 6 months ago I thought I'd x-post here.


I'm really just looking for someone like me to chat with, maybe write letters/e-mail? I'm 19 as I said and I'm a Uni student living in Auckland, New Zealand. Single and never been in a relationship before :(. I'm a massive Gaymer, both video and table top. I like Doctor Who, Neil Gaiman, writing, cats and am addicted to YouTubers such as Kaelyn and Lucy, Hannah Hart and Cry. I want a friend or more, someone similar to talk to because sometimes being both gay and single is lame and lonely and I'd like to meet new peeps.


In the interest of full disclosure (as I have seen a few people add here) I am 5'3 ish, blond (dyed red at the mo) and fat which is something I struggle with a lot and half the reason I have no confidence to talk to girls irl.

So Yeah, comment or Pm me I guess. J",q4q
24 m4m Louisville KY area. New to this want a chat and phone friend ;),"24 male usahere. New to the guy on guy thing but curious and very horny. Would love a chat and phone friend. Possibly more if there is chemistry. Usually into thinner Twink like guys personally. 6'3 here pale. Dark eyes dark hair. About 215 cause I love to lift weights and hike. So
Yeah pm me.  Would love to talk",q4q
24 M4A Tallahassee area,"Looking to have some fun, PM me if you are interested. I am on here all the time!",q4q
"24 {M4M/T philadelphia} Looking to chat, text &amp; maybe experiment with another male or transgendered","Hey thank you for reading my post. I'm 24, white and have a decent job. Lately I've been getting more and more curious about being with a transgendered (M2F or vice a versa) or another guy. Lets chat and maybe do something :) ",q4q
[25 MtF4*] Raleigh / Triangle Area,"Hi all, I'm posting this as an OkCupid supplement as it's been getting really frustrating lately. I'm a 25 year old student who is working on their bachelor's (yeah, I know - late start) and am kinda looking for someone to spend time with! 

I'm sorta mid-transition only having been on the 'mones for a little over six months but /r/transtimelines says I pass so there you go (if you want to see what I look like feel free to dig through my recent posts :P)


**Orientation** - Technically Pan, but I have a slightly easier time being attracted to females. Don't let that scare you away though!


**Who you're looking for** - Anyone roughly around my age. :)


**What you're looking for** - Someone to watch movies and listen to music with, and someone who isn't a stranger to cuddles! And maybe then some if you're so inclined. :P


   
",q4q
"23, m4m, upper east side, NY","Just a good looking guy in the city up for anything from hanging out naked to becoming fuck buds. hiv neg, ddf and clean here.",q4q
Bi/m/27 Looking to experiment,Im in the Northern Virginia area. I've been curious for a long time but never went any further than sexting and kissing. I enjoyed sexting :) I'm looking for someone who's also curious and who wants to fool around on the weekends.,q4q
21F4F NY near the Bronx,"For full disclosure; I am black, 5'3"", 22, with medium length hair and overweight (just being honest but this is something I am working on). Currently in school studying engineering and working part time. As for interests I love gaming if you're into the socially-awkward-video-game-nerd type. Even if it is just to chat don't hesitate to message me, open to all types.",q4q
"28 M4M Curious, Ready, Looking, First Timer. Dallas","Okay, my heart is a bit racing as I type this. I've had this urge for awhile, I would love to be bottom'd and I would really like to try my hand at oral. I am really wanting to make this work with someone who will go easy (at first) and will work with me on this. 

I am ready, I just am looking for the right person I guess. I envision some hot under the cover action. I promise if we can make this work, I will try to make this worth both our time.

I'm obviously posting this on a throwaway but god I hope I do get some responses so I can fill this urge and see where it goes. ",q4q
"26M Brisbane, Australia","Hi, don't have any experience in the area but have often found myself fantasising about being sissified and made to suck cock lately... or just simply being made to suck cock",q4q
24F4F Chicago. Lets talk? ,"I'm pretty bored tonight, just me myself and some Netflix. I'd be interested in talking to some women tonight. The more local the better, but friendship in other places is fine. 

I'm an aspiring comedian and enjoy running. And obviously Netflix. 

Shall we chat? ",q4q
"19 [M4R]- Brooklyn, NY- Looking for sex and experimentation","I'm a gay male and kind of looking for sex. Whether it be a guy for regular playtime, or for a girl just to explore some stuff about myself, I'm pretty much open to the possibilities, although sex with a girl will probably less frequent if more than once. Private message me and we can go from there...",q4q
"25 [m4t/m], MA, New to this.","I've never told anyone I'm close to that I fantasize about trans/men a lot. I've always wanted to act on it, but have always been too shy/scared to do it on my own. 
Somebody want to chat for a while and maybe lead to something else? 
I have some pics, can take some more too, but being discreet right now is my main goal as friends/family wont take it well. ",q4q
22 M4A,"Bi guy looking to skype and show off some panties 
PM me",q4q
"M4M looking in Louisville,ky",Looking to chat in person or online and maybe meet up. I'm Caucasian 28 fit and curious. Hope to hear from some like minded ky redditors,q4q
M4M Looking for a cute guy to talk to online.,"Hey all, just looking around for a nice guy to talk to. I'm a cute tiny guy from kansas who's life is kind of dull at the moment and I would love to talk to some guy that is interesting to talk to. I love most music, although I'm more into metal then anything. I'm a furry, I smoke weed, I play minecraft and watch Doctor Who. I love to lauph and have a good time.",q4q
[t4m] [ftm4m] SF East Bay Area transguy for non-trans guy,"Gay, early 30s, cub/bear type guy looking for a friends with benefits or fb situation. I'm in Berkeley most of the time, so near there would be best.

I like em nerdy and not skinny, other than that I'm pretty open. Feel free to PM me.",q4q
20 [m4m] southern ontario kik chat,pm your kik username and i might send you a message :),q4q
[M4M] Halifax guy looking for friends ,"Looking to meet people for a drink, maybe more. ",q4q
M4M in Maine,"Just feeling this place out, couldn't find anyone else from up here",q4q
"18 M4M [20 mins from Atlanta] Asian, looking to fool around for the first time.",PM if interested.,q4q
"30[F]/23[M][mmf or just mm] in Portland, OR area. Looking for a top for him.","We're a long distance couple and I'm visiting him in PDX in April and we're looking for a guy who is willing to top him and possibly be part of a threesome.

We're a geeky couple who love table top gaming, Doctor Who, Supernatural, Psych, video games and comics.

**F**: I'm just below 5', weigh between 105-112(I tend to fluctuate within that range), I do have a slight belly due to having kids. Yes I have stretch marks too. I have glasses, blue/green eyes, brunette, tattooed and  to pierced. Not a lot of piercings, since I've removed a few. I don't smoke, drink, do drugs. Straight laced am I. My vice is sex.

**M**: He's close to 6', 165, but losing weight, blonde and blue eyes. He smokes(on occasion) and drinks(socially).


We're both pretty introverted, but pretty kinky. His preference is a guy who is of a slim build and not hairy. If you're not interested in any mmf action, fine by me as long as I can watch. It's his first time being with a guy so I want it to go as smoothly as possible.

PM me with any further questions.",q4q
[F224F] Toronto area - Let's have some fun!,"Looking for a sexy lady to sex up, preferably around my age (22), throw me a PM if you're down to chat and meet up real soon. ",q4q
"25 Ontario male, looking for someone to fool around with. Gf gets to watch.","Basically she said I could fool around with a guy in any way i want, and she would either watch or ride me at the same time. 

I want to blow a guy while she rides me, or possibly give anal so she can watch.",q4q
23-[M4R] SoCal IE,I'm still in the closet and pretty new to gay sex. I'd love to have someone cool to play around and explore with no real attachment or strings. Pm me,q4q
Bay Area guy looking for another Bay Area guy,San Jose area more specifically,q4q
26 M4R NY - New Guy wants to lose it,Bicurious guy here..very new to all of this...would love to hangout and take things slow...would like to do a lot of things...just new and nervous...hopefully you are interested. :)  Or just looking to chat as well,q4q
Anyone from Holland?,Just wondering. Lonely 21yo guy btw. ,q4q
"20Q4R St. Augustine, Florida -Smoking &amp; Cuddle Buddy","I am a male-assigned-at-birth genderqueer person, non-transitioning. I prefer they/she pronouns. I am pansexual but tend to go more for women.
Anyway, I just went through a bad break up and have been rather lonely. I am not looking for anything serious but would love to find someone to cuddle with and get stoned with. Any takers?",q4q
"(M4M) 20 NH, Dover and Seacoast","Hey, I'm 20 and go to UNH and am looking to meet more people. Maybe we can get some coffee sometime? Hit me up! :)",q4q
26 M4M socal,looking for someone to experiment with. i have always been curious and want to start slow with someone. i travel a lot for work so im always available anywhere but mostly orange county.,q4q
20/m/FL Filipino guy. Anyone wanna have some fun on Skype?,,q4q
23 [M4R] Indianapolis- A Deaf fella lookin' for fun and bullshit. And anything. (REPOST) (x-post from r4r),,q4q
23/M/Gay M4M Central NJ,"I am a fun geek, film Maker who loves watching movies and reading books in the park. I would say that i have a great sense of humor and I am a college student working on my BFA in Film

I am 23 years old I am a Gay Male. I am looking for Gay guys around my own age in my area to talk to and maybe get to know each other. I live in Central NJ USA. ",q4q
[M4M] NYC Jedi,"This is like 58% creepy, but finding guys in the city can be hard when one is a slightly cynical nerd, so I'm here looking for something more than a fast fuck. 
me: I'm 24, cisgendered, kinda skinny, blonde-ish, 5'11"". I got a degree in illustration and i'm still trying to figure out what i want to be when i grow up. Currently doing graphic design for iOS and Android (oh god, android. whyyy.) I tend to enjoy video games (more bioshock and metroid than call of duty) and the drawing and reading of comics (especially ones besides marvel and dc.) I'm not especially into going to bars and talking to strangers, so I thought maybe my old pal the internet could help me out. so here I am. if you: 
1. are between 18-35 
2. are in the NYC area 
3. know the difference between ""your"" and ""you're"" (and there/their, too/to, etc.) 
4. know an X-Wing from a Tie Fighter then say hello. 

be creative, say something besides ""lol hay wuts up lol."" Here, I'll even give you a prompt: what is your favorite pokemon/and/or/vehicle in star wars. oh and a picture would be nice i suppose.
TL;DR: okcupid.com/profile/raytendo is me.
",q4q
Young subboy for chat with experienced dom,"Twenty-three year old inexperienced subboy with gf looking to relieve some frustration and chat with mature, physically and psychologically dominating man. I'm interested in exploring things like exploitation, coercion, pet play, humiliation, and cross-dressing with an experienced dom who isn't afraid to push limits and help me learn. PM if you want to chat or push me in the right direction. Thank you!",q4q
20 [M4M] Bi-curious Los Angeles (SFV),"Never been with a guy before, looking to experiment. Preferably someone with a similar age. It would be cool to meet with someone who also has little experience, but I'm flexible.",q4q
Chance Encounter at the 440.,"We met in front of the 440 in SF 12/15.  Talked about Austria/Australia, Switzerland/Sweden.  Meet again?  ",q4q
24 [M4M] Near Philly,"I've been curious about being with another guy for a while now and want to see what its like. 
5'10 175lbs white athletic. ",q4q
"[M4M] Williamsburg, Va - Taking All Loads","Have a nice cock? Nice clean body too? Have I got a mouth for you. &gt;;-)

25, married bi male is looking to provide some much needed release for any guys out there. We can be intimate and take our time, or you can drop in, get sucked and split.

Send me a pic, preferably with face and body, and I'll send some in return. I'm white, fit, handsome, long curly hair, vers, very friendly and easy going, and most importantly 100% clean. I can travel but would prefer to host (right off the highway, close to Ft. Eustis).",q4q
23 [M4M] Nova Scotia,"Looking for someone who is active, likes to game and watch movies. Easy going and fun, pretty much similar to me, and being a little kinky never hurt hehe. If your interested pm me and I will respond. ",q4q
"29 [f4f] Brussels, Belgium. I have never had a lesbian experience, but would really like to try. Any girl here feel like guiding me though this?",,q4q
22 m SoCAL curious,"I'm down to text, sext, and even meet up. Send me msgs.",q4q
"[M4M] 18 and horny, would love to chat!","Im 6 foot, green eyes, dark brown hair, white with an athletic build. Hope to hear from you guys!",q4q
M4M NOVA Curious FWB?,"26 year old single,white,and 6'4"" in the Northern VA area. I've been curious for a while now and would like a FWB kind of deal. ",q4q
"[W4W]Looking for a new skype, and possible game buddy","I'm a pre-op transwoman who's looking for a friend, and possible something more.  I love video games, and I'm currently playing Halo 4, but make no mistake I love RPGs, especially tabletop RPGs.  I also love books and music, as seen by the fact I play the Viola and write in my free time.  My sexuality is Homoromantic Pansexual.  I am rather sexual, much to my chagrin, and joy.  I'm a bit kinky, and prefer to be a domme despite the fact I'm a femme at heart.  If you're interested just shoot me a PM",q4q
"24 [M4M] ""Post-Transition"" Trans Man in Southern California Seeks Friendship and Maybe More","First of all, I put an ""M"" rather than a ""T"" in the title because I'm strictly male-identified. I've had two surgeries (a hysterectomy/oophorectomy and top surgery), am saving money for lower surgery, and have been on T for several years. If you dislike beards and body hair, or if you're expecting me to look like a teenage boy, you will be disappointed. (Sorry to be so explicit about my appearance and surgical status, but I figured I'd rather be up-front than leave any questions in people's minds.)

I haven't had much success with mainstream online dating. My short height (5'7"") and current genitalia are often a deal breaker for a lot of cis people, so I'm hoping to meet non-judgmental, non-transphobic gay and bisexual guys in my area who want to date and/or hang out. Note, however, that I'm not looking for casual sex; I'm looking for genuine, meaningful connections with people that are based on more than just sexual attraction.

I'm a little bit socially awkward, and I have a semi-boring full-time job at a mortgage company, but I also have some fun interests. These include traveling, going to the beach, reading, playing computer games, playing board games, playing card games, watching television and movies, and trying new restaurants. People who know me well say that I know how to have a good time and have a lot to offer a potential romantic partner, so I invite you to shoot me a private message or make comment on my post. Ideally, I want to chat with people on Skype, Yahoo IM, and/or AIM before making a decision about whether to meet up, but it's cool if you want us to just message each other back and forth on Reddit. I hope to hear from some of you. Thanks for reading this novel of a post.",q4q
23 [M4R] Indianapolis- A Deaf fella lookin' for fun and bullshit. And anything. (x-post from /r/r4r),,q4q
"26 [M4R] Baltimore, MD Looking to have some fun.","I am a 26 year old Bisexual male that will be in the Maryland area for the next month or so and am looking for people to talk to and possibly a bit more. My interest are maths, science, movies, music, drinking, exotic food, and interesting people. I am up for trying anything at least twice.

If interested PM me.",q4q
25 [F4F] SoCal (SGV and surrounding areas) - Let's hook up tonight! (x-post from r/r4r),,q4q
"[FM4R] Williamsburg, Virginia - Bi Couple Seeking Third!","Hey there! Hope you're eager for some fun. &gt;;-)

We're a bi couple living in Southeastern Va. and we'd like to find someone nearby for some good wholesome dirty sexy fun. We have zero demands save that you be friendly and easy-going, absolutely clean and at least bi-curious. Outside of that, PM us if you're near!

We're both fit and healthy, absolutely clean, talented and passionate in the bedroom (or kitchen or living room, hell all over the house). We're pretty big nerds all around, so shared interests are always nice. Our main shared interested, though, should be a hot bi encounter. The specifics are entirely up in the air, but generally we're looking for someone who would be into him and her, to varying degrees. Our relationship is 100% stable and secure, so we won't bring any drama and you shouldn't either.

We can dive into more personal details when you PM us. Shoot us a pic or two along with your message and we'll respond in kind.

&lt;3",q4q
[TW4A] Bored in Minneapolis," Short Bio - I'm a clever, weird, sensitive and fun person who likes reading SF, the outdoors, learning new languages, biology and roleplaying games. I do way too much worldbuilding, attend school part time, live on disability payments and love a good cup of tea.  
    Age - 29.  
    Gender Identity - Female (trans); genderqueer (and genderfluid between them).  
    Orientation - Equal-opportunity queer.   
    Who you're looking for - Passionate, clever and/or fun people of any gender, age, ethnicity and body type.  
    What you're looking for - Dating, someone to go do interesting stuff with, casual sex, FWBs, IM chat.    
    Location - Minneapolis  
    Interests / Hobbies - Writing, reading, anthropology, biology, history, games, too many other things to list.  
    Other Preferences - The following groups get bonus consideration: very tall cis men, anyone with glasses, cis women a bit older than me.",q4q
"22 [M4M] Columbus, OH. Looking For First Time Experimentation",Hey. So I've never actually had a sexual experience with anybody of the same sex but I'm very interested. Send me a message and we can see what happens.,q4q
41 M NC looking for some advice on how to go about having my first gay sexual experience,"I've been trying to find the right person to have this initial sexual experience, but have been worried about going to places like CraigsList.  I've checked into dating sites but it seems like all the guys there and young and way out of my league.  I'm not really interested in dating, just some nsa gay sex with a drug and disease free guy.  ",q4q
"[M4A] Chicago, 23 White clean cut athletic bi-male for hot anal fun tonight","I'm looking for someone similar in age and tastes to get hot and heavy with. I love being dominant but I'm feeling very submissive right now. Till fairly recently I was an anal virgin, but after that cherry popped, all I want is more. If you like playing cock games before pounding my sluttly hole, PM me. Guys with nice cocks and Girls with strap-ons welcome. 

Hopefully, I'll be your little fucktoy tonight.",q4q
"[M4A] 25 y/o bi guy in Williamsburg, Va. wants some play","Message me and we can work out the details. I'd prefer to host, but I can travel as well. Mainly looking for 

Race and cock size don't matter to me, but body shape does (make sure to send me a pic). What matters most is personality; if we click, this could become a regular thing.

I'm 6'2"", 180 lbs, long curly brown hair, there are pics in my post history. I've done this sort of thing before on Reddit, with much success, so I'm eager for more!",q4q
New to Reddit - Seeing if I have better luck here meeting anyone serious,"So hi!  My name is Tim and Im new to Reddit.  Im a 28yo S/G/W/M looking to make new friends, fwb, dating, hooking up and LTR minded. I have a sweet and caring personality with a dorky sense of humor.  Im independent, responsible and I dont play games nor am I a flake or fake. If this interests you, Id love to hear from you!   ",q4q
"[M4M] 33, bicurious from LI, NY - Looking to expand my horizons. ",Been curious for a while. I might be ready to meet up with someone I trust and take it from there.,q4q
26f4f,"I am 26 in the Anderson Indiana area looking for female friends and hopefully a female lover. I am in a polyamorous relationship and am looking for a woman for me. I would also love some friends, since I just moved here. I love books, anything sci fi and cooking. Me and my fiance have two kids, although I can't have anymore. Just got cleared of my cervical cancer and looking for fun to celebrate. Pm me for more information. I am also available on Skype, pm for username ",q4q
[m4a] 22 Bear Bottom Grand Rapids MI area,"I'm a curious guy looking to either:

give a guy a blowjob 

be fucked in the ass (by male or female, I have a strapon)

I'm mobile. Potentially, but unlikely, able to host but I do not live in GR (just nearby). I have never had an experience with another guy, but I would like to. As stated, I'm a bear (moderately hairy body and a bit chubby) and I would like to find a twink, preferably hung and shaven groin.

Pictures available for trade and mutual attraction is a must.",q4q
20M4A,"Skinny but muscular and well endowed. Cmon and pm me! :)

please note... if your a guy you must either


a) crossdress 

Or

b)be a bttm 

that's all folks see you soon!",q4q
26 m4m san diego,"I have only messed around with one guy and find myself curious again from time to time. Pm me with stats and perhaps we can chat/trade pics or something, whatever works.",q4q
26 M4M/F Cam and possible meet,I have been fantasizing about being with a guy for a while now. I'm hoping to maybe cam with someone tonight and if things go well would be cool to meet. I'm from philly so hopefully you are too.,q4q
Curious in san diego,26/m in san diego seein if theres anyone in the area and what you're into? Only messed around with one guy a while ago. Pm me and lets chat/exchange pics maybe? Whatever works,q4q
New lesbian subreddit r/l4l,,q4q
(FT) M4M 20yr old in Humboldt County California! ,Ive Never done anything like this so lets see what happens!,q4q
M4M NW Indiana 50,"Looking for friends in Northwest Indiana. Chat, meet, hang out, go from there. I like nature, walking, hiking, watching tv or movies, music (rock mostly) and of course surfing the web. ",q4q
18 [M4M] let's cam on Skype,"PM me if you're interested and send pics if you have them!

Always looking",q4q
"[MFM/T(MtF)] Cincinnati OH, 23 Year Old Bi Chub here looking for friends(Online or Offline) or Friends with Benefits.","Hi all, Like the title says I am looking for people to either befriend on the internet or IRL. I would love a email/text buddy or someone to actually hang out with. I am your average guy, who plays video games, watches sports, enjoys reading, music, drinking and just hanging out. I am bi-curious, and have not really experienced much and would like to find someone to talk with :). Send me a PM!!",q4q
[M4M] Michigan. Looking for my first experience,I've been bicurious for a while now. Looking for my first m4m sexual experience.,q4q
26/M/Lower48,Hello everyone. I'm not sure what I'm looking for to be quite honest. I do know I want friends. You are probably asking yourself why I put lower 48 in the title. The answer to that is that I am a truck driver. I'm not looking for hook-ups but not closed to the idea either. I spend my time in truck stops and at shippers and recievers. I'm a bear but enjoy the average guys and jocks. Send me PMs and we'll see what happens. ,q4q
"Hi, I'm 19 and live near Cleveland Ohio","Hi, I'm Ryan and I live in Lakewood Ohio. I'm 19, single, and out to most of my family [M4M]. Looking for a car and attending Tri-C in Westlake. If you want to know more you should probably just walk away from your computer. No but seriously PM me!",q4q
[w4w] 25/F/Northern BC,"I'm fat *waves a hand* I don't skirt the issue. It's out there for the world to know. If you've gotten past that, then here's a little more about me! I love cats, and try to take at least an hour a week to give kitty love at the local SPCA. I currently work a good job, that I love, and love having weekends off! I'm geeky, love anime (TOTORO! POKEMON! DIGIMON!), and while I can't play video games to save my life, I love watching someone play.

I'm 25 years old, female, and am a somewhat plain lesbian XD

I'm interested in girls around my age, younger isn't a problem seeing as I have a somewhat immature outlook on life, complete with perverted mind.

I'm looking for a long term relationship, for someone I can spend forever with. I don't have a problem with a long distance relationship, as long as we can see each other a few times a year. I don't do threesomes, fuck buddies, or skype sex. Reddit may be a silly place to look for a long term relationship, but damnit, I'm determined!

Seeing as I'm from a small town, I'm going to leave my location as ""Northern BC, Canada"" but I'll happily share the exact location once I get to know you.

Let's see... Other than what I've already listed, I like: Harry Potter, science fiction, horror, the paranormal. I prefer upbeat music, country and pop, though I dabble in the light stuff. Loud and metal/rap are not my things. I text, a lot, but I know when it's impolite. I love to cuddle! And hold hands! And kiss! Ask me things! I love answering questions.",q4q
"Not sure if this is the right place to post this, but 19/20yo F&amp;M 4 M for Threesome/ DP",,q4q
"(FT)M4A - Curious, masculine 19 y.o. looking to cam","I'm 19 and 8 years transitioned. Hoping to have some internet sexy times! Not sure what else to say, haha.",q4q
South Florida anyone? 23m,Looking to meet. 23 male. I'm open to anything,q4q
"F4F 24, Help me relieve some stress from teaching and finishing a masters (Boca or south Florida)",Send me a pic and I'll send one back ;),q4q
"Bi-Curious in Austin, TX.","I've given a guy head once when I was younger, but I really want to fulfill some lifelong fantasies.  Masculine, average build, but very cute UT student.  19 years old, and looking to explore my submissive side.",q4q
27 M4T/CD/M southern california,"I need to experiment. I have always been curious and I need to get my hands on a cock! I love traps/cd/tgirls, there is nothing hotter than a nice hard cock in lingerie! Send me PMs",q4q
"26/M/Melbourne, Australia","Hey there, I've only just started being honest with myself about my sexuality (Am Bi) and I was looking for someone to explore it with or someone to talk about it with.

I am a fairly nerdy guy (nerds on reddit? Shock!) I like coffee, good video games and am currently in the process of getting fit after a motorcycle accident!

If anyone here is interested in having fun with me, be that in a private setting or having a chat with me over a coffee I would enjoy it.

&lt;3",q4q
29 (F4F) in Seattle/Tacoma area. Looking for a geeky girl to smooch on and talk about video games and cartoons with. ,"OkCupid and Plenty of Fish are lacking cool ladies that are interested in actually getting to know someone rather than just sex. I wanna find a laid back, cute, geeky girl that plays video games and watches Adventure Time, Regular Show, Archer, Futurama and other cool cartoons. ",q4q
[m4m] 22/M/MD/DC area,,q4q
M4M : Bi Married Bear in KY looking for online and maybe local friends.,"We can be skype buddies if you want, if you live around me i'd prefer to get to know you online before meeting in person. I'll be honest i'm really interested in jerking off with you guys but I can be just friendly too. I'm a big hairy guy and I don't care what you look like. skinny, big, whatever, as long as you're clean. Also age isn't too important to me as long as you're 18 but even if you're an old guy we can hang out.",q4q
[34M bi RI] Looking to bottom.,"Just discovered this subreddit today! It would be cool if I could find a top guy that I could meet up now and then for to have some sexy times. I'm sure if we're both redditors we could find something cool to talk about during the downtime! I'm not looking for a relationship of any kind. To put it bluntly, I'm just looking for a fuck, but hanging out a bit is a-ok to me. 

I've done anal a few times now, and it really feels good. The more comfortable I get with it the better it is. I figure with a regular FWB it might become amazing. 

Let's chat!",q4q
"F4F 22/130lbs, Dark Hair, looking for a lady that I can chat with and possibly persuade to let me have some fun with. ","I have always been into girls but just before getting into a 2 year relationship with my current boyfriend I started to let my rage and love for women out. Since then I havent had much opportunity to get out and meet other ladies that are open enough about their sexuality to talk to or mess around with. At the very least I would enjoy someone to talk to, someone that I can vent my sexual frustrations too but I really would like to find a girl that is interested in sex or trying new things so I can alleviate some of this pent up, yummy, sexual want for a woman. PM me. I am very open minded and I am easy to talk to. It would really make me happy to find someone. ",q4q
"M4M, 20, seeking love in the CA central valley",,q4q
"32m, wants to check out porn and stroke, c2c and maybe meet up eventually. ","Looking for someone similar, preferably little to no experience as well to just see where it goes. ",q4q
M4M 18 WA (maybe skype?),"Looking for a guy to chill with in Washington and maybe do something more with. Of course if you live far away im also open to skype chat.

if I picked a preferable look I would prefer chubby, fat, stocky, and just all around beefy guys. (Im talking about body size not dick size.... Ive gotten confused gentleman callers before. Lol) So hit me up. I dont bite. Lol",q4q
M4M in Boston - I wanna get together with a guy at his place and jerk off to some porn and give each other a hand,"I'm 22, 215lb, 5'10 and white.  I am 6inches and cut.  I can't host.  Hoping to do this today or maybe tomorrow.",q4q
Looking 4 c2c on skype [M] w/ M or F (BI),PM Me :) Also w/ your age will be better ,q4q
"[m4q, 19 NNJ] looking to satisfy some urges","I've started nofap and I kind of want to cheat the program... looking for someone to practice safe sex with, because practice makes perfect, right? :P

Me: 6'2, 190, slightly chubby, cute face, brown/brown",q4q
"Bi-curious in Quebec province,anyone could help me for 1st time?","Never tried with a man,kinda shy....",q4q
20/m (Bi)/ATX,"Hey, I'm a 20-year-old bicurious guy from Austin. Anybody free tonight?",q4q
"(FT)M4A, hoping to cam with some folks.","I'm an 18 year old and 7 years transitioned FTM guy, interested in camming with either guys or girls who are ok with FTMs. It's not my favorite aspect of myself, but I'm looking to be more okay with it. Let me know if you'd wanna have some Skype sexy times!",q4q
India anyone? ,"The odds are pretty against me. But just in case.

Let me also add some of the cities where I can normally be found, over Northern India:

Delhi, Chandigarh, Jammu and Kashmir, Himachal ( including Shimla and Dharamsala/Dharamshala) and Ludhiana.

I am a bisexual 30 year-old guy, who would like an intelligent and cute guy under 28 to chat and meet with. Anyone under 68 kg, which is my weight.

",q4q
m4a looking for a chat.,pm me!,q4q
"M4M, 29, Boston-Metrowest Area","Hi there - I am a 29 year old, handsome business professional who would like to meet someone cool around my age (23-40) for dinner/coffee or even on chat/cam.

I am 6ft, dark hair, dark eyes, 185 lbs, hairy body, uncut and 35 waist. Of course, I have plenty of pictures to prove my 'looks' and would appreciate the same from you.

Intelligence in words and actions are really attractive to me. If you can talk technical, look good, and have a horny nature - we will hit it off!

So message me soon...",q4q
F4F in New England?,"I'm turning 19 in September and am looking for friends or maybe something more ;)

[Here is a picture of myself with my dag](http://imgur.com/59xD6)

PM me if interested c:",q4q
35 [M4F/T] cross-dressing fetishist looking for fwb in Montreal,I'm married and I'm looking to fulfill some fantasies with a like minded woman or crossdresser or trans.,q4q
"mfm/t sf,ca or east bay","Looking for first time, would be cool if you are to but open to other possibilities. You=able to host, in san francisco, ca and down for late tonight or this week. Me=6'1, 170 lbs, slim, ready to suck your dick or possibly more if things feel right. Your pic gets mine.",q4q
"[F4F] 18 in central NJ, looking to meet people.","It seems to be mostly guys here, but I'm gonna give this a shot. I just graduated high school, just about to start college for pastries and baking.  I pretty much just like to hang out and keep life as chill and casual as possible. Like my title says, I'm in central jersey, so it'd be awesome to meet some new girls around here, but just chatting with people from father away would be awesome too!

Don't be shy! I'm very friendly. This is me: http://imgur.com/a/hIWLK",q4q
32yo MWM near Chicago looking for mutual play,Title says it all. I am a 32yo married male looking for buddy for mutual Jo/suck.  I have occasional cravings for a cock in my mouth. Anyone willing to lend a hand?,q4q
M4M Miami - I'll be completely honest,"I'm an everyday guy who also happens to like guys. I don't personally identify with ""gay culture"". I have nothing against it and am even proud of the majority of people who have the guts to be different and challenge social norms. But it's just not my scene. I'm not effeminate at all, and I'm not seeking an effeminate person. I'm seeking a person who is happy with themselves and who doesn't act like a little girl or play mind games. I'm sorry if this is offensive to anyone, but what can I say? I like what I like.

In the spirit of honesty, here is some more information about me:

* I'm 38 but nobody believes me. Everybody thinks I'm around 25.
* I'm a doctor and I often work long hours. When I get home I like to curl up on the couch to unwind, not go out dancing and clubbing.
* I'm also a musician. I have a piano in my house and I like to play and sing when I have some free time.
* I have an average body type. I'm 5'10"" and weigh 175 lb. 
* I am looking for a cute boy who enjoys being in a monogamous relationship with a dedicated significant other. I'm not looking for hookups or booty calls, and I'm not looking to be anybody's sugar daddy. I'm looking for sincerity, compassion, and intelligence.
* I'm also looking for hotness! Truthfully, youth and fitness is a turn-on. You don't have to have big muscles, but body fat turns me off. The more ""twink-ish"" the better.
* I'm a very compassionate and understanding person. Anything that causes you pain in your life will likely elicit sympathy and a protective instinct from me.
* I'm not very attached to material things. If I have something I like to share it with others. I don't much care for shopping or wearing jewelry, although I can recognize when something is nicely made.
* I like to work in my garage with my tools. Woodworking is one of my hobbies and I love the smell of sawdust. I love coming up with a plan for a project, drawing it all out on paper and going to the hardware store to buy the supplies, then cutting and assembling all of the pieces. Then I carefully sand, stain and finish the piece with patience and precision. Then I usually give it away to someone :)
* Most people tell me I'm quite handsome. Many of my patients say things like ""You're so cute, doctor!"" and ""You have gorgeous eyes!"" I feel embarrassed just typing that out, but it happens a few times per week so why not be honest?

Anyway, if you've managed to make it this far and you think that we might hit it off, leave a comment here or send me a private message.",q4q
"m4m in North India. Masculine, handsome and fit 30 year old looking for a cute guy ","As the text says. The odds are pretty against me. But just in case.

Let me also add some of the cities where I can normally be found, over Northern India: 

Delhi, Chandigarh, Jammu and Kashmir, Himachal ( including Shimla and Dharamsala) and Ludhiana. 

I am a nice bisexual guy, who would like an intelligent and cute guy under 28 to chat and meet with. Anyone under 68 kg, which is my weight. 

I said handsome in headline, cause dammit, I am handsome, though your mileage may vary, cause its pretty subjective. ",q4q
"(M4M) 20, Fayetteville NC, moving to Wilmington in August","I'm a 20 year old mixed male. I'm currently a college student and will be transferring to a new one in Wilmington for the Fall. 

I'm mostly made up of geeky qualities, like having love for video games, cartoons, anime and such. I'm not very big into sports, but I have found rugby to be pretty fun to watch. I'm also big on movies (I'm a film student) and vocal music. I find classical music more appealing the more I listen to it. I also enjoy the theatre.

I'm very easy to get along with and my personality can sometimes be on the weird side. I just like having fun and being crazy around my friends. I find Reddit to be an easier way of introducing myself. Most guys on sites specifically created for personals only care about hookups and whether or not if you have ""pics."" Anyway, if you're still reading this and are interested, don't hesistate to pm me. I'll talk to anyone. :3",q4q
"[M4M] 22, Staten Island, NY Looking for friends (possibly more?), near or far.","Hey everyone!

I'm John, I'm 22 and I live in Staten Island, NY. I just graduated college and am now working in Downtown Manhattan.

I'm typically a cheerful person, annoyingly so at times. I'm really sarcastic and witty, I'll never miss a chance for a good joke. I'm a huge geek, into anime, video games, comics, all that sort of stuff.

I'm really chatty and love to constantly be IM'ing on aim or skype or something. I honestly could spend days on Omegle (and have!) because I love just having random conversations.

I guess that's enough for this post, haha. Feel free to comment or PM me! ",q4q
Bi guy scotland/17,"looking for chats, we can speak on here or kik:Jozkiification",q4q
"(m4m) Bicurious, 27 north of Los Angeles, valley area.  ","Wanting to experiment and explore my sexuality which I have just recently accepted is not the immovable object I once thought.  I'm fit, good looking and pretty easy going, open minded and straight forward but this is all pretty new to me so naturally I'm pretty nervous.  

Just wanna start small, I have some things in mind but ideally it would be someone in my same/similar situaiton.  Not gonna be anything long term, not even close more than likely but we can help each other out.  I experimented spontaneously last year and I liked it, but I want to take another step and see how I feel now that I've had some time to sort things through in my mind.

PM me and we can go from there if you're interested.  ",q4q
"Bi-curious 19 y/o male in Aberdeen, Scotland",PM me for skype or meet-up,q4q
"23 Bi-M4A, Nerdy guy looking for good conversations.","Hmm.. about me. I am a 23 year old guy who is currently getting out of the military and moving from Ohio to Chicago. I'm into anime, working out at the gym, comic books, and hiking. I like discussing culture and art. I love music. My favorite bands are Coheed and Cambria and AgainstME! If anybody would like to talk feel free to send me a message.
",q4q
[m4m] Bi-curious in London,Fancy exploring?,q4q
[FtM4A] Crazy cat lad looking for friends/long distance penpals/LTR,"Seeking: person with kind eyes and genuine smile who relates to John Oliver or equivalent.  I come in substandard Seth Green size and welcome people of like structure because apparently it [doubles your wardrobe](http://www.reddit.com/comments/ek3zg/those_of_you_in_a_same_sex_relationship_do_you/?sort=controversial). :D BUT character creates chemistry.  My crush range is anywhere from Rupert Grint to Eddie Izzard. :)

I'm looking here because I fit the reddit archetype all too well: cat loving, non-smoking drug legalization advocate, world conscious, bacon worshiping, random knowledge consuming, liberal. TIL and IAMA may be my favorite subreddits. Non-religious, but advocate for understanding. As for grammar, I am of [Stephen Fry's opiniation](http://www.google.com/url?sa=t&amp;rct=j&amp;q=&amp;esrc=s&amp;source=web&amp;cd=1&amp;ved=0CFYQtwIwAA&amp;url=http%3A%2F%2Fwww.youtube.com%2Fwatch%3Fv%3DJ7E-aoXLZGY&amp;ei=XfLCT6mWHcasiAKr8PmaCA&amp;usg=AFQjCNE_sqqaXC7Xzq7DS34UyxRpTqcRGQ&amp;sig2=CFqb5YkQlfH96HG1d-MA7w). I also enjoy f712u.

I'm an ancient 32, look confoundingly under 20, and fall intellectually between 2 and 2000, depending on the moment.  An introvert and a bit of a homebody, I'm learning to dance and I love the outdoors. I watch a little tv, read a moderate number of books, and drink socially. I like thought-provoking conversation and immature sillyness.  I think growing up means taking responsibility, not relinquishing the virtues of youth.  

I'm an amateur writer studying philosophy and media so I can better frame my arguments when I FIX ALL THE THINGS.  My passions are education and misconception awareness with an emphasis on religious and historical context for the cultural narratives.

My dream of the future is a rustic cabin near the coast. Cats, and maybe a human companion. Writing and research by day; music, mario kart, and margaritas by night. Weekends in the city for theater and ethnic food. Leisurely trips at least once a year. 

**What I look like:**

* http://i.imgur.com/pLs66.jpg
* http://i.imgur.com/hqelO.jpg
* http://i.imgur.com/fpyvbh.jpg
* http://i.imgur.com/fwvrCh.jpg

**Sampling of my tastes:**

* Food: sushi, mochi, thai icead tea
* Books: HGttG, Harry Potter, Mark Twain
* Movies: NBC, Dr. Horrible, Into the Wild, Clue, King's Speech
* Shows: The Wire, Firefly, Colbert/TDS, ST:NG, HIMYM, 30 Days, MSCL
* Anime: HxH, Lain, Utena, Bebop, Eva, Gankutsuo
* Games: Portal, Chrono Cross, Ico, FF Tactics

As per the title, I'm a - post-transition - female-to-male transguy. Inexperienced? Feel free to ask. :)

**P.S.:** I ID as **crazycatlad** on OKC and **widdrshins** on facebook/blogger.",q4q
lonely bicurious 21 m in nyc,"hey, just a 21 y/o guy in nyc looking for a good time
i'm pretty good looking, i assure you
not quite sure exactly what i'm looking for at the moment, but finding out is part of the fun, isn't it :)

so if you'd like to see where this goes, send me a pm",q4q
"[M4M] Dallas, TX - trans guy seeking FWB","(crossposted to /r/r4r.)

24, transgender (FtM), brown hair/blue eyes, 5'7"", ~125 lbs. looking for a ""friend with benefits"" in the most literal sense possible; someone to have sexy funtimes with, who I also like as a friend. I *really* like smart people. I enjoy discussing politics, science, music, books, and all sorts of other things, and if you do too then we'll probably get along well. :)

I'd prefer it if you were close to my age. I have a very limited amount of privacy where I live and so I can't host, but I have a car and would be able to come to your place, provided that you live within the D/FW area.

I'm not very sexually experienced and have never been with a guy before. I'm willing to experiment (enthusiastic, even!), but you must be willing to respect limits. I've had top surgery but everything on my bottom half is still intact, i.e. I have a vagina, uterus, etc. Condoms are required, and I do have a small supply. The other thing that I am adamant about is meeting in person at least once before any sex happens (dinner, coffee, etc... I'm open to suggestions.)

If you're interested, send me a message. I've got an account with almost every IM service there is, so if you'd rather communicate that way just send me a PM with your service and username.",q4q
"25m4m Cleveland OH, Looking for someone to explore with","Hi. I'm pretty new to the whole LQBT community. I've recently decided that I'm definitely bi, and I'm looking for someone to help me experiment and fool around with.

I'm a nerdy guy, fairly skinny, and pretty laid back. I'm in decent shape, and I hope you would be too.

I'm looking for someone comfortable with taking things slow at first. I'm not just looking for sex, so we can see where things go.",q4q
North GA? Bi curious looking to give a guy a chance.,Send me a pm and we can skype too :) ,q4q
25m4m - ohio - solon area,looking for something right now. never been with or sucked a guy before. i want to get sucked. i want to suck. maybe we can do more if it feels right. message me if you are in the area,q4q
[m4t] Looking for something new in San Diego,"I want to try this with someone would be willing to guide me through it as I am a beginner. This could also be [m4m] depending on the guy. I would prefer someone around my size or age and who can be discreet. 19, PM if you are interested :)",q4q
m4m Tucson AZ I want to get fucked,"I'm 18 now, I've sucked plenty of guys but I want to well get it in the butt today PM me for when and where.",q4q
[25tw4*] ♠ Caliginous flirtation,"I'm looking for a casual online correspondence wherein we [fuck with each other's emotions](http://www.mspaintadventures.com/?s=6&amp;p=004395).

Non-serious inquiries acceptable, but trolling will be interpreted as sincere interest.",q4q
"m4m, NY, virgin, tired of it","PM, I'm 20, and I wanna get laid tonight ",q4q
[26M4M] Dirty Skype Fun - PM Me,,q4q
35 year old single guy interested in new friends [San Francisco],"Hello! I'm not great at meeting people, and I don't have a lot of LGBTQ friends. I'm a gay guy (cis), software developer, vegetarian, living and working in SF. I like walks/hikes, electronic music, reading, watching an occasional movie, cooking (try my curry or my sandwiches!), talking about random subjects, being humorous/sarcastic/goofy, traveling, and seeing an occasional baseball game. I consider myself honest, loyal, and reliable. I dress casually almost all of the time.

Beer beats wine, tea beats coffee, water beats soda, walking/transit beats driving, I don't own a bike, fresh air beats air conditioning, natural light beats artificial light, fresh beats canned or frozen. Do not trust the pusher robot. He is malfunctioning.

I don't enjoy watching television, don't play video games, find it hard to talk to people in big groups, not really looking to go on dates, and I'm allergic to cats and dogs. I stay quite busy, so I am interested in people who respect boundaries.

If you're interested in chatting or doing some activities, send a message. Peace!",q4q
24 M4M Around Lancaster PA,"Really looking for at least someone to talk to (or skype?) or meet up with. I'm 24, but don't really look or act it much. I'm about 5'6"".

I like *video games*

*being outdoors*

*surfing the internet*

*reading*

*photography*


I really need to spend some time with a guy and have some fun, and maybe more if we really get along. 

Feel free to ask me questions! :D

Cause I really don't know what else to put here atm. xD


",q4q
[M4W or Queer] A Deaf fella lookin' for fun and bullshit in Indianapolis. [x-post r4r],"Yo, I'm pretty much looking for somebody to hang out with and do anything, let it be getting a delicious locally brewed beer to bullshitting around to getting down and dirty (provided that you're my type- and I warn you, I have strange tastes in people).

I'm Deaf, so that means I sign and all that jazz. So, it would be nice if you knew how to sign (any skill level is fine- I'm amazingly patient!). If not, then I'm fine with a piece of paper and pen provided that you're up for that. I'll bring the pen.

As for me: I enjoy trying to cook, making shitty puns, and swearing out loudly. I write sometimes. I also have a borderline fetish for books and lit comics. Last books that I read: Information, Moonwalking with Einstein, and Steppenwolf. My favorite comic: Asterios Polyp.

Oh, and because a picture supposedly help people take the plunge... Here's a picture of [me.](http://i.imgur.com/cCWhs.jpg)

P.S. If this post seems familiar, fear not! I made a similar post months ago with a throwaway. Being the dork I am, I immediately forgot the password for that account, so I didn't get the chance to see any red/oranges, if there were any. So try again, yeah?",q4q
22 y/o Latino. C2C?,"22 y/o Latino living in Dubai. 
Skype me if you are bored and need to drop a load :)
sebastian081989",q4q
Curious 24m4m nyc,So I'm 24 white 5'11 185 (lil chubby) looking to mess around with a guy for the first time. Currently have a gf so discretion is a must. Willing to try anything at least once ;) looking for someone in a similar situation as me around my age. Hit me up if interested :3,q4q
"22 m4m looking to try things in Palo Alto, CA","I'm a 22 y/o bi curious male in Palo Alto. I'm looking for someone inexperienced to experiment with. I'm not looking for something long term but not a one night stand either. This will not be for today or tomorrow. I want to chat online first, then maybe skype and we'll see how it goes. I want to feel comfortable with someone before I move forward with this and if/when this happens I want it to be more than once.

I'm 5'7, 180lbs, a bit hairy with facial hair (I guess I'm a bit of a bear). I don't have a six pack but I don't think I'm fat either. For what it's worth I work out two or three times a week.

I have had one experience which was fun but we weren't really a good fit, which is a shame. I'd like to try anything from kissing on but NOT anal sex unless we really make a connection. I'm sorry it's just not on the table at the moment.

If this sounds good and you're inexperienced, around my age and in the area let's talk. Bonus points if you can host. Also, if you've read this far and can open your first message with ""waffles"" (yes, its random).

I'm very clean and have been tested. You should be too. I'm down to get tested again. Ideally I'd want your penis in my mouth with no condom...",q4q
Curious for first time :D,,q4q
26m4m [any4friends] Des Moines/Central Iowa no more forever alone.,"I'm a shy extrovert, enjoy trees, Buddhist, gaymer, rage comics, would be considered a cub, but don't like the label. Getting into fitness and bike riding, enjoy science mostly astronomy. Currently working as a C.N.A. in school for nursing. cisMale 26 openly gay [bottom], 5'7 200lbs, black hair blue eyes, which I hear is sexy, ahah! Just looking for lgbt friends, potential dating partner, maybe FWB, I'm relationship oriented but that of course will take time with the right person same with sex it will take time, really just looking for friends anything beyond that depends on how we click. What I'm Attracted to: I'm more into masculine guys [chest hair/beards/deep voices/muscles] ya know superficial stuff, but it really comes down to personality, with the right attitude I can be attracted to almost any one, physical is important but that's usually just hormones and not enough blood to power both heads. After 6 years of being single and finally getting out of poor me mode I'm ready to live like I'm dying and take chances! You don't have to be from Iowa either the more the merrier and out of state friends gives me a reason to travel :D (pic on request)",q4q
24 F4F Bi North-West Nevada Looking for FWB,"Taking a shot in the dark, here, but as the title states--I'm 24 and looking to get out sexually. I havent had the opportunity to be with a woman yet in my life due to familial problems (not out to them yet) and none of my female friends are curious.

I'm slightly shy when it comes to dating, flirting, etc and currently do have a person of interest in my life tho we mutually haven't become official due to distance. He's aware of my sexuality and my need/want to be with women and is quite(probably more than) okay with that (thank god). 

If anyone is around my area and is willing to help me explore and have fun, hit me up! Not looking for anything serious. Have posted a few photos of me on other subreddits (GW and DGW)",q4q
"[24M4M] Lips, Tongue, Hands and Throat, For You - Newport News, Va.","Hey there handsome. 

Want a fancy blowjob from a clean, sane, attractive Redditor? If you've been dying to see if it's true that guys give better head than girls, PM me! If Craigslist is too creepy and OkCupid isn't as direct as you like, I'm your fella. 

I don't really care who you are. I only require that you're A) not going to give me a disease, B) well showered and C) able to send me a cock and face pic.

Reciprocation is appreciated but not required. If we click, you have anything you want from me.
",q4q
[m4any] Bi 20 in Iowa.,Just seeing what's out there.,q4q
24mfm Minneapolis/st,"24 year old guy here with the place to myself tonight.  Would love to have some company, maybe watch basketball or hockey tonight.  ",q4q
[M4A] Bored. Looking to talk. Maybe more.,"As the title suggests, I'm very bored and wanting to talk with anyone. Maybe more. That depends on you. 

I'm 6'2, 275 lbs, shaved head, and beard. I enjoy reading, watching movies, and much more. I'm really into Asian women, if you're bi/trans, and into all types of guys. I'm not opposed to talking to anyone though. Just PM me and we'll see what happens.",q4q
18 [m] here..any guys up for some phone sex?,"18, hispanic, 5'7, scrawny...anymore details just message me.",q4q
[m4m] 23 and bicurious in WNC,"It's been a long time since I've had some fun with a guy and I'm fairly inexperienced, so I figured I'd come on here to see if anyone is interested in casually meeting up for some relaxed, discrete, passionate fun in western NC...",q4q
"[M4M] 18, Baltimore, sarcastic/desperate seeks same","Musician, disillusioned with the ""gay scene"", especially in Baltimore. Looking for someone with no pretensions, who isn't a shallow nincompoop, and while it'd be nice if you're attractive, it's not a dealbreaker. I'd prefer an intelligent gargoyle over an Abercrombie dunce. Here's a pic of me (yes it's mildly retouched, it's my headshot. Deal widdit.) http://imgur.com/MbDxu",q4q
[M4M] 18 bicurious looking to explore in SC,"hey im 18 i live in SC. I am looking for a guy that i can explore with. Im looking for someone that i can either chat with, trade pics or possibly even meet up with and have some fun ;). reply to this or private message me if you are interested",q4q
M4M 20 looking for pic trading.,"I'm a bigger guy, 6'3, 270 lbs, and wanting to trade pics/stories. I'm into all types of guys  I'm not picky. PM me. ;)",q4q
[m4m] [m4t] nyc 4 lol,"This is like 58% creepy, but finding guys in the city can be hard when one is a slightly cynical nerd, so I'm here looking for something more than a fast fuck.
I'm not trans myself but I'm equally open to dating cisguys and transguys, so say hello regardless. equal opportunity internet dating, y'all.
me: I'm 24, kinda skinny, blonde-ish, 5'11"". 
I got a degree in illustration and i'm still trying to figure out what i want to be when i grow up. Currently doing graphic design for iOS and Android (oh god, android. whyyy.)
I tend to enjoy video games (more bioshock and metroid than call of duty) and the drawing and reading of comics (especially ones besides marvel and dc.) 
I'm not especially into going to bars and talking to strangers, so I thought maybe my old pal the internet could help me out. so here I am.
if you:
1. are between 18-35
2. are in the NYC area
3. know the difference between ""your"" and ""you're"" (and there/their, too/to, etc.)
4. know an X-Wing from a Tie Fighter 
then say hello.
be creative, say something besides ""lol hay wuts up lol."" Here, I'll even give you a prompt: what is your favorite pokemon/and/or/vehicle in star wars.
oh and a picture would be nice i suppose.

TL;DR: okcupid.com/profile/raytendo   is me.

(keywords for search purposes: nerd, dork, minecraft, transman, ftm) 
",q4q
M4M 18 looking for bigger guy,Hello.  Im looking for a heftier guy to chat with and possibly more.  By hefty I mean a few extra pounds and/or a big middle.  Would prefer around my age.  Message me.,q4q
"[25] [T4W, T4T] Colorado - Non-op Mtf looking for LTR - Pic Inside","Hi. I'm a non-op, very passable, 25 year-old Trans-girl from Colorado. (I live as female, and created a new username because many people actually don't know this about me.) I am looking for someone to get to know well and see where things go. I'm a professional musician, as well as a technical theatre director, (I'm very heavily involved in the performing arts) and am kind of geeky and very smart. I would consider myself pansexual, but currently am not looking for a ""masculine"" partner, as I usually am not the submissive type. I also want to be with someone I can really connect with philosophically. I'm a fun, kind person to be with, and believe it or not, I've actually been accused of being too open minded! PM me for a gold mine of more info.
Here's a picture of me (SFW, this isn't CraigsList!) http://imgur.com/V31tb
TL;DR - See title, read body, click link, don't read tl;dr again or you'll be in an endless loop.",q4q
[F4F] 23 Northern Virginia area looking to chat and possibly more.,"23 y/o in a small town out side of NoVa looking to meet some new girls. I have two jobs so I work a lot, and don't have a lot of time for things like dating. Little about me; I'm painfully shy, but once I get to know you, I'm a little crazy lol. I love music and sports and being outside. I'm not really a fan of going out, I'd rather stay in and watch a movie or read or something. Anyway... this is becoming long and rambly. If you want to talk, probably awkwardly and about nothing at all, send me a message :)",q4q
M4M looking for some casual fun in vegas next week! ,"I am a nice clean, normal guy and and redditor so I was hoping to find the same for some casual fun while I am in Las Vegas. I am a bottom looking for a top to be specific :) About me- I am 26 years old, work as a software developer. Brown hair, blue eyes, athletic build etc. If you are interested we should chat first and exchange some pics to be sure.",q4q
"Los Angeles, 28m, bi-curious for chat/real life buddy and possibly more?","I'm 28m, not experienced with guys really but looking for someone who is shy, a bit geeky and in the same boat as me as far as the bi/straight thing. Needs to be discreet.

Looking for more than just play as I'm not super social either. Anyhow, PM me if around LA and interested. I'm 5'7"", fit, runner.",q4q
[M4M or Tgirl] Looking for someone to hang out with in Arizona.  Details inside.,"Is it just me or is it kinda dead for threads in AZ?  

Looking for someone to hang out with.  Play video games, watch movies, hopefully leading to more.  Really open minded but kind of new at this.  I can get into details if you message me and are interested.

I've got a post or two in GoneWildPlus if you're really curious.

PM me!",q4q
"19 F4F, just looking for someone to chat with. =]","I feel like the only lesbian in the entire state of Arizona, so it'd be really nice to talk to a girl with similar interests. I'm 5'3"" and 120 lbs and femme. 

(Unrelated: thinking of things to say about yourself is hard.)

I'm a dog person. In fact, I'm actually allergic to cats. I love reading (just finished The Hobbit, current book is 1984). I can't play video games to save my life, but I adore watching them. I think anything under 75 degrees is freezing cold. My friend and I make t-shirts. (Current project? We're making rainbow raptor tees. =]])

I don't have skype (in the process of getting a new computer that could actually handle a webcam, mine is ancient). I can text and have google chat though. Anybody that wants to chat, let me know. =]",q4q
[M4A] Title: Help me explore myself,"So, I'm a young writer who has too much free time on his hands. My greatest love is magic, in the Alan Moore sense of the word. I love to explore. I will always try something twice. 

Every day is a new chance to dig deeper into myself. I am consistently repelled by some of those around me as I frequently sense great depressions in their self awareness. Imitation is suicide and one can indeed be too artsy, therein forgetting the purpose of art: to get our brains off pragmatically, with forward momentum.

Right now: I should be writing (what I do for a living), but instead I'm typing this with my pants off while Guardsman Bob plays in the background. I most frequently enjoy MST3K, great stories in every format and feeling another body under my fingertips. Also 40K.

Shall we?

I live in Newport News, Va., I'm 24, and very bi.",q4q
"M4M 20yr, anyone in the Chattanooga, TN area?","Title says it, looking for friends and maybe more.",q4q
[M4M] Bi-curious Londoner seeks to experience new things... [x-post from gbr4r],"Professional bi-curious early 20s guy in central London, looking to meet someone to go for drinks with and possibly more. In an open relationship with an awesome girl, who's happy for me to see where things go…

I'm tall, slim, and enjoy reading, good tailoring, cooking, and exploring new parts of London. I'm told it's a travesty I've never been to Brick Lane, perhaps you could show me around?

Give me a PM and tell me a little about yourself…",q4q
"24 [M4M] FWB or just Friends? NY, Long Island &amp; Surrounding Areas.","Well I figure I would try this again since I actually had some success before. Perhaps I'll get lucky again and meet someone decent to talk with if nothing else.

I'm a 24 year old guy living in Long Island, specifically Nassau County. I'm looking for guys around my age that I can get to know and perhaps even become friends with. I would like to meet someone outgoing and who has varied interest as mine right now are malleable. I would like to be able to meet interesting people who will be able to open me up to new experiences and activities.

As for me, I enjoy video gaming, movies, tv, etc, all the normal stuff most people do, but recently have gotten into bouldering, working out, and checking out random bars. Ideally I would like to continue progressing in those areas, and would like a buddy to share that with. I'm a bit of a bro sometimes too, so someone like that would be ideal but not required.

While I would ideally like a friend, a FWB type thing would also be awesome, so I'm deff not opposed to things becoming sexual. It would be cool if we could chill out and watch television or play xbox...and then I blow you after. Failing that, having a cool friend would be awesome.

Straight guy friends also would be cool, and I'm not some predatory gay who will try to get into your pants at every moment. I've had many straight male friends who I've been very respectful towards.

Message me on here and we'll talk and see how things go!
",q4q
[m4a] Midnortheastern Iowa. i.e. Waterloo/Cedarfalls.,Just looking to see if there's any redditor's around the area looking for some NSA/FWB type deal. ,q4q
[20M 4 18-25M] Central Florida looking to experiment,http://imgur.com/a/OGsWS#0,q4q
"23F4F/M Mostly looking to talk, maybe practice flirting.","I'm a bi girl who hasn't really had a chance to get out (see what I did there?) much because of my family. Looking to chat with some people, maybe flirt or talk about dating stuff, since I'm really inexperienced.

I'm a linguist looking for a job, and living in frigid Ohio. I love tabletop rpgs, sci-fi and fantasy, music, accents, cooking, crafting, memes, and dark dark chocolate. My dream is to one day be some kind of hippie/hobo/wandering bard something. Being able to go wherever the fuck I want sounds awesome, and working 20 years in the exact same job sounds like the worst thing that could ever happen to me. ",q4q
Louisiana,18 yo male wanting physical action,q4q
"M4Anything, 23, Long Island","I am a 23 year old male from Long Island, pansexual, somewhat genderqueer. I'm a huge nerd, especially into Doctor Who, but fairly open minded. I'm definitely interested in something sexual, but for me, I need someone I can really trust and relate to, so anything in that sphere will take a lot of time. Otherwise, always could use new people to talk to! This is my first time doing this, so if any more information is required, please ask!",q4q
"F4F 23, IL. Looking for new friends and who know what","I'm trying to meet some new people, and just see what happens. I want to be able to connect on a friendship level first, but ultimately find something romantic. 

PM me for more details and to see if we might end up getting along. ",q4q
Waterloo/Cedar Falls area.,"just seeing what's out there, I'm discrete and overall fun! :) hoping to find something without having to use sketchy CL.",q4q
"M (Poly or Bi) ISO [M, MM, F, MF, Couple, Queer, Trans, FTM, M2F, pegging, and probably more] in Chicago.  ","NOTE ----&gt; This is a throwaway for q4q but I will check it as often as I remember. I tend to see posts that are months old and when I reply there is no answer. Please message me, I will get it and respond. Thx

M (Poly or Bi) ISO [M, MM, F, FF, MF, Couple, Lesbians, Queer, Trans, FTM, MTF, pegging, and probably more] in Chicago. 

I am totally and only interested in safe, DDF, play. 

Not really interested in creating life-long partnerships or relationships right now. More interested in play, kinky conversation, NSA, and easy going fun. 





",q4q
M4M 20 in So-cal (951/909 area),"I'm  a bi/pan male. Looking for someone to chat with, maybe meet new friends around here, perhaps more as time goes on. Send me a private message if you're interested.",q4q
Looking for some stellar conversation :D [q4q],"* I'm queer, nerdy, vegan, love non-fiction, and I'm pretty witty.
* Age 20
* Gender fluid
* Pansexual
* Looking for anyone really!
* Los Angeles based :D
 

And this is me: http://i.imgur.com/5fj1J.jpg",q4q
"TF4M/F/T/Anyone really, but especially M in Minneapolis","    Short Bio - I'm a geeky, liminal, compassionate person who's interested in a huge variety
 of topics and practices, but especially loves the outdoors, tabletop gaming, brainhacking, cooking, 
dyeing my hair weird colors and reading. I identify as: transfeminine, genderqueer,
fat and fat-positive, kinky, multiracial, nonmonogamous, and disabled.
Age - 28 years old
Gender Identity - Woman/Genderqueer (trans)
Orientation - Panromantic, pansexual
Who you're looking for - Bi cis men; trans or cis women and genderqueer/agender folks; any age
What you're looking for - A romantic/sexual or FWB relationship; looking to date and have fun rather than get into something intense and serious, but open to what happens there 
Location - Minneapolis
Interests / Hobbies - Games of all kinds, languages, social justice, creative and crafty stuff, outdoorsy or active stuff, conlanging, worldbuilding
Other Preferences (Butch / femme, Cis / trans, Height, Top / bottom, Kink, Single / monogamous cheating / poly, Number of partners, etc.) - Slight preference given to people who self-identify as three or more of the following: tall, kinky, non-monogamous, bi/pansexual. Ability to comprehend a non-op trans woman as a woman, and comfort with dating same, are requirements.",q4q
18F4F Philadelphia (Suburbs),"I'll give a list of a few things about me and you can message me for more information (and pictures):

* I'm a musician, I'm playing in a pit orchestra for a high school performance of Phantom of the Opera soon
* I'm getting a new car relatively soon (Volvo S40!)
* I love Android things
* I love my PS3 to pieces
* I have a really cute dog
* I find horror movies hilarious 

I'm insanely tired right now, so I have NO idea what to write.. You can check out [my Tumblr](http://friendlyneighborhoodgay.tumblr.com/) or creep my Reddit history if you want to get to know more about me.

Or message me! =] 
",q4q
[M4M] 28/m NYC - Let's see how quick I can get some cock this weekend...,"Hey there, I just got back to the states from travelling overseas for a month. I'm pent up and I wanna get off. I can also host this weekend over in Queens.

I'm 5'9'', mixed, 190 lbs, could be in better shape but I'm not unattractive. Curious about guys and I wanna have some fun. Looking for someone around my age who might be in the same boat. But I'm pretty open-minded. I wanna top, but I'd be down to switch to see what it's like.

Hit me up, we don't have much time to waste.",q4q
[m4m] 18 in southern California looking to chat (around my age) etc,"About fifteen minutes out of los Angeles, want to chat to meet new people (relatively shy), maybe more if everything works out...

Edit: pm if interested, probably wont actively be checking this.",q4q
Bi Male looking for male or female for hook-up,"I'm 20, and live in NY. PM me ;)",q4q
"[F4F] 20, Bi, any aussie L/B out there?","Around the brisbane area, I am. I haven't met many l around, and while I'm not sure how I'd go in a LTR with another girl, I'm definitely swinging much further towards the girls.. so I'd like to try. I'm a pretty geeky girl, love my video games and science and animals. Haha, shoot me a message.",q4q
[MtF4WorMtF] Looking for email or skype buddy,"Just looking for someone to talk to, and let anything else just happen.  Points awarded if you're some sort of geek.  Thanks.",q4q
[mCD4A],In the NJ/NY area looking for someone who might be able to help me dress up :),q4q
[M4M] 23 looking for someone in the Philly area,,q4q
"[m4m] 20 y/o gamer in East TN looking for friends around my age, maybe more, depending on how it goes.","Title basically says it all. I just got out of a six month relationship, I've almost entirely lost the will to try dating sites anymore. Basically I'd like to get to know some people and maybe find a relationship that way. Not looking for anyone over 25 though if you're thinking dates, nothing against you, but I'd prefer to keep the age gap relatively small. I'd be glad to game though!

Edit: I say East TN so as to not pinpoint my exact location. I'm actually more around SE TN than East. ",q4q
[m4m] 22 year old cub in Atlanta.  ,"Looking for cubs, chubs, or bears around my age.  PM me if interested or if you want to talk.  :)",q4q
20M4M over 40 to skype!,pm info,q4q
"[M4M/M4FtM] 23, NYC Pokémon Trainer","I'm going to cheat a little bit and just link to my okcupid, since it's pretty thorough and has nice big photos:
Okcupid.com/profile/raytendo

cisgendered and transgendered guys welcome",q4q
F4F 18 Baltimore/dc area,,q4q
[xpost r4r] 20F4F Orlando Florida,"A quick bit about me

I'm a violinist but for now I work as a referral coordinator for a counseling center. I'm an Occupier and spend a large amount of my time at the Occupation.

I love video games and comic books. I've just start reading the X-Men Regenesis books (Mostly Wolverine and the X-Men, also totally love Rogue). I play Minecraft and Guildwars often. I also love tattoos and am working on getting quite a few of them. I'm pescitarian moving towards vegetarianism, but have no issue with those who are not and am pretty comfortable with meat.

Besides getting inked up I spend a bit of time crocheting, working on self-sufficiency and considering writing and drawing my own comic book series.

For the time being I live with my mom, my dog, two cats and two ferrets while I figure out school and what I want to do.
",q4q
"Norther NJ; 30 min outside NYC; M4M, chub, 21-years-old","[Le me.](http://i.imgur.com/r80ea.jpg) I'm about 5'10"", 225#, lookin' for love in all the wrong places. PM me if you're looking for something a little more serious. :P",q4q
Woodsy farmboy FtM4...,"I'm a 32 year old bi/pansexual trans guy. I'm big into ecology, homesteading, and being out in the woods a lot, although presently I live in a city. I'm also kinky (a switchy submissive) and tend to be poly (but not exclusively). 

I'm looking for someone of any gender whose ideal life involves living on the land, growing a lot of food and supporting healthy ecosystems; someone who's preferably also a little bit kinky, and knows what FTM is and could be interested in one. I'm a rarity, I guess—a queer liberal peak-oil prepper and eco-nerd who's looking for a partner or partners in a resilient lifestyle. I can find casual sex, I can find people interested in dating, but I am hoping there are other queers who want to make a life like I do. Respect and good communication are important to me—so's laying naked in the sun, hot sex (I'm really oral), and following our wildest dreams.

I'm on the short side, fit but neither particularly skinny nor muscley, and furry (scruffy beard, hairy chest). White, if it matters. Finished with transition as far as I'm concerned; no surgery necessary. I'm in NoCal but if I find my match/es outside the area, will consider traveling.",q4q
"F4F 23 Fluffy, looking fro a connection in Baltimore","Hello I am looking for something a little more than casual, I've done casual and I'm over it. I am nerdy, very outgoing, I have great friends and I love to party and just be fabulous all-around. If something more is what you have been looking for I would love to hear from you and to start getting to know you!",q4q
NE Georgia or western NC or SC for meet?,,q4q
"Looking for m4m or m4wm - ""Mid"" Eastern Iowa","* *Biography:*  I'm a relatively geeky guy who has undergone some significant changes in the last year.  I've lost a bunch of weight and am currently actively working out.  I'm pretty damn sexy (see my submittals for some pictures).

* *Age:*  32 Years Old

* *Gender Identity:*  Male

* *Orientation:* Bi-Sexual

* *Whom you are looking for:*  Ideally, I'd be looking to hook up with an existing BI couple who are looking for a third wheel.  (The guy has to be ok with me going down on him as well as her.)  FYI:  I'm ok with just guys as well but I desire both equally.
* *What you are looking for:*  I'm not sure that I want a serious relationship.  Really more interested in exploring all facets of my sexuality.

* *Location:*  Waterloo, Iowa

* *Interests:*  Photography, Technology (work in IT), Music (Clarinet), Video Games, Science Fiction Fantasy Books (Wheel of Time / Star Wars)
",q4q
24 yr old Male looking for bi-couple to talk,"I have been wanting a MFM three some for a while, had difficulty finding either a girl who was interested or a guy I liked. Just interested in talking to a man and woman who would be down for something like this. ",q4q
23 Bi-curious male in Toronto,"Hey, Im 23 live in Toronto. I have been having feelings towards guys for a while now, although i dont think I could love a guy,  I want to explore my attraction to the same sex. PM me if your interested :)",q4q
"24M4M in Newport News, VA - Looking to hook up","Sane, bi, looking for some fun sex. Let's talk through PM.",q4q
"24 bi-curious M looking for a man in New Brunswick, Canada","I've always had some attraction to the same sex, and I feel I am ready to explore my horizons. I'm looking for somebody who can help me out. We can meet up in private and just fool around. 
PM me.",q4q
F4F 27 TX,"No idea what to put, so I'm just filling in the blanks. 
  
 1. Short Bio - I'm an introverted science nerd. I love herpetology. I have a BS and am working on an AAS, RVT degree.  I'm a gay atheist, but still in the closet about both. (hence posting here) 
   2. Age - 27 years old
   3. Gender Identity - bisexual, cis, female, who prefers women
   4. Orientation - see above
   5. Who you're looking for - Females around my age or older
   6. What you're looking for - A platonic relationship to start with. I haven't had a lot of experience dating anyone. Maybe just get online and play WoW, or Terraria, or maybe you can suggest a game I haven't tried?
   7. Location - San Antonio
   8. Interests / Hobbies - I love to read, play computer games, and knit. Favorite movie currently: Boondock Saints Favorite book: George R.R. Martin's Song of Ice and Fire series. 
   9. Other Preferences: None that I can think of.  South Texas is pretty oppressive and I'm just putting out feelers for any like minded people in the area. Hell even if you aren't interested, drop me a line and let me know that others exit here.  
",q4q
anyone in central florida?,"Would be open to making some new friends, maybe seeing if we have more in common. Overall I'm just curious to see if there are any other people from central Florida here...",q4q
Q4Q,"Hey, if you're ever near Charlottesville, I'd like to give you a nice full body massage, head to toe, back and front.  I do this with a lot of UVa guys who are curious.  For them, it's not like a full-on gay encounter, cause they're just getting a massage.....but it's from a guy, who knows exactly what guys like, a lot more than the girls they date know how to please them.  It scratches their curiosity itch.  You'll really like it too.  I'm white, 40's, 5'10, 190, brown, brown, friendly, clean, professional and have a house in a nice neighborhood.  Let me know if you're ever near the Charlottesville area.  Thanks",q4q
21 y/o bi male iowan looking to get pegged/bottom,Ive had a fantasy for a long time of being pegged/bottoming and hands free cumming. I know I can do this because ive been able to do it with dildos before now i just need a partner :) none of my past girlfriends have been open to it and its become such an intense desire i feel like Im gonna explode. PM me if interested :) ,q4q
M4M UK Just looking for a boyfriend,"

Don't worry about sending cock shots etc blah blah

Just get in touch :D

29 years of age btw",q4q
"21 M4m DC area, open to in person or chatting online","I'm looking for someone to hang out with and see where it goes. I don't really have any plans in mind, but I'm open to whatever.

21yo, college student, into mountain biking, running, hiking. I love to see films and enjoy what the city has to offer.
",q4q
M4M Phoenix Arizona,Hey! I'm looking for cool guys in the Phoenix area to smoke and hangout with. If we click I wouldn't oppose to hooking up and I'm a pretty open person so everyone feel free to reply!,q4q
[W4W] - AZ - FWB/Lady Friends,"(X-posted /r/r4r)

Ok, well, this will probably generate no responses, but I just thought I'd give it a shot. So I've only been with one woman in my life and it was pretty fucking sweet, so I thought I'd give it a try and see if I can find any ladies of reddit who'd be down to get down -- or at least have some open-minded lady friends.

I'm in my early 20s, clean, pansexual, artsy type, into yoga, and I just like to hang out and do fun stuff. I'm attracted to like-minded ladies who enjoy good music, can hold a conversation, smarts, wit, honesty, and someone who likes to get out of her comfort zone. This might sound shitty but I prefer the more ""alt"" or ""hipster"" looking girl. But you must be clean, private, cute, respectful, and a real woman (I see you, trolls). OH, and **NO DUDES, PLEASE!** ",q4q
18 - Q4Q in Boston,"I'm a college student in Boston who's into literature and writing, musical subgenres that expired in the late 90s, and the most cautious of optimism. I'm male bodied and identify as male in larger society, but I think genderqueer is a more accurate term: I identify best with queer girls. I'm short (5'4'') and fairly slim. Right now I'm looking for friendship or dating with someone who really meshes with me - not a big fan of empty sex, and I won't respond to anyone looking for hookups. But if you're interested in something more, feel free to send me a message!",q4q
Tri-State Area Mischief,"**Me:**

* One of those adventurin' types!
* Eighteen years old.
* NNJ.
* spend my spare time doing volunteer work, hiking, getting pierced / tattooed and going to shows in the city (when i'm not being poor as fuck). 
* I don't identify too fully as either male or female, but I'm beginning transition (FtM) sometime in the near future. 
* Not usually a jerk.

**You:**

* A fellow adventurer!
* An older woman, transwoman and/or transman. No older than 30, though... or, y'know... just don't have kids my age. At least, don't introduce us.
* Have a lovely sense of humor.
* 420 friendly, you obviously don't have to smoke.
* Not a jerk.

Let's make some trouble, huh? ",q4q
"M4M 36 MEL / NZ / SYD / SIN. Also, what dating sites are relevant around here? ","bearish type, 36, 175/98/15 versatile, looking for date / hookup or just a friendly coffee. In Melbourne area until the 22nd, then traveling around NZ until the 8th of December, in SYD until the 11th, and in SIN until the 13th. 

As a followup question, what dating sites are mostly used in this part of the world? In the US I'd go on Craigslist, but that seems pretty low traffic around here. ",q4q
[m4m] 23 year old ginger dude from greater Boston looking for friends/more ANYWHERE,"Hey, what's up?

I'm in southern NH here (an hour from Boston). Looking for friends/romantic prospects/etc from anywhere. 

Figuring some fellow redditors might have some stuff in common with me. Instead of listing my interests, here are some of the subreddits I frequent:
r/beer
r/canada
r/dogs
r/europe
r/finance
r/french
r/gaysports
r/germany
r/hockey
r/iwantout
r/languagelearning
r/linguistics
r/marijuana
r/worldnews
r/worldpolitics
r/lgbtrees


let's chat or something",q4q
M4M UK london/surrey area,"looking for a guy who is looking for maybe a relationship or just some intimate fun... I'm not looking for a one of casual fuck I am ACTUALLY looking for someone who I can be a good friend to (as there are no immediate options in my current envrionment) and hopefully more.

I am looking for older ideally but only because I want something more grown-up than some horny 18 year old guy wanting to hump my leg. I have been only with a few guys due to not being someone who does ""hookups"" honestly the types of psychos you meet off the internet is TRULY shocking 

21-35 basically... I value personality and honesty over looks so don't get any hang ups... PM ME! 

(I can be pure filth in the bedroom, but only for the right person)

Here's naivély thinking there is some sane well settled male out there just looking for a nice time :D and some penis...

I'm bisexual so you don't have to be gay/exclusivly restricted to women... I am not looking for someone who is already in a relationship who wants to cheat &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
",q4q
"[M4M] 19 Suffolk long island
",Looking for some one on the low down. I'm a curious fellow that's never had an actual guy on guy experience (i wont wimp out i promise). I'm looking for some one thats a little more dominat since it is my first time and all. I have a tongue ring;) and if you smoke weed that would be sweet too ,q4q
M4M M4F - 22 Bi Male looking for FWB or LTR in Orange County NY Area,"About me: I'm 6'2, 225lbs, dark blond hair, blue eyes, and extremely nerdy and shy. When I'm not at school or work I'm reading, watching tv/anime, and/or playing a game (MMOs mostly). I don't do drugs or smoke and I rarely drink. Sexually I'm a vers/bottom and I'm open to pretty much anything. Although I don't really have the body for it I like to crossdress. I'm looking for any type of relationship (long-term serious boy/girlfriend to one night stand and anything in between) I'm open to any age/race/gender as long as we have some things in common.",q4q
m4m- 18 in Atlanta looking for friend/possible bf,"so yea. that says it all, i think. i'm young and never been in the dating scene. looking for friend(s) and such. new to ATL as well",q4q
Bi-curious male looking for a guy or a male/female couple to explore with (First time doing this...),"Just what the title says... **Just in Seattle instead of Nowhereland, USA**.

I have never really been comfortable admitting that I am somewhat turned on by penises, but now I have come to terms with the fact that while I love vagina, I am curious to find out what a penis is like sexually.

I'm not looking for a boyfriend or anything long-term, just someone I can explore my sexuality with.

Please PM me, I am a little scared to post a picture (Though I think I might have a few pics of myself in my history, so I guess that point is moot...), but maybe we can talk.

(I am disease free - I have the papers to prove it!)",q4q
[M4M] Skype Fun,"Looking for some skype fun ;)

PM if interested",q4q
"Are there actually any stable guys on here looking for a partner either short term or long term?

And if so are you actually in the uk anywhere?",casual 'hookups' are out the window at the moment guys... as bullshit as that sounds I really don't dig jumping into bed after 5 minutes... to share your HIV with me because you can't maintain some standard of self control.,q4q
"[MTF4F] Toronto, looking for something casual, maybe some friends, maybe something more",Just been feeling extremely lonely lately and all my attempts too meet people have failed. Know its a long shot but if your fine with trans chicks and STI free give me a shout.,q4q
"M4M-24-Chicagoland, mutual oral and maybe more",Message me for details,q4q
"[F4F] Tri state area, New York Geek","Hello. :3
I am a smiley bubbly girl looking for females in the new york area. I am on the border of NJ and about 30 minutes away from PA.
I like vintage video games as well as new ones. I am an artist, I love to draw, think, create, and be immersed in nature. I am a passionate individual and am very tolerate and accepting and loving. Looking for someone who is around my age, not over 32 though, and someone who is looking for a girlfriend, a friend, a casual relationship, a playmate... really anything. But I must get to know you first. :3
",q4q
M4M Looking for some fun over the weekend,"I'm just a laid back guy looking for a little fun over the weekend. 5'11"", 270#, moderately hairy. Brown hair, blue eyes. I have pics to trade, and have been told that I have a nice cock. Hope to hear from you soon. Oh, yeah: Drug and disease free. 420 is okay by me.
Edit: I'm in Sacramento, Ca... can't believe I forgot that part.",q4q
M4MtF or MF or smooth M Let's meet up in San Diego CA,"Open for fun people only, no drama just naked fun.",q4q
"M4M Why is there nobody here from Michigan?  I have tried several times over the past year to find someone, and nothing.... Looking to give or receive oral, or more.","28/m/MI.  Regular redditor, but using a throwaway for this.

I am very clean, disease free, shaved, and besides being chubby, take good care of myself.  You must be clean and disease free as well.  I am open to trying anything, but would like to give or receive oral.  

I will get a nice jacuzzi suite at a nice hotel.  I live in West Michigan, but can travel to the east side as well.

If you are a bit shy at first we can always hang out or watch a movie and take things slow (I would prefer it this way).

Like I said, your body type, or looks/age don't matter to me as long as you are over 18, clean and disease free.  

Message me if you are interested. 

Here are the links to the pics of my stuff: NSFW
[First Album NSFW!](http://jason9770.imgur.com/gonewild#MVgmo)
[Second Album NSFW!](http://imgur.com/a/0I3Ci)",q4q
"19[M] for anyone, just looking to trade a few photos with anyone ;)",Shoot me a pm if interested,q4q
M4M/MF in Michigan (west or east side). 28/m/chubby (pics included) Not too experienced but read within.,"What the title says. I am a regular redditor under my main account, but made this throwaway for obvious reasons. I am looking for a guy or couple to join me for a night this weekend. I just got a new apartment in Grand Haven, but cannot move in until next week. I am planning on getting a nice jacuzzi room at a hotel this weekend in either the Holland/Muskegon/Grand Rapids area, or possibly even the east side of the state near Flint.

I don't have a ton of experience with guys, but have been pegged (and many other things) by my ex-gf many times, and have given a couple blowjobs before, and have been on the bottom of a 69 before while the girls boyfriend gave her a nice creampie. I am up for trying anything.  I am very orgasmic and capable of having multiple orgasms without stopping.

I am very clean, disease free, shaved, and besides being chubby, take good care of myself.

Anyone want to join me? If you are a bit shy at first we can always hang out or watch a movie and take things slow (I would prefer it this way).

Here are the links to the pics of my stuff:  NSFW

[First Album NSFW!](http://jason9770.imgur.com/gonewild#MVgmo)

[Second Album NSFW!](http://imgur.com/a/0I3Ci)
",q4q
[(t)w4w] Nerdy trans girl looking for other queer girls for friendship/dating around Los Angeles,"who: 29 year old homoromantic, pansexual trans girl. Non-op.

pics:http://imgur.com/a/RPpHe

By day, I'm a PhD Student at USC. When I'm not working (which granted isn't a lot of time, but) I do stuff like watch british tv, anime, and cartoons, read comics, reddit, and tumblr (I've learned this week I'm apparently a stereotypical tumblr lesbian). I also Cook and Bake as well as into craft beer and mixology. I also playing the bass (passably) and guitar (badly). I love going to live shows (Echo, El Rey, Wiltern, Music Box, etc.), watching movies at the New Bev when I can. I also like stuff like volleyball and fencing, but I haven't had the chance to play in years. 

I'm looking for queer girls in their mid 20s to mid 30s to hang out with, mostly since my current friends are mostly straight nerds or, if they're queer, are pretty much not connected with the local scene. I'm not too hung up about looks or types (I guess I prefer folks in the middle, but high femme and stone butch girls are both cute as hell) or anything, tough I'm pretty much in the femme spectrum (what I've heard called ""diesel femme"").

I'm looking for either friends or some short term dating. I'm in an open long distance relationship, so I'm up to dating and other stuff as well, though I can't commit to anything long term. 

That said, I love running around the city when I have free time. I'm up for most anything as long as it's in L.A. county and I have time and money :D 
",q4q
[M/f4f] Houston 21/f and 30/m looking for a bi young female,"We are best friends, not bf/gf. We are cute and geeky which sounds like a contradiction I know, lol. We love going out to places (like parties and other interactive places or to places like the movies or museum). We have a sweet, kind, and gentle personalities. If interested, please leave a message or PM. Thanks in advance.",q4q
M4T in Virginia. Looking for a lovely transgendered person of any orientation.,"A little bit about myself, I'm a bi young man (24) who has had many a fantasy about being lucky enough to have an experience with a transgendered person. However, I seem to have had zero luck in my searching over the past few years. 

I'm really quite open to anything and everything. Are you one? I hope you'll PM me so we can strike up a conversation.

Professionally, I'm a writer and the rest of the time I'm a nerd who reads, writes, watches and plays all day. I'm white with medium length curly hair and a slender build.

Hope to hear from you soon.",q4q
M4M in DC or Nova,"Hey,

new to the scene, looking to explore my bi side with a safe and sane partner who can host.  I'm 26, wm, 5'7"", 165 lbs.  I fancy myself submissive/total bottom and wear panties occasionally.  Am looking for someone who is my age or older, sane, safe, a bit dom, a bit verbal.  Looks not terribly important, but please be clean.  

Would love to email a bit first, maybe skype, then meet in public and see where things go.  

message me if this interests you.",q4q
[M4M] - looking for a fun man to engage in dirty talk.,"Exactly what the title says. 

I prefer to use AIM, but doing it through reddit messaging can be good too.",q4q
w4w Disabled shut-in needing an online ... something :P,"I'm a 27 yr old lesbian and my situation is not so good. I am disabled because of a neurological disease and can't work and usually don't leave the house (mainly because there's no reason to, it's a huge effort because I'm sick, and gas money). I'm not disfigured or wheelchaired. I look healthy but feel terrible. 

I live with a very loving family that takes care of me but they are fundamentalist homophobic conservative morons. I love them but they suck! I depend on the internet to keep me sane from day to day. 

I read a lot and am addicted to puzzle games. Watch a lot of movies and tv shows. That's what I do to pass the time. I like science, especially biology. I work a tiny bit with my family's online business doing the nerdy parts of things when I can or am needed. 

I'm kind of embarrassed to be posting this because it feels pretty pathetic but if there is anyone else out there who is for whatever reason stuck in life, spending a lot of time online, or can only have an online romantic relationship... I don't really expect anything to come of this and I'm not looking for people who feel sorry for me who will talk to me a little bit now and then. I'm really hoping there is someone else out there like me who needs to make a connection with someone even tho it can only be over the internet. 
",q4q
"M4M  M4F  [UK] Bisexual guy living just outside london seek male or female for some grown up fun that might lead into more.

","Fuck it you guys seem a bit more stable than the r4r lot :D

All the usual stuff people... clean, friendly, etc...

I am looking for someone ideally in south london area or within easy travel distance... I am not looking for just a one off 10 minute encounter... YES I am looking for sex like ANY human being is but an intimate friendly encounter would be nice... I wouldn't want to just turn up and have you decide within 5 minutes you don't want me around... ideally someone who is also looking for a relationship... even if it turns out not to be me... that's fine so long as we're both on the same page...

email me on stargatemunky@gmail.com as I don't check my reddit mail often and I can access my gmail anywhere...

i'm a 29 bi male who is getting settled in at my job and life..",q4q
M4M Curious Oregonian looking for short-term fun.,"Hey, I'm a bi-curious male in the Portland-Metro area of Oregon. I am 18 and very curious about penises. I really want to give head to be honest, I just want to see what its like. What it feels and tastes like. My girlfriend tells me I would give great head (due to how well I suck her fingers) and I have always wanted to actually try out the real thing. I'n not looking for anything long-term, I just want to meet up, have a quick fuck, try some stuff out, then part ways. After that we can decide whether to keep in contact or not. I'm not even really wanting to hang out first or ""get to know you"". I just want to dive into the sex and experiment. I'm just looking for someone who's willing to let me experiment a little and have some fun :) simple as that.

I'm a white, lanky yet strong guy with an 8 and a half inch cock. Short blond hair and blue eyes. Hope that helps ;)",q4q
"[f4f] Rochester, NY ; pretty much anything","Hi! So, I'm a student at the U of R in my early 20s. I like baking, science fiction and fantasy, other kinds of nerdery like RPG games (tabletop and video), etc. I probably talk a lot, especially when I'm nervous. I'd like to meet other queer women, make some new friendships, and learn a little bit about being part of a community of people-like-me, because while I love my friends I am used to always being the odd-one-out. I would really like to get involved in the local queer community but I suffer from social nerves and would prefer to ease into it by meeting a few people in lower-key situations than just going out to a bar. If hanging out and getting a coffee or something sounds like fun to you, let me know!",q4q
[M4M] curious college student in Atlanta ,"I'm 21 140lbs skinny build white, I've never been with a guy before I want to mess around with someone but it has to be discreet, I would prefer the more nerdy type of skinny guy but whatever is cool also it'd be nice if this was your first time with a guy as well I've tried this on reddit before but got no response ",q4q
[MtF (pre everything) 4 Dgaf (someone single)] Pomona ish area. ,"I'm a 3rd year student in the Pomona area. I'm mtf preverything but love being treated as a girlfriend or female partner. I am usually identified as a lesbian with pansexual tendencies so I want some to cuddle with, game with, and someone who is open to non-gender normative contact. Post here or pm me (^_^)/",q4q
"[Q4Q] - San Diego, CA","Teeny Bio - I'm a 26 year old law student currently trying to become the World's Most Awesome Queer Family Attorney(tm) 

Gender Identity - I'm a cis-gendered man

Orientation - Butch Dyke (yup.)

I'm looking for - masculine folks of all genders.

I'm hoping for platonic friends at first, as I'm super shy (and moving to WA state in 2013). Maybe casual dinners or the occasional silly movie followed by making out in a car or something equally cliche.

Interests / Hobbies - I'm a classically trained tubist (15 years playing!), I'm a semi-published composer in my secret former life prior to law school, I love to cook and bake (but I'm relatively awful at it), and I love going to the symphony. Oh, and I like pie.",q4q
Gq4q - Los Angeles,"Hi, I am a 19 year old urban survivalist living in Los Angeles. I love exploring the city and finding places such as Senor Fish to drink and eat fish tacos, Dai Ko Kuya to enjoy the most excellent ramen, and the Dragon Ladys jewelry shop in China Town for the lively atmosphere. Although I may vary, I consider myself genderfluid and pansexual. I am looking for someone to spend time with whether it is a platonic relationship or something more.

I am 5'6'', poly, currently off and on with an ex, and would like to meet someone interesting.",q4q
21/m M4M - Ohio,"Just wondering how many safe, sane and drama-free dudes there are in Ohio. I prefer 20-25, but will make exceptions.

Leave a comment, or message me.",q4q
[m4m] 25/m in North Jersey looking for mutual oral sex,,q4q
M4M (20) - Virginia,"Looking for a guy in the commonwealth, college student almost 21 looking for friends or whatever I can get.",q4q
"(M4M)26yr old in Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia, looking for awesome queer friends/partners"," Hey. I'm a skinny Malay cis-gendered guy who is really into Marxism and philosophy, and serious chats about feminism and queer stuff. I'm an animator and sort of an art geek, I love running and getting high and climbing into abandoned buildings and couch-surfing across europe, but now I'm stuck here for a bit. I'm totally into young transfolk and genderqueer peeps as well cis-gendered queers. Not really much of a clubber, but love a good conversation, possibly followed by makeouts!",q4q
"San Antonio Gay, 18","Hey. I am in San Antonio and looking for someone to hang out with and mess around with. Message me if you are interested :D, I am 6'4"", 150 lbs, blonde, green eyes",q4q
Fluffy 23 year old Chicagoan looking for a new toy,,q4q
Cape cod,Any masculine guys on the outer cape? Eastham here,q4q
M4M masc/str8-acting guy (20) looking for another masc/str8-acting guy in the NYC area,"Short Bio - I'm a white college student who likes watching sci-fi and comedy TV shows and movies. I'm studying for a business major in Advertising/Marketing.

Age - 20 years old

Gender - Male

Orientation - Biromantic Homosexual

Who you're looking for - A guy who is 18-25 who you couldn't tell is gay unless you were told that (basically gender conforming)

What you're looking for - I'm basically looking for someone to hang out with and not ruling out the possibility of anything more.

Location - Anywhere in the New York City area

Interests / Hobbies - Surfing the Internet, reading, shopping for food and tech stuff, watching TV when a new episode comes on of The Office, Family Guy, or anything else that keeps me entertained

Music interests - I like what's popular basically... I'm very open minded with music...

Send me a message on Reddit if you're interested...",q4q
M4M  curious 21 yo looking for same around the Atlanta area ,"I'm 21 140lbs skinny build white, I've never been with a guy before I want to mess around with someone but it has to be discreet, I would prefer the more nerdy type of skinny guy but whatever is cool also it'd be nice if this was your first time with a guy to ",q4q
[MF4biM] bi curious husband and wife lookin for a bi curious male in the okc area ,My wife and I are happily married but we're looking to try something new. I'm curious to experiment with another male. Looking for a bi curious white skinny clean disease free average penis condom wearing handsome outgoer. I'm not looking to share my wife but I would like to share this experience with her. No strings attached. Just a one time thing and see how it goes. If you are interested pm me and we can trade p4p,q4q
m4m for phone fun,"31m married m looking for phone fun with same. more bottom, so you be top.",q4q
"Que Sera, Sera (OK) [17/gay] nothing serious","I am 17. Into body mods, anime/manga, other cultures and languages, book, music, dancing.

I am rather blunt. I will sometimes give you an answer even if you didn't ask just to make you blush and/or feel awkward. I am trying to control this lol.

I am also a furry and love the fandom. Lots of my online friends are furries. I have yet to meet a furry irl.

I like to ponder and be philosophical at times but mostly I like to have fun and be mellow.

So comment and we can be friends? Or down vote me into oblivion and I will just go elsewhere :9",q4q
M4M (NYC) Bi-curious and want to give a guy a shot...,"Hey, 27/m in NYC. 5'9'', not in terrible shape. I'm nerdy, sarcastic, into video games and music, laid back dude. I'm curious about guys, and this is probably a more appropriate place to seek this out. Looking for someone around my age. It'd be cool if you were curious also. Equal footings nice, but I won't shy away from someone more experienced.

PM me, let's get the ball rolling and see what happens. :) Thanks all.",q4q
"M4*, ~21, Adelaide (.sa.au)","I'm a moderately well-known student around Adelaide Uni. I won't go into too much detail here as, while I'm not exactly closeted, I have political ambitions and prefer not to shout about my sexuality *too* much. 
I'm an atheist, ex-Catholic, who likes his food and drink and cycles for fun.

I'm 6'1"", brown hair and eyes, long hair and beard (and now you know who I am :) )

Looking for male, female, or anywhere in between, for love, friendship, or just plain sex - most interested in under-30 (and obviously legal), but charm is more important than some number.

I'm open to experimentation, but haven't got any  kinks myself.
Philosophically, I'm a fan of polyamory, but have always been in monogamous relationships in the past.


&lt;yes.this.is.a.throwaway@gmail.com&gt;

PM or email me if you want to meet up - I'm not an axe murderer (that would make a mess of the floorboards :) ).",q4q
M4m looking for fun in socal this weekend :),Looking for another male to experiment this weekend or following weekends. Send me a message :),q4q
21 bi male looking in Rockford Illinois area.,,q4q
[M4M] Columbia SC. Here for a few more months,"Hello,

I'm 21, male, white, 5'11, 155, good looking (I think so anyway). I'm living in Columbia and will be for a few more months. I'm looking to have a good time and meet someone. I'm not totally against just a hookup, but if you want to go out and have some fun that would be cool.

Message me if you are interested and we can talk/share some pics. 

Thanks!",q4q
"/r/Q4Q, you have been chosen as Subreddit of the Day for July 19, 2011!",,q4q
[cdM4a] N.NJ/NY Metro area- crossdressing fetishist looking for a hookup,"Hey there, I'm an 18-year-old bisexual college student with a crossdressing fetish looking for a hookup. I'm 6 feet tall, 200 lbs, and there are (explicit) pictures of me on this account. I'm not looking for a relationship right now; friendship with benefits would be nice, but it's not necessary. Right now I just want someone to have transgressive, kinky, abominable-in-the-eyes-of-god sex with. 

I live in Morris County, NJ, and can travel to any location within two hours by train.

My hobbies include ultimate frisbee and a martial art. I love to read-sci-fi and fantasy. I enjoy listening to ska, many things in the genre-constellation called 'rock', and stuff that falls under the label electronica. Oh, and did I mention I dress up in ladies' underthings for jollies? I think I probably did.",q4q
"[MFM/T(MtF)] Cincinnati OH, 23 Year Old Bi Chub here looking for friends(Online or Offline) or Friends with Benefits.","Hi all, Like the title says I am looking for people to either befriend on the internet or IRL. I would love a email/text buddy or someone to actually hang out with. I am your average guy, who plays video games, watches sports, enjoys reading, music, drinking and just hanging out. I am bi-curious, and have not really experienced much and would like to find someone to talk with :). Send me a PM!! ",q4q
[Chicago] gay-m/bi-m looking for a third,"we are a 22yr old mostly bottom gay dude and a 25 yr old mostly top bi guy in a hot and awesome relationship.

looking for a third to join us for some fun. you need to be 22-30, drug/disease free, recently tested, gay and preferably bi-curious or less experienced.

let's grab a drink and ""get to know each other"" beforehand. couples welcome too! ",q4q
(W4W) Anyone in the 'Noke?,"I'm 21 and usually with fantastic hair (not so much right now) and always with my awesome hat. I'm pretty much just looking for friends right now. I love creepy, I'm a serious nerd and I'm oozing with poetry and scary stories. 

Anyone?",q4q
[M4M] 21 Maryland Chat/Meet/Whatever!,Message me if you want to talk...interested in folks around my age..thanks.,q4q
[M4MW] 29 NYC/Jersey ISO play with you and your girl,"Hi all. Bicurious 29yo guy here. Well traveled, nerdy, sense of humor extra dry. Looking for a nice experience and hopefully an ongoing relationship to top/bottom with a nice guy and his female friend. Thanks!",q4q
23f bisexual looking for new friends in NC,I'm moving to North Carolina in about 5 weeks and I would love to get some new friends there. PM me if you're interested. ,q4q
"M4M Curious, looking for stroke buddy","Straight and curious here, would love to find someone else straight who occasionally wanted to check out some (almost entirely) straight porn, just stroke and chat. If you're in FL that's a huge bonus, but just chatting is fine for now. ",q4q
[M4M] - Bi-Curious 24 y/o in Northwestern PA.,PM me. want to know if what I've felt for years is real.,q4q
[F4F] 20 y.o bisexual gender-confused person looking to chat :),"Heya, I'm kinda sick of not talking to anyone. I'm a gamer, your typical FAloner I suppose, so I miss the whole talking to people thing.

I live in the Boston area, and go to school about 45 minutes from the city (but I'm on summer break now). Not sure if I'm up for hanging out but maybe if we talk for a while I'll warm up more to you. :)

Let's see, I'm big into gaming, preferably real-time strategy or RPGs. A favorite off the top of my head is Final Fantasy Tactics (and almost all of the following spin-offs). Unfortunately, this makes a lot of the games I play single-player. To make up for this, I play League of Legends. It provides me with a way to chat with people, even if it's only sparse in-game communication.

I listen to a lot of music, and my tastes change a lot. Genres off the top of my head that I listen to nowadays are: deathcore, dubstep, drum n bass, grime, glitch, and gabber. I enjoy some metalcore and emocore, and occasionally a top40 song (if it has an awesome remix somewhere).

During school I tend to read a lot. I have way too many books, and a heck of a lot more on my iPhone. I'm in the very middle of the Legend of Drizzt series by R.A. Salvatore, and before that finished Under the Dome by Stephen King.

I guess all that makes me a nerd? Ah well. I hope I don't sound too boring, lol.

Well, send me an orangered or somethin'. :)",q4q
(M4M) 18 looking for someone to chat with,"I'm an 18 year old dude living in southern California looking for some guys to talk to and maybe something more :). i'm into reading, playing video games, going out with friends and visiting new places. There's a lot more i could list but for the sake of interest i'll leave that to chatting. Message me if you're interested.",q4q
[M4M] 21 looking in SFV,"Hi I'm actually 22 (just turned so I'm not use to it yet and I don't know how to change title) Bi guy living in the San Fernando Valley (Sylmar) here in Southern California and I am looking for other guys around my age to hang out with!

I am nerdy and love to play video games, RPG's, and everything internet XD I enjoy GFX Design and Web Design. I like to go to movies, hang out at...where ever, and cook. Cooking is fun! I'm very into art, drawing, painting you name it.

I'm trying to expand my horizon and meet new people so if anyone is interested send me a message and maybe we can get to know eachother :)
",q4q
"M4M in Columbus, OH","i have tried OKC and other sites and haven't found anyone i ""click"" with yet, so giving this a shot as well. i am a gay/bi man in Columbus, Ohio (i say gay/bi bc i do consider myself bi but have a stronger attraction to men and that is my main focus on dating.) i have a job i like, own a home, have good friends and lots of interests, but i am missing that one special person. i like to take walks, hold hands, kiss, and snuggle. i also like to go out and dance (love Funk-defy at Circus!) i enjoy movies, music, reading. i work out 4-5 times a week but i don't consider myself ""buff,"" i am more average. oh, yeah, i am also 6'4"" tall and would love to date someone about my height but that is not a requirement.

if you want to know more, message me. :)",q4q
[m4m] bi guy in Boston,"hey i'm looking to hang out with the right guy in the Boston area. i have almost zero dude experience, would like to experience it. i'm really uninhibited. 

for brevity here's my okcupid profile. ask me anything if you wish.

http://www.okcupid.com/profile?u=nerocorvo",q4q
"[CD4m/kinky f]figured I'd post again since it's been a while- 18, north jersey","18 M, I live in Morris county. I'm a bisexual crossdressing fetishist looking for a FWB... there's some pictures of me in my submissions; my face for yours if you're interested. ",q4q
M4T (FtM) Looking for some pegging fun in Seattle [crosspost from r/r4r],"I was wondering if there are anyone in the seattle area who might be curious about trying some pegging play or better yet if there is anyone experienced in pegging play that would like a willing peggee to play with. If so, hit me up
",q4q
"[m4m] 21 y/o, Bloomington, IN","Hey all, I'm an IU student staying/living in town over the summer, looking for some decent folk in town to chill with, possibly hook up and hit it off if things go well. I'm 21 years old, 6'4"", white, ~230 lbs, brown hair/blue eyes. As for hobbies, I mostly like to hang out and/or chillax, write and record music, read a lot, draw, play video games and watch TV shows like The Daily Show, Louie, Metalocalypse and The Simpsons (the good, old episodes). I drink, and I enjoy smoking trees. Hit me up if you'd like to talk, meet up, or whatever.",q4q
[m4m] Indianapolis,"31, in reasonable shape, looking for guys to hang out with, date, casual sex, whatever.  I'm up for just about anything.  Mainly a bottom so if you top thats a definite plus :)",q4q
[MTF 4 F/MTF] Cute 20 yo MTF lesbian looking for F or MTF.,,q4q
[w4w] 20 female Australia looking for Aussie girls.,"Just looking to meet new people as I don't have many gay/bi friends.

:)",q4q
[M4M] Straight male isn't so straight - NoVa,"Bi curious male here. Never been with a guy before but I'm dying to experiment.
A bit about me, I'm a writer working from home. I live in Woodbridge, filling my free time with League of Legends, reading, WoW, watching some Doctor Who, Game of Thrones, maybe some TNG. Love some table tops also. I drink, smoke trees and that's about it.
Hit me up if you think you might be open to experimenting in a comfortable, chill environment. Don't wanna just go straight for it, maybe a drink first?",q4q
[m4a] 18 bi male/sometime crossdresser in NNJ for fwb/cd stuff,"Hey there! I'm an 18-year-old bisexual male in Morris County, looking for either someone for some fun sexy times on the DL (kinda afraid of being gaybashed) or someone to assist in crossdressing, especially in getting to thrift stores and such... or both, if that's your flavor of cookie.

Speaking of cookies: my hobbies include cooking/baking, video games, reading, and frisbee. I'm 420 friendly, but not a smoker myself. If you're interested, PM me and we can discuss pictures/meetups/whathaveyou.

Thanks for reading!",q4q
M4t (m2f) CT?,"Actually just a little curious, never done this before, ",q4q
"[M4M] UK, Oxfordshire or Hull","Here I go again. It's worth a go, though, I guess.

For a relationship, or just some nsa fun. :)

Here's a link to my pics thread comment: http://www.reddit.com/r/lgbt/comments/gcebi/picture_thread/c1mjfvp

I don't wanna say too much more online here, but PM me. :)",q4q
M4M Looking for first time in west Michigan. Can host.  Grand Rapids Area.,"I am looking for my first time.  I would like to try giving oral and receiving anal, and reciprocating if you would like.  I am on the chubby side, but distribute my weight well.  I am shaved down there, and I am willing to try anything.   I can host.  Must be discreet.  Looking for this week.  BE CLEAN AND DISEASE FREE!

I am a regular redditor posting under a throwaway for this.

",q4q
Intersexed person looking for queer/bisexual/pansexual females,"Hi! I'm 36. I live in NJ. I look (and was raised) male but was born intersexed. I've had breast surgery and genital surgery to make me look more masculine, but I don't completely identify as male.

I like queer women. I'm attracted to bisexual women, lesbians, former tomboys. I like my women with a bit of masculinity or genderqueerness to them. 

As for what I like? I'm into world religion, leftist/libertarian politics, good food, and simple living. I consider myself a religion geek as I'm interested in lots of different religions. I like good films and read a hell of a lot.",q4q
"m4m curious for more in austin, tx","so I've been sucked by a TS and I've sucked a big ole bear but I want to try more. Specifically I want to suck more dick and get fucked. 

30 6'2 250 brn/hzl hairy 6"" uncut and looking for someone legal. ",q4q
[m4m] or [m4mm] curious and a guy/ guys to show me the ropes,"**Los Angeles area**


Hey q4q, I'm 21, 5'10"", 165, 7.5'x6.5' and looking to explore a bit. I usually am not attracted to men, but occasionally I see a guy and just can't help myself but fantasize about him.  Looking for someone to show me the ropes. It doesn't have to be strictly business. I like:

*video games

*drawing

*music (70's/80's punk, thrash, metal, jazz, hip-hop, and a few .genres here and there)

*books (mostly science fiction and science)

*comic books

*weed 

*beer

*other drugs for fun

*feet

*penis, although i've yet to see one IRL, when i see a nice one I'm just as aroused as when i see a vag. God,  the thought of a meaty cock in my mouth petrifies my own.

*I've been pegged by an ex gf of mine and i really enjoyed it, although it was pretty small.

*eating ass

*satisfying my partner.



Sorry if I sound ignorant or offensive In any way, I've had gay friends i just never talked to them about sex.

I'm REALLY excited, so don't be shy


",q4q
"[m4m] 26 year old bi curious guy in East Cornwall, UK looking to experiment.","Not sure if there is anyone else nearby reading this, but what the hell.

Never done anything with a guy before, but recently found myself really wanting to try it. I'm looking for a guy not much older than me (18 to 28 roughly), I don't mind how experienced you are (in fact I'd quite like it if I was your first experience with guys as well) as long as you aren't overly pushy and are STD free.",q4q
[m4m-m4t] Curious in the Twin Cities (xpost /r/r4r),"Im bi curious and of course a little apprehensive, looking to experiment a little, or a lot.",q4q
w4w- 23 y.o Fem for friends and maybe more? nyc area,"hey, I'm 23 African american fem lesbian who is looking to meet some new lesbian women, just as friends or maybe more? Drinks, a walk through central park, or anything really would be cool by me. I love to live and experience life, laugh until I cry and believe in total honesty, even if it hurts. :)",q4q
"m4m - Morris County, NJ or anywhere in North Jersey","Hello all,

I am a 24yo bi guy in NNJ looking for some other in-shape guys to meet up with for friendship and possibly more.

I'm 5'11"", 155 lb, laid back, 420 friendly, open minded.

Let me know if you're interested in meeting up. I have pics to share as well.",q4q
[m4m] Baltimore,"Hey, I'm a redditor looking to meet another redditor in the Baltimore area. I'm looking for something casual, exclusive and discreet. Just for fun. PM me if you'd like more info. ",q4q
M4M Looking for a jerk-off buddy in Houston,"Mid-20's, chub &amp; can't host. Orangered if you're interested.",q4q
[m4m] bi-curious looking for first hook-up - Chicago NWBurbs area,"MWM 35, 6'2"" little chubby, otherwise good looking. For years I have had fantasies about getting screwed by a guy and now I'm finally looking to satisfy that curiosity. I don't want to live my life having not experienced this at least once! :) Anyway, I've never done this before so I'm a little nervous. Looking for one-time (or maybe more, if I like it) fuck buddy to meet up (me bottom.)

Please PM with your details, what you're into, and pic if you are interested in a lunchtime hookup.",q4q
[m4m/f] Looking near DC area (x from r4r),"25 year old bi newbie to the DC/NoVa area looking for chatting, a friend, someone to go out with, fwb, or whatever might come from it.  I'm a little shy so it might take a bit to get me comfortable.  Looking to talk at first and see how things roll.

Not sure what else to write. Look forward to hearing back",q4q
"[w4w] 18, looking for Relationship, OK","Aspie nerd. I like anything computer related, anime/manga and sci-fi. Soft butch, mostly tshirts and jeans w/o makeup.",q4q
[M4M] 20; NJ; looking for a relationship…,"I just posted this on /r/lgbtmeetup, as well, but I like to diversify my assets lol. So, just to satiate curiosity — pictures first: [uno](http://i.imgur.com/0H7Y6.jpg), [dos](http://i.imgur.com/hhPRB.jpg), [tres](http://i.imgur.com/8kLOo.jpg). All images are completely SFW.

My name's Kris, I'm 20, and I'm from New Jersey. I'm gay, but you don't have to be gay to date me (I've never understood the 'bi-hate' that goes on sometimes, you know). I'm 5'9-10"", about 210 lbs. (sometimes less, sometimes more), so I'm clearly not skinny, but I'm absolutely happy with my body the way it is. I speak Spanish, and I'm currently pursuing a degree in Spanish Literature at my college; I'm not closed off from other languages, though — in fact, I love learning other languages. My friends have taught me a little Bulgarian, and because I love French pop, I can speak a little bit after years of listening to it. I'm also taking Japanese right now, so I'm clearly a bit crazy （だから、頭がいい、ね？At least I hope lol）

If you catch me at the right time, I can be extremely talkative. I'm not really a sexually-oriented creature; what I mean by that is that I'm not just seeking sex from someone — honestly I'm practically asexual when it comes to the bedroom… I love cuddling, making out, and the like, but I have a low sex drive, otherwise — and I'd really love to have a strong, intimate connection with someone on an intellectual level.

My type of guy is around my age range, maybe ~17-24, taller than me (which I know seems awfully shallow, and I'm sorry cuz there are some truly great shorter guys, but I feel awkward being the tall one!); I don't care if you're skinny, toned, fat, whathaveyou, just so long as you're a genuine person and you don't mind opening up immediately. I harbor no secrets, you know? Vulnerability is a key personality trait that we *both* need to have in order to verily get to know one another well. And as far as distance and all that goes, I'm open for long-distance, even though I'd prefer someone whom I could meet in person more immediately, but if we find a way to Skype/text/maintain frequent communication in general, I think we're all set and golden.

So don't be afraid to message me. I don't bite. (: Just pretty please provide some pictures and stats (like height/weight) if you choose to say hello.",q4q
MtF4Whatever,"Icelandic transwoman looking for people to chat with about anything and nothing.

I am 32 years old with a degree in computer science, and work as a Technical Artist. I also dabble in writing, poetry, drawing, painting, and all sorts of things. 
[Old Art](http://pixelrambo.deviantart.com/)

I consider myself a geek and love watching sci-fi(Babylon 5), fantasy(Xena, please don't make fun of this :S), and play games, my favourite game being Ninja Gaiden 2(having a blast in Just Cause 2 these days though). I am also an old school pen and paper roleplayer although I haven't touched a dice in several years. 

Just started transitioning 8 months ago if that is a cause for concern. Consider myself pansexual, but since I've never tested it properly I can't say for sure where I lean(I am very shy, although some people might read it as arrogance).

Music taste ranges from atrocious to good. I can listen to generic trance and then switch to Vivaldi at the flip of a switch. Although I'll have to admit that Queen and Freddie Mercury will always hold a place in my heart(god, I miss that man and his wonderful voice).

Taste in movies is decent, although I do appreciate a good(read as bad) B-movie now and then.

As I mentioned I live in Iceland in the small capital city of Reykjavík. I can use weird letters such as Æ,Þ, and Ð, the last one being fantastic for emoticons. :Ð

I am rather open about myself if people ask(especially in person).

Now I am just rambling so I'll cut this short now(short probably being a misnomer).

[picture of me](http://i.imgur.com/xhEWR.jpg)",q4q
"MWM in Austin, looking for other bi guys to play with","Married, 6'4"", 205, goatee, 37.

Looking for other guys in Austin (preferably north) who can host for some playful fun.

PM me; let me know what you're into.",q4q
[F4f] 20 year old looking for a Fwb in NJ (xpost r4r) ,"I just feel like experimenting with another side of my sexuality. If you're interested in experimenting with me, PM me!",q4q
M4m in Reno,Anyone in reno looking for friends...maybe more 27 6' 210lbs black hair brown eyes ,q4q
M4M - Why are there no Bi or Gay guys looking in Michigan?  Desperately looking for my first time.,"I have never gotten with a guy before but desperately want to try it.  I am a chubby white male in my mid-20's located between Lansing and Grand Rapids, MI.  I am willing to travel a bit to meet up.

I want to try giving and maybe receiving oral, receiving and maybe giving anal, as well as anything else you may want to try.  I am very open to trying anything.

I do not care about looks or size and you shouldn't care about looks either (I'm not ugly, just chubby).  You must be disease free, and easygoing since you will have to show me the ropes.  I am sure I will make you very satisfied though.  

Either you can host, or I will get a nice hotel room for a night.

I have tried this before, but it seems that everyone that is looking for the same thing is either out west, or in NYC :(",q4q
"[M4M] Toulouse, France. English Bi Male 40","I am white, blue eyed, sarcastic and don't take life too seriously. I am looking for English speaking friends or significant other - speak French too. I do not like cats or Glee, but do like Abba - weird? I like working-out, wasting hours on the net and mountain biking. Why do I bother - everyone else is in US. Anyway -don't be shy.",q4q
M4MW - 25 yo bi male in NJ looking for likeminded guys or girls to hang out with,"I guess I'm just looking for a change. I'm not out and never plan to be, but would like to find people I can be open to, go out with, that know this kind of thing about me. Girls especially would be fun to out to gay bars with or something like that (and it's a good cover if I see anyone I know.) I'm open to dating and relationships but only with women. Open to hooking up with guys. I'm not traditionally attractive, chubby guy, lots of tattoos, but I've been complemented on my looks before. Anyone in the NJ NY area that'd like to chat?",q4q
W4W 22 any girls want to chat online or send messages?,22 f here looking for another cutie to chat with;) message me if you are interested.,q4q
21 w4w from the twin cities curious and wanting to have fun,I am currently a student living in minneapolis looking to experiment and have fun. Message me if you are interested!,q4q
M4M any other nyc redditors? I know your out there :),"I'm tired of coming home alone to my apt after work would love to find a nice guy to chill with, make new friends, have some fun with, whatever really. so hit me up if your a young redditor in NYC ",q4q
Ftm4Friends Twin Cities area,"I know you guys mostly hide inside during the winter, but I moved here from texas and I'm kinda tired of not know what's cool in the area. PM me maybeh?",q4q
"[m4m] bimm looking for fun in Long Island, NY","Evening all:

35yo 6', 200lbs, medium build bimm looking for DISCRETE fun tonight in Long Island, NY (South Nassau County). And I can host.

Looking for someone around the same age, stats and gay/bi/bi-married (bi or bi-married a +)

We can sit back, watch some tv, drink a few beers and have a great time.

Hope to hear from you!
",q4q
ftm4friends. SF bay area transdude for cool people!,"Hey people. I'm a trans dude looking for other queer people to hang out with. I'm attracted to women, but I wouldn't mind chatting/hanging with a dude.

I'm 22 years old. I like coffee dates, bowling (terrible at it though), video games, dancing, watching terrible but hilarious B horror movies, trying out new food. 

I'm looking for queer friends! Long distance ok too! XD

PM or add me on skype? ottocinque1",q4q
25 y/o bear looking for a stroke buddy in Philly,"25 y/o bear looking for a stroke buddy in Philly.  I can host and I'm pretty open to what we can do, but I won't push to do more than you're comfortable with.",q4q
"M4M Curious, slow moving first timer - Long Beach / Orange County CA","anyone care to chat with a guy who is looking for his second experience?  I may go slow - as I am only warming up to this... chat me up on yahoo.  I've got a few kinks I may want to involve... I enjoy chastity devices, some light bondage and panties... but otherwise I'm a clean cut, guy with normal tastes - just a high sex drive.  drop me a line - boredwithhotels on yahoo instant messenger or here with your contact info.  Start with coffee and drinks - and then who knows where it ends up.  Thanks...",q4q
"Anyone in Williamsburg, VA/W&amp;M (M4M)","Long shot I know, but anybody in Williamsburg or a student at W&amp;M. I'm a pretty nerdy guy, love politics, art, and the outdoors. I'm an avid redditor and feel any guy on here is already more decent than some of my exes.",q4q
"[M4M(Or anyone)] Moving to California, would love to meet new friends. (Long distance, too!)","I'm a Gay guy moving away soon and I would love to meet some new people as I leave home. I'm really not into crazy hookups, but I would love to meet some new people to chat with and maybe eventually meet. Send me a message if you would like to chat sometime :)

I'm also aware that finding someone who lives right in my vicinity is silly, so if anyone would like to chat, please message me. Haha.",q4q
Nebraska is boring (19),Any boys out there want to have some drinks?,q4q
25 Los Angeles [m4m],I work a lot. It severely limits the chances I have to meet guys. Never really dated a guy. Figured I'd see if there were any chill redditors around my age in the same position. Mostly looking for friends/chatting partners but open to more if the chemistry is right. Send me a message if you want.,q4q
[M4M] 31 Los Angeles,"I don't know if this is the place to post or if it is inappropriate to post this here, but I am a straight male looking to have his first gay experience. I don't like the idea of using CL or going to bars and I trust the Reddit community quite a bit. Please don't think I am trolling and if I offended anybody here, I do apologize. Anyway, if you are interested in trying this out with me, hit me with a DM and we can talk more.",q4q
M4M in Northern Virginia / DC... Nerd looking for a date,"I don't know what it is, but I can't seem to land a date for the life of me. I've always been the type who'd prefer being asked versus asking, though. I'm 23, slim, curly hair and a writer. Any takers? What's your ideal date night?",q4q
"[M4M] looking for some new friends, maybe more?","I'm 17, from Maryland. My interests include Video/card/tabletop/board games, Singing/Dancing/Theatre, Cooking, Reading, and Computers. I'm trying to make this sound less robotic, but I hope you don't think ill of me.

It's okay if you don't live close, I just like talking to people(but specifically those of the same persuasion ^_^ )

my AIM is Riggityroll, or shoot me a message here!",q4q
[t for whatever] - FtM in Seattle looking for person (or people) to give oral to [xposted to r4r],"I am a non-op ftm that identifies as a gay man.  I am currently in an open relationship with a bio male.  I enjoy video games, knitting, reading, exercising and hanging out with friends.  I am 5ft3inch, 220lb, 33yo, ddf.

I am looking for people that would like to get oral with no reciprocation needed.  I have given oral to only men and am told I am pretty good at it.  I have been curious about pleasuring a woman with my mouth for a while now but never had the chance yet.",q4q
T (mtf) 4 M - 25 - Los Angeles ,"I'm a 25 year old male to female transsexual living in Los Angeles.

I'm a grad student in a technical field, so I'm a little bit of a nerd, but I'm friendly and very down to earth. I love to scuba dive, although I don't get to do it much anymore, and love to explore new places. I'm pretty new to Southern California, so there's a lot to see.

Physically: I'm pre-op, but plan on having surgery in the next couple years. I'm also tall (6'2"") :-)

edit: If there's any question I can answer, feel free to ask.",q4q
M4M - 24 looking for friends / dating - Upstate NY.,"Let's see how this goes. 

Looking for friends and possibly someone to go on a date with [not of major importance] having more friends never hurts =). 

Someone to hang out with, possibly kick some ass in a fighting game [i.e Smash Bros etc] or something. I know this is all very vague, but I can't really think of much else. 

Interests [Just not to leave you in the dark.]

 * Gaming
 * Drawing
 * 3D Modeling
 * Singing / Dancing etc.

I'd describe myself further but I feel that'd be better done through PM / IM, so feel free to do so =)

Edit: formatting
Edit 2: slight clarification, hahahaha =D ",q4q
w4w - Seattle!,"Hello ladies!

Where are you? Seriously. Seattle's pretty non-heteronormative, *so why can't I seem to find you?*

I'm 19, femme-ish (though rocking a fauxhawk these days) and cute :)",q4q
M4M~17 looking for friends,I live in a small town and don't know many gay guys. Looking to get to know some guys from anywhere. Pretty much so I feel like I'm not the only one and can start to branch out. PM me or comment if you're interested!,q4q
m4m - 19 in southwest MI,"Looking for friends and maybe even dates. Not looking for a serious relationship. Have a lot of interests: theater, music, movies, reading, writing, knitting, etc. Am open to men of varied ages, not very picky about it. Just looking to meet men and learn about them and the things they know. ",q4q
m4m Curious in NJ,"Hey! 21 y/o here in S.Jersey. Honestly, I am a little curious and want to know what its like to be with another man.",q4q
"[m4m] Looking for a date, Eastern Shore Maryland.","I'm a 20 year old college student.  I don't particularly like describing myself, but I've been called a hippie, a punk kid, a twink, somewhat intelligent, and kinda funny sometimes.

Hit me up if you're interested and let's see where this goes.

https://dl.dropbox.com/u/2545215/me.jpg",q4q
48 and starting over (f4f),"I don't have a lot of hope that anything will come of this but you never know. I'm 48, butch(ish), have done many things in my life and am starting over again. I've been a : soldier, rugby player, cowboi, housepainter, amateur actor, dog sled racer, cook, bouncer. I've flown a plane, ridden a stallion bareback, roped cows, welded sculpture, loved, lost and sometimes I sit around writing cowboi poetry.
 I don't have many material goods and no 401k but you never know, there might be someone else out there in the same situ that might want to be friends or something.
 I like all kinds of music from punk rock to Mozart. I don't own a TV and I love to read voraciously. I also spend too much time video gaming but that's going to stop soon when I go back to University and back to the ranch. 
 ",q4q
"[w4w] - 26yo New York Subway Vixen (subspecies of fox) seeks, um, people who would be interested in a New York Subway Vixen?","What the hell, can't hurt to give this a chance, can it?  CAN IT!?!?  (note: this isn't my normal Reddit account, but figured I'd have something that would line up and not link all my online identities together).

Figure I can link to my [Ok Cupid profile](http://www.okcupid.com/profile/subwayfox_redux), but I'll paraphrase/copy-paste a bit here.

I'm a transwoman.  Let's get that out of the way.  I consider myself homoflexible; I really prefer girls and think that I have deeper relationships with them, but I don't close off any other possibilities. 

If you asked me to summarize myself in a few words, I'd get really hissy and maybe slap you. If pressed, I'd probably crawl into a ball and start crying. But I suppose that's not what you're here to hear.

*Okay, okay, just joking!  But I have been here four years, at least according to that silly little trophy thing.  Which is scary.

So, um, me? I guess I'll start with the obvious: I'm a geek. I mean, hell, I *am* posting to reddit*! On a homebuilt computer. Next to an unfinished, prototype hovercraft. Across the room from my collection of old video game systems. Okay, okay, you get the picture.

I love trying to understand how the world works. I consider myself a self-stylized philosopher and theorist; and I like to pretend I'm well read to that end. There is something about trying to figure out how facets of the world work (or whether such things are fathomable or even exist!). It actually often permeates my other interests, whether it's trying to understand the nature of cities and how they form, or how and why airlines work, or trying to understand the nature of emotion. But perhaps I'm getting carried away (at least for a short little writeup).

Some other quick thoughts: currently at NYU (the Gallatin school) finishing my degree.  Self-styled ""artist""-type (you can visit my website at [subwayfox.net](http://www.subwayfox.net/)).  Loves cities and transit.  Tend to be tomboyish-femme.  Tend to like people more on the femme-side of the scale, but hardly exclusively, just like people to be themselves!  Loves to travel but rarely does (sadly).  Can be a Hardcore (like, hardcore) sub.  Wait, um, did I say that out loud?

What am I looking for?  Anything: friends, potential mates, potential playmates (I can dream, right?), and/or anything inbetween or outside.  Well, okay, not enemies.  Enemies suck.

Also, I am a fox.  A vixen, to be precise.  Just to get that out of the way.",q4q
"College in Pittsburgh area, Home in Central NJ (18 male m4m)","I'm looking to go on a date with someone, or something like that. I'm looking for around my own age (17-25). I'm currently going to college for a degree in Psychology which I will (not plan to, will!!!) continue on to a doctorate. I want to help people! My passion is Rocky Horror, and I'm part of a cast back home in NJ. I am fluent in conversational German. I also have a few facial piercings. Anyway, send me a message if you want to talk =] I love meeting new people! :D",q4q
"[w4w] Boston area, 23 years old","I feel like I can let people know about my nerdier interests here on reddit, so... Here goes.  

I love live music, science, nature, environmental stuff, sometimes comic books, I love my guitars.  I love art.  Viewing and creating it.  I love my bike and being a bad vegetarian who eats seafood.  Oh, and I really love cooking (and eating, ha).  And am a regular reader/sometimes poster in /r/trees.",q4q
[M4M] 22 - looking for some fun converstations,"I am a college student, a lil chubby. Almost no limits. I prefer older men. Send me a message and we can have fun from there.",q4q
"(m4m) 18 yrs old, looking to swap pics","white, 18, brown hair...hmu if you wanna share some pics",q4q
30 [M4M] GWM for friend with benefits in Houston,"Hi, guys.  I'm looking for a friend with benefits.  I'd prefer to connect with a lurker who doesn't do this kind of thing, since I want this to be a longer-term mutual arrangement.  I'm NOT looking for a quick hookup, at all.

I'm eaygoing, goodlooking (objectively) and take good care of myself.  Physically, I'm about 5' 10"", brn/brn, slim with a nice tan, totally disease free and well endowed (cut, and prefer that), but versatile.  I'm open to a similar guy under 30 who has a decent head on his shoulders and no emotional baggage.  You don't have to be goodlooking, as long as you take good care of what you have--which includes being disease free and getting tested.  This is a friendship/acquaintance thing, so I'm not going to ask for the world.  ;)

Hit me up if you're interested, and we can chat about it and maybe exchange photos before we meet.  I want to be really discreet about this, so your privacy is assured.

Thanks.",q4q
35 [M4M] Denver bicurious guy looking to please you,"So I really don't have any experience with this but I have always fantasizes about being with another guy. I would love to suck your cock and I'm definitely open to having you fuck me. I'm 5'8 130 lbs. I hope to hear from you and how I can make you feel good!
",q4q
23 [M4MF] or just another curious M in LA area.,"I'm a 23 yo M 6'1"" 170lbs. Looking for fun with a couple or possibly just another curious guy. I've been wanting to try and give a BJ and then we could see where things go from there. PM me. ",q4q
20 [M4A] San Diego/SoCal,"Looking for a top mostly. I'm not too into kissing or oral and I hope that isn't a big problem. This would be my first time so I'm looking for something safe and relaxed.

PM me pics and stats if you are interested.",q4q
"26[M4M] Belfast, Northern Ireland - bicurious","I'm 6'1"" slim-medium build. Looking for a bro, similar in age to myself, to experiment and have some fun with. I'm pretty laid back and up for anything.",q4q
M4M NC/SC bicurious,"Free this weekend to experiment. This is my first time. Would like to go to someone and offer a blowjob. Been wanting to try a for a while. 

Would like to have a beer or two, watch some porn, sit you back, stroke your cock, and then finish with my mouth and throat.",q4q
22 [m4m] NYC - bicurious guy for casual fun,The title pretty much says it all. Looking to have some casual fun with any cute guys who are interested. Pics are very welcome.,q4q
"29M4 M, F, T, Q, ?--Vancouver, BC","Hey folks of Q4Q. You guys should talk to me, because I am fantastic beyond belief. I have picks posted all over if you check the u/ page, and I am just a lovely conversationalist. So, engage me!",q4q
M4m bi-curious NC,"Looking to give a discrete blowjob for a d/d free guy. CL scares me too much. Looking for someone who can teach me. Oh, I've deepthroated a 7x5 dildo.",q4q
"35 [M4M,F,T] - bicurious from chicago","Basically, I want to suck a dick and be fucked in my ass by a cock or strap-on dildo.  I love to crossdress and the whole sissy thing, but I'm not into pain.  I'd love to have a sweet and trustworthy person fuck me :)",q4q
[M4M] 34 blk looking for pic exchange with white guys,"I live in Louisiana, am not exactly out, and have a real hard on (phrasing, boom!) for white guys.  While trying not to be too explicit here, I would love to exchange pics with guys. ",q4q
"29 [M4M] Australia. Curious, horny. PM me",Never been with a guy before,q4q
Anyone in Los Angeles Area? 23/m,"I would like to meet a few new people. I'm 23, hispanic/ mix. I'm down for fun and games. Let's talk, text, message :)",q4q
"[FM4F] - We're late 20s, attractive professional couple in the Seattle area...","Basically, we travel around a bunch and go on a bunch of crazy adventures. We're looking for a friend when it's time for a sexy party. We're clean, no hard drugs, etc. ",q4q
"[MFM/T(MtF)] Cincinnati OH, 25 Year Old Bi Chub here looking for friends(Online or Offline) or Friends with Benefits.","Hi all, Like the title says I am looking for people to either befriend on the internet or IRL. I would love a email/text buddy or someone to actually hang out with. I am your average guy, who plays video games, watches sports, enjoys reading, music, drinking and just hanging out. I am bi-curious, and am a versatile bottom. Send me a PM!!",q4q
M4R Adelaide Australia,Im a male 18year old Adelaide Uni student looking for guys or girls to hang out with sexually or otherwise :) im 6 ft 2 and muscularly built with dark hair. If anyone is interested send a PM my way :),q4q
"26 [M4M] [M4MTF] Los Angeles/Web - Bi Guy honestly looking for friendship, not necessarily experimentation.","I first realized I was bi back in high school, but then I buried it in denial for about 8 years. So, I'd like to meet (either online or in person in LA) some cool, friendly guys or girls who would want to get to know each other! 

As for me--I'm a pretty mellow guy working in the tech industry. I'm also a huge cinephile and can talk about movies for hours! I love getting out to nature and I would definitely like to disconnect from technology more often.

I've experimented some, and though I might be open to it under the right circumstances somewhere in the future, I wouldn't expect anything. Less pressure. :)
",q4q
19 M4M curious KCMO,"Looking for someone to experiment with in kansas city. I am 6'2"" 185 pounds looking for someone around the same age and build.",q4q
24 m4m looking to explore in Kentucky,"24 male USA here living in Kentucky. 6'3 , dark hair and eyes. Pale white, nearly kept short hair, trimmed beard. Love working out and staying in shape. Would love to find a sexy guy to Skype or talk to on the phone. Had curiousity about Twink and more fem type guys for a while. Pm me",q4q
"Howdy, bi, versatile guy in Long Beach California looking for love",Message me and tell me what you like and something about yourself. ,q4q
18M4A Glendale AZ,"looking for some nsa fun! im 6'1, athletic, greenish eyes,white and open to guys or girls! hope to hear from you guys!",q4q
25M4A Looking for anyone to tease and take advantage of me,"I like pretty much anything. I am really into traps and tgirls or other combinations. 

PM me, we may be able to make some good stories",q4q
"[47F 43M 4 A or AA] Western Mass / Springfield / Enfield CT / etc.. - Cuddle, soft swing, lights-out party, whatever else..","What the hell. So my guy and I have done this a few times, but it's difficult to find. Basically just everything except sex. Cuddling clothed, unclothed, touching, oral, etc.. We're both bi. We play together, I won't play alone (he can play alone, either with me there or not).",q4q
"30's guy in MD/DC, curious, looking to experiment","I've done some dating and made out with another guy before and I'm really nervous about this, but I'd love to chat and maybe more. I'd love to be seduced, if I'm honest. Only looking for someone who's clean though. Obviously. ",q4q
"[M4A] 22 Dallas, curious and willing to explore!","Hi kids. Title says it all, but it's time to go into juicy details. 

I'm a guy, 22, 5'6"" on a good day, dirty blonde hair, blue/green eyes (it's hard to explain without a picture), and i've had some bisexual urges lately and I want to explore that side of myself with somebody who's not afraid to reach out to a total stranger. 

Other than that, Please, feel free to PM me. :&gt;",q4q
20 M4A Bisexual guy looking for fun in the Toronto area. ,"I'm a well hung in shape guy living in Pickering Ontario.  I've only ever had sex with women but I'd love to try men. If you're a man, woman, or couple; l, g, b, or t; black or white, yellow or brown, send me a pm and let's talk. ",q4q
"24m looking for a ts! Palm beach, Florida ",Pm me!,q4q
[M4M] Bi-curious Northern NJ Guy Looking Talk,Bi-curious guy in Northern New Jersey looking to make new friends maybe meet people for fun and exploration.   ,q4q
"Thinking of hosting a [w4w][w4r] type party in Brooklyn, NY.","I was thinking of throwing a gay/ bi party for the girls in Brooklyn. I know the owners of a couple of bars and I was talking to a lesbian friend of mine that recently told me that the lesbian/bi nightlife is pretty much dead as compared to a few months ago. Anyhow, I was tossing around the idea to host a party at one of three bar locations. Anyone, female/male gay/bi/curious/freakoftheweek, would be welcome to come, however the theme will be geared towards the ladies. I wanted to ask you first, Yay or Nay, Reddit?",q4q
"M4M 24, Rockford Il, lets see where things take us","Im white, average build, I weigh 240 6' 2"". Btm/vers looking for friends fwb, nsa, or wherever we take it. With all that said, more then anything it be great to just have a that is homosexual as well, and would just like to talk, hold hands, share a laugh or two, and be able to be myself :) ",q4q
[CD4A] - 27 asian crossdress for some online chat/fun,shoot me your skype or yahoo. i'm on only for a short time.,q4q
Looking for partner in crime {M4M} Los Angeles,"Masculine and Curious located in the Culver City area. Not really into the ""scene"" enjoy more going on private adventures  with someone who i get along with. 
I'm 26 year old Mixed Race. 5'11"" with a lean body/ alil hairy.  I like bigger guys, worked out or just alil portly works for me too! 

Looking to hang out with another curious or DL person. Outside we have adventures, go hiking, play sports, video games, watch movies and then when we go inside well that's our business. 

Would prefer something stable and lasting because eventually it'd be cool if we found a girl that would be interested in completing our triangle (Doesn't that sound fun?)  But right now lets just worry about us having a great time..

PM me if you're interested. Easy going, no drama, very confident in what I want and who I am. Let's have some fun. ",q4q
[M4M]/[M4T] NYC WTF LOL,"This is like 50% creepy, but finding guys in the city can be hard when one is a slightly cynical nerd, so I'm here looking for something more than a fast fuck. 

me: I'm 24, kinda skinny, blonde-ish, 5'11"". I got a degree in illustration and i'm still trying to figure out what i want to be when i grow up. Currently doing graphic design for iOS and Android (oh god, android. whyyy.) I tend to enjoy video games (more bioshock and metroid than call of duty) and the drawing and reading of comics (especially ones besides marvel and dc.) I'm not especially into going to bars and talking to strangers, so I thought maybe my old pal the internet could help me out. so here I am.

if you: 1. are between 18-35 2. are in the NYC area 3. know the difference between ""your"" and ""you're"" (and there/their, too/to, etc.) 4. know an X-Wing from a Tie Fighter then say hello. be creative, say something besides ""lol hay wuts up lol."" Here, I'll even give you a prompt: what is your favorite pokemon/and/or/vehicle in star wars?





TL;DR: okcupid.com/profile/raytendo is me.",q4q
(m4t) 56  looking for post op tgirl for chat,,q4q
"27/Plus Size/Lesbian; Looking for Friends, Maybe More...",,q4q
[m4m] 23 - Anyone out there in MD or NoVA?,"Graduated college (computer science) a while ago and moved to Maryland.  I'm pretty much an all around straight guy... but I like guys.  

I'm 23, white, 5'10"", 140lbs, athletic/in shape build, brown hair, blue eyes and sexy as hell (or at least I like to think so).

Just looking for someone close that would be interested in chatting and maybe meeting up sometime if we like each other.  So yea, PM me or something, we can trade Skype's or something.",q4q
27.FTM4M.Florida,"Hey. I'm 27, from south Florida. Looking to meet friends and possibly a relationship. I'm FTM, like the title says. I love video games, Star Wars and going to the beach. If you want to get to know each other, PM me. :3

[Me](http://i.imgur.com/3hfXt.jpg)",q4q
[m4a/m] 22. Anyone in E. Washington or W. Idaho want their own personal pantyboy?,"Hey reddit! I know there are a few WSU/UI redditors, but I don't know if they ever grace this corner of Reddit or not. Let's find out! 

I'm a thin, twinkish 22 year old student here in the Palouse(Washington State to be precise) who's been exploring a little bit on-and-off with guys over the past year. I've always felt I had a more pronounced feminine side than most boys, but recently took a big step in bringing out that side by buying some sexy girls' panties.Hopefully soon I can start wearing more and more(the goal is to be as passible of a CD as possible by Halloween '12 so that I can slut it up my last halloween at school :p). Speaking of school, I'm studying journalism, film, and general history. I either want to go to law school(I'm more interested in activism and advocacy rather than being a courtroom lawyer, for the record). If I can't/don't go to Law School, I want to go into freelance foreign correspondence, preferably in Africa or Southeast Asia, but considering both the current political climate and the dean of the Journalism school's connections, a job in the Middle East might be more obtainable. My school interests tend to bleed into my hobbies(that's either a good thing or a bad thing).

Sexually, I guess you can best describe me as Pan sexual, as I find myself both physically and emotionally attracted to members of all gender variations and orientations, although I've only had sex with girls and boys(and never at the same time, although I did have 1 mmm threesome once. That was awesome!)

Like I said, I identify myself as pansexual, so I have no qualms about anyone, based on gender alone, but recently have been finding myself only interested in guys or mixed-gender couples, so keep that in mind if you respond. Age and race are not important, and while I'm not picky about looks, I obviously prefer someone who takes care of themselves(big curvy women with have a special place in my heart,too, though). 

As you can gather by my title and brief bio, I am currently beginning to crossdress, so that is something that you have to be at least OK with, but I'd prefer if that's a particular brand of kink that gets you off,too. I'd prefer to play a more feminine role (and a more submissive role sexually), but I've been predominately masc/dom my entire life thus far, and have loved it, so I can do that, too. I'm pretty open to anything, but am looking to specifically try new things, like crossdressing, being sissy/submissive, etc. Ideally, I'm looking for the prototypical dom top of any age, however, guys in their 30s-50s are really hot.

I'm only for sure going to be in the area for 13-16 more months, and after that, I could be anywhere from 8 miles away to Cambodia, so a more casual, no strings attached relationship is what I desire. If we go into this looking for love, we'll probably both end up hurt and/or disappointed.  

If any of that didn't turn you off completely, and you think you'll ever pass through the Pullman,Wa/Moscow, Idaho area, drop me a line. 

Here are 7 pics of my ass in panties. I definitely plan on posting more onto reddit in the near future(**Keep in mind that this is an album of me wearing thongs/panties, so yeah, don't be browsing it at work, in class, etc, depending on your situation**): 
http://imgur.com/a/6pUYw#0

**tl;dr-Submissive, versatile, pansexual boy who's just getting into crossdressing wants to dress for and play with a more dominant partner, preferably a versatile, top man who likes their boys to be at least a little girly.**

Edit: added a tl;dr &amp; a direct link to my imgur album for the lazy :p",q4q
29 M Looking for a nice man to do things to my bum [UK],If you're a bi girl well pm me too.,q4q
"Sydney, 19M, bi-curious, Need guy/T-girl to jerk off/frot with ","Hey there im a 19 yo Bi-curious/Straight guy, looking to experiment a bit with another guy or a T girl. Im mainly looking for a regular wank partner (you know, watch porn, jerk ourselves and each other) but i would also be keen for some frotting or mutual sucking!

Like i said I'm 19, I'm 6ft tall, 80kg, 6.5 inch uncut tool, bi-curious, and im looking for someone roughly around my age( doesn't matter too much tho), would be great if you have a fetish for cum, cocks, T girls, asses, Asian girls etc!




",q4q
M4M I just want to give a blowjob!,"I want to try it out for the first time, I'm from SoCal, 18, a bit chubbyy.
It's been something ive just wanted do, I've never done it before so i would need training i guess :P",q4q
30 - M4M Nebraska,Looking for FWB. PM me and we'll talk. I am a top looking for a bottom my age or younger.,q4q
[F4MtF] 30 Ontario or online,"--I've never done one of these before so please excuse me if I come across as a dolt--

I'm a 30 year old bisexual cis-female living somewhere in the Toronto - Montreal corridor.  I'm an academic and my interests are really varied.  I can be equally happy having an in-depth intellectual conversation or watching horrible reality TV.

I'm hoping to find Trans Girls between the ages of 23 and 33 to become friends with and possibly more.  After years of struggling with it, I've finally decided to embrace what I truly love.  I think Trans Women are truly beautiful and its an honor to befriend someone on their journey of gender identity.",q4q
[M4T/M](LA) Let me give you my first blowjob? (r4r X-post),"I totally give in. I've gotten a hardon and popped off looking at cute 'traps' like 3 times tonight alone, so I fucking give in and I'm going to admit it. I want to give someone a fucking blowjob.

I would prefer a 'trap' if there are any out there... but at this point, I'll take anyone in decent shape with a cut dick. Anything with a cut dick and a pair of tits is right at the top of the list though, no doubts.

If you're a guy, I'd like you to be a gay guy. Not bi, not 'straight', but gay. Why? Because all the Bi guys I've talked with over the years have pushy assholes. Just what I've come to learn. All of the 100% gay guys I know are actually fuckin' cool people so I'll take my chances there.

You also, regardless of who/what you are, need to be 10000% okay with this being my first blowjob ever. I might totally suck at it, and not in the good way we'd both like. I'm definitely open to suggestions and how-to's, and I am not going to give up on it if you correct me. Having said that, this is ALL I'm prepared to do at this point. I don't require a return favor, and don't want any expectations of full on sex. I just want to see, touch, and suck on a dick.

I'm not in a rush either. I'm patient. Please be patient as well setting this up. I do want this ASAP... but I'm not going to stress myself to meet you during a 30 minute window of your choosing... and I'm definitely open to a regular thing if we click.

Let me know if anyone wants to be my practice toy.
",q4q
[w4w] curious girl looking for a friend or more? (Southern Cali),:) hi.. ummm.. yeah... :),q4q
are there any big bear or chub redditors in pa that wanna chat? Hit up my orangered.,,q4q
"M4T(male to female) curiosity.NJ, NYC, LI, Upstate","Why hellloooo!!

I'm in my 20s, male, athletic build, who works out and goes to school. I've wondered what it its like to be with a male but feel apprehensive about it. Women are too good looking to give up and guys are too....masculine lol.

So what I'm looking for is a transsexual male who's being a female. The most important thing is that it must be discrete and equally importantly is being disease, drug, and ailment free. I'd hope you'd be honest about that and use your honor as a redditor, and decent human being about that and as will I. I'd hope you'll be as feminine looking as possible, breasts, facial features, and small body (with a penis) would be fantastic. You can see a pic of me through my previous posts.

Feel free to pm me and comment below and tell me what you think of me ;). Send a pic of yourself that'd be great too. We would talk a lot before and make sure we're trust worthy.",q4q
"21 M4M Tacoma, WA","Hello to any and all readers of this post.

I am a 21 year old male living in Spanaway, WA(its near Tacoma) and am hopefully looking to find that special someone among my fellow redditors. If stats are important to you then I will let you know that I'm a fairly big guy at around 6'0"" and roughly 300 lbs. I'm white with brownish blonde hair and blue green eyes. I wear glasses and definitely look like the nerd that I am. As for those that care for personality over looks I love to read (pretty much anything so long as its well written,) I am an avid movie watcher, love playing video games when i have the time (mostly League of Legends,) I like listening to music especially musicals, Cooking, and Cuddling (my friends call me the giant teddy bear.) I am looking for someone who is (hopefully) living close to myself so that we may meet and hangout. I would like to just send messages back and forth for a little bit in the beginning and then move up to skype. I have never really been in a relationship with another guy before so this is new territory for me and I am honesty scared to death about writing this. I am ""out"" and proud of it not your stereotypical gay guy though as I am often called the straightest guy in the room. ",q4q
[M4M] Let's skype: limabeans12,,q4q
"M4m Bakersfield,ca curious here",Hey live in Bakersfield looking for someone to try some stuff with. Open to talking and getting to know a little. Prefer older guys but cool with any age let me know if your near by,q4q
18 m4m or tgirl in the Florida Panhandle,PM me if you're near or don't mind driving(; Im down for anything.,q4q
18 y.o NoVa lookin for NSA constant fuckbuddy,18 y.o here in nova looking for a hole to plug. Ill fuck your face then fuck the shit out of your ass ;) the younger the better. Hmu ;),q4q
